THE SEA LIONS.
CHAPTER I.
_____When that's gone,
He shall drink naught but brine.
Tempest
.
While
there is less of that high polish in America that
is obtained by long intercourse with the great world, than
is to be found in nearly every European country, there is
much less positive rusticity also. There, the extremes of
society are widely separated, repelling rather than
attracting
each other; while among ourselves, the tendency is to
gravitate towards a common centre. Thus it is, that all
things in America become subject to a mean law that is
productive of a mediocrity which is probably much above
the average of that of most nations; possibly of all,
England
excepted; but which is only a mediocrity, after all.
In this way, excellence in nothing is justly appreciated,
nor is it often recognised; and the suffrages of the nation
are pretty uniformly bestowed on qualities of a secondary
class. Numbers have sway, and it is as impossible to resist
them in deciding on merit, as it is to deny their power in
the ballot-boxes; time alone, with its great curative
influence
,
supplying the remedy that is to restore the public
mind to a healthful state, and give equally to the pretender
and to him who is worthy of renown, his proper place in
the pages of history.
The activity of American life, the rapidity and
cheapness
of intercourse, and the migratory habits both have
induced, leave little of rusticity and local character in any
particular sections of the country. Distinctions, that an
acute observer may detect, do certainly exist between the
eastern and the western man, between the northerner and
the southerner, the Yankee and middle states' man; the
Bostonian, Manhattanese and Philadelphian; the
Tuckahoe
and the Cracker; the Buckeye or Wolverine, and the
Jersey Blue. Nevertheless, the world cannot probably
produce another instance of a people who are derived from
so many different races, and who occupy so large an extent
of country, who are so homogeneous in appearance,
characters
and opinions. There is no question that the
institutions
have had a material influence in producing this
uniformity, while they have unquestionably lowered the
standard to which opinion is submitted, by referring the
decisions to the many, instead of making the appeal to the
few, as is elsewhere done. Still, the direction is onward,
and though it may take time to carve on the social column
of America that graceful and ornamental capital which it
forms the just boast of Europe to possess, when the task
shall be achieved, the work will stand on a bse so broad
as to secure its upright attitude for ages.
Notwithstanding the general character of identity and
homogenity that so strongly marks the picture of American
society, exceptions are to be met with, in particular
districts
,
that are not only distinct and incontrovertible, but
which are so peculiar as to be worthy of more than a
passing
remark in our delineations of national customs. Our
present purpose leads us into one of these secluded
districts
,
and it may be well to commence the narrative of
certain deeply interesting incidents that it is our intention
to attempt to portray, by first referring to the place and
people where and from whom the principal actors in our
legend had their origin.
Every one at all familiar with the map of America knows
the position and general form of the two islands that shelter
the well-known harbour of the great emporium of the
commerce
of the country. These islands obtained their names
from the Dutch, who called them Nassau and Staten; but
the English, with little respect for the ancient house whence
the first of these appellations is derived, and consulting
only the homely taste which leads them to a practical rather
than to a poetical nomenclature in all things, have since
virtually dropped the name of Nassau, altogether
substituting
that of Long Island in its stead.
Long Island, or the island of Nassau, extends from the
mouth of the Hudson to the eastern line of Connecticut;
forming a sort of sea-wall to protect the whole coast of the
latter little territory against the waves of the broad Atlantic.
Three of the oldest New York counties, as their names
would imply, Kings, Queens, and Suffolk, are on this
island. Kings was originally peopled by the Dutch, and
still possesses as many names derived from Holland as
from England, if its towns, which are of recent origin, be
taken from the account. Queens is more of a mixture,
having been early invaded and occupied by adventurers
from the other side of the Sound; but Suffolk, which
contains
nearly, if not quite, two-thirds of the surface of the
whole island, is and ever has been in possession of a people
derived originally from the puritans of New England. Of
these three counties, Kings is much the smallest, though
next to New York itself, the most populous county in the
state; a circumstance that is owing to the fact that two
suburban offsets of the great emporium, Brooklyn and
Williamsburg
,
happen to stand, within its limits, on the waters
of what is improperly called the East River; an arm of the
sea that has obtained this appellation, in contradistinction
to the Hudson, which, as all Manhattanese well know, is
as often called the North River, as by its proper name. In
consequence of these two towns, or suburbs of New York,
one of which contains nearly a hundred thousand souls,
while the other must be drawing on towards twenty
thousand
,
Kings county has lost all it ever had of peculiar, or
local character. The same is true of Queens, though in a
diminished degree; but Suffolk remains Suffolk still, and
it is with Suffolk alone that our present legend requires us
to deal. Of Suffolk, then, we purpose to say a few words
by way of preparatory explanation.
Although it has actually more sea-coast than all the rest
of New York united, Suffolk has but one sea-port that is
ever mentioned beyond the limits of the county itself. Nor
is this port one of general commerce, its shipping being
principally employed in the hardy and manly occupation
of whaling. As a whaling town, Sag Harbour is the third
or fourth port in the country, and maintains something like
that rank in importance. A whaling haven is nothing
without
a whaling community. Without the last, it is almost
hopeless to look for success. New York can, and has often
fitted whalers for sea, having sought officers in the regular
whaling ports; but it has been seldom that the enterprises
have been rewarded with such returns as to induce a
second
voyage by the same parties.
It is as indispensable that a whaler should possess a
certain
esprit de corps
, as that a regiment, or a ship of war,
should be animated by its proper spirit. In the whaling
communities, this spirit exists to an extent, and in a
degree
that is wonderful, when one remembers the great
expansion
of this particular branch of trade within the last
five-and-twenty years. It may be a little lessened of late,
but at the time of which we are writing, or about the year
1820, there was scarcely an individual who followed this
particular calling out of the port of Sag Harbour, whose
general standing on board ship was not as well known to
all the women and girls of the place, as it was to his
shipmates
.
Success in taking the whale was a thing that made
itself felt in every fibre of the prosperity of the town; and
it was just as natural that the single-minded population of
that part of Suffolk should regard the bold and skilful
harpooner
,
or lancer, with favour, as it is for the belle at a
watering-place to bestow her smiles on one of the young
heroes of Contreras or Churubusco. His peculiar merit,
whether with the oar, lance, or harpoon, is bruited about,
as well as the number of whales he may have succeeded in
making fast to, or those which he caused to spout
blood. It is true, that the great extension of the trade
within the last twenty years, by drawing so many from a
distance into its pursuits, has in a degree lessened this
local interest and local knowledge of character; but at the
time of which we are about to write, both were at their
height, and Nantucket itself had not more of this
intelligence
office propensity, or more of the true whaling
esprit
de corps
, than were to be found in the district of country
that surrounded Sag Harbour.
Long Island forks at its eastern end, and may be said to
Vol. I.  2
have two extremities. One of these, which is much the
shortest of the two legs thus formed, goes by the name of
Oyster Pond Point; while the other, that stretches much
farther in the direction of Blok Island, is the well-known
cape called Montauk. Within the fork lies Shelter Island,
so named from the snug berth it occupies. Between Shelter
Island and the longest or southern prong of the fork, are
the waters which compose the haven of Sag Harbour, an
estuary of some extent; while a narrow but deep arm of
the sea separates this island from the northern prong, that
terminates at Oyster Pond.
The name of Oyster Pond Point was formerly applied to a
long, low, fertile and pleasant reach of land, that extended
several miles from the point itself, westward, towards the
spot where the two prongs of the fork united. It was not
easy, during the first quarter of the present century, to find
a more secluded spot on the whole island, than Oyster
Pond. Recent enterprises have since converted it into the
terminus of a railroad; and Green Port, once called
Sterling
,
is a name well known to travellers between New
York and Boston; but in the earlier part of the present
century it seemed just as likely that the
Santa Casa
of
Loretto should take a new flight and descend on the point,
as that the improvement that has actually been made should
in truth occur at that out-of-the-way place. It required,
indeed, the keen eye of a railroad projector to bring this
spot in connection with anything; nor could it be done
without having recourse to the water by which it is almost
surrounded. Using the last, it is true, means have been
found to place it in a line between two of the great marts
of the country, and thus to put an end to aH its seclusion,
its simplicity, its peculiarities, and we had almost said, its
happiness.
It is to us ever a painful sight to see the rustic virtues
rudely thrown aside by the intrusion of what are termed
improvements. A railroad is certainly a capital invention
for the traveller, but it may be questioned if it is of any
other benefit than that of pecuniary convenience to the
places through which it passes. How many delightful
hamlets, pleasant villages, and even tranquil county towns,
are losing their primitive characters for simplicity and
contentment
,
by the passage of these fiery trains, that drag
after them a sort of bastard elegance, a pretension that is
destructive of peace of mind, and an uneasy desire in all
who dwell by the way-side, to pry into the mysteries of the
whole length and breadth of the region it traverses!
We are writing of the year of our Lord one thousand
eight hundred and nineteen. In that day, Oyster Pond
was, in one of the best acceptations of the word, a rural
district. It is true that its inhabitants were accustomed
to the water, and to the sight of vessels, from the
two-decker
to the little shabby-looking craft that brought ashes
from town, to meliorate the sandy lands of Suffolk. Only
five years before, an English squadron had lain in
Gardiner's
Bay, here pronounced `Gar'ner's,' watching the Race,
or eastern outlet of the Sound, with a view to cut off the
trade and annoy their enemy. That game is up, for ever.
No hostile squadron, English, French, Dutch, or all united,
will ever again blockade an American port for any serious
length of time, the young Hercules passing too rapidly
from the gristle into the bone, any longer to suffer antics
of this nature to be played in front of his cradle. But
such was not his condition in the war of 1812, and the
good people of Oyster Pond had become familiar with
the checkered sides of two-deck ships, and the venerable
and beautiful ensign of Old England, as it floated above
them.
Nor was it only by these distant views, and by means
of hostilities, that the good folk on Oyster Pond were
acquainted
with vessels. New York is necessary to all on
the coast, both as a market and as a place to procure
supplies
;
and every creek, or inlet, or basin, of any sort,
within a hundred leagues of it, is sure to possess one or
more craft that ply between the favourite haven and the
particular spot in question. Thus was it with Oyster Pond.
There is scarce a better harbour on the whole American
coast, than that which the narrow arm of the sea that
divides
the Point from Shelter Island presents; and even in
the simple times of which we are writing, Sterling had its
two or three coasters, such as they were. But the true
maritime character of Oyster Pond, as well as that of all
Suffolk, was derived from the whalers, and its proper
nucleus
was across the estuary, at Sag Harbour. Thither the
youths of the whole region resorted for employment, and
to advance their fortunes, and generally with such success
as is apt to attend enterprise, industry and daring, when
exercised with energy in a pursuit of moderate gains.
None became rich, in the strict signification of the term,
though a few got to be in reasonably affluent circumstances;
many were placed altogether at their case, and more were
made humbly comfortable. A farm in America is well
enough for the foundation of family support, but it rarely
suffices for all the growing wants of these days of
indulgence
,
and of a desire to enjoy so much of that which was
formerly left to the undisputed possession of the
unquestionably
rich. A farm, with a few hundreds
per annum
,
derived from other sources, makes a good base of comfort;
and if the hundreds are converted into thousands, your
farmer, or agriculturalist, becomes a man not only at his
case, but a proprietor of some importance. The farms on
Oyster Pond were neither very extensive, nor had they
owners of large incomes to support them; on the contrary,
most of them were made to support their owners; a thing
that is possible, even in America, with industry, frugality
and judgment. In order, however, that the names of places
we may have occasion to use shall be understood, it may
be well to be a little more particular in our preliminary
explanations.
The reader knows that we are now writing of Suffolk
County, Long Island, New York. He also knows that our
opening scene is to be on the shorter, or most northern of
the two prongs of that fork, which divides the eastern end
of this island, giving it what are properly two capes. The
smallest territorial division that is known to the laws of
New York, in rural districts, is the `township,' as it is
called. These townships are usually larger than the
English
parish, corresponding more properly with the French
canton. They vary, however, greatly in size, some
containing
as much as a hundred square miles, which is the
largest size, while others do not contain more than a tenth
of that surface.
The township in which the northern prong, or point of
Long Island, lies, is named Southold, and includes not
only all of the long, low, narrow land that then went by
the common names of Oyster Pond, Sterling, &c., but
several islands, also, which stretch off in the Sound, as
well as a broader piece of territory, near Riverhead. Oyster
Pond, which is the portion of the township that lies on the
`point,' is, or
was
, for we write of a remote period in the
galloping history of the state, only a part of Southold, and
probably was not then a name known in the laws, at all.
We have a wish, also, that this name should be
pronounced
properly. It is not called Oyster
Pond
, as the
uninitiated would be very apt to get it, but
Oys
ter Pnd,
the last word having a sound similar to that of the
cockney's
`pound,' in his two pnd two. This discrepancy
between the spelling and the pronunciation of proper names
is agreeable to us, for it shows that a people are not put in
leading strings by pedagogues, and that they make use of
their own, in their own way. We remember how great
was our satisfaction once, on entering Holmes' Hole, a
well-known bay in this very vicinity, in our youth, to hear
a boatman call the port, `Hum'ses Hull.' It is getting to
be so rare to meet with an American, below the higher
classes, who will consent to cast this species of veil before
his school-day acquisitions, that we acknowledge it gives
us pleasure to hear such good, homely, old-fashioned
English
as Gar'ner's Island, Hum'ses Hull, and
Oys
ter
Pnd.
This plainness of speech was not the only proof of the
simplicity of former days that was to be found in Suffolk,
in the first quarter of the century. The eastern end of
Long Island lies so much out of the track of the rest of the
world, that even the new railroad cannot make much
impression
on its inhabitants, who get their pigs and poultry,
butter and eggs, a little earlier to market, than in the days
of the stage-wagons, it is true, but they fortunately, as yet,
bring little back except it be the dross that sets every thing
in motion, whether it be by rail, or through the sands, in
the former toilsome mode.
The season, at the precise moment when we desire to
take the reader with us to Oyster Pond, was in the
delightful
month of September, when the earlier promises of
the year are fast maturing into performance. Although
2*
Suffolk, as a whole, can scarcely be deemed a productive
county, being generally of a thin, light soil, and still covered
with a growth of small wood, it possesses, nevertheless,
spots of exceeding fertility. A considerable portion of the
northern prong of the fork has this latter character, and
Oyster Pond is a sort of garden compared with much of
the sterility that prevails around it. Plain, but respectable
dwellings, with numerous out-buildings, orchards and
fruit-trees
,
fences carefully preserved, a pains-taking tillage,
good roads, and here and there a meeting-house, gave
the fork an air of rural and moral beauty that, aided by the
water by which it was so nearly surrounded, contributed
greatly to relieve the monotony of so dead a level. There
were heights in view, on Shelter Island, and bluffs towards
Riverhead, which, if they would not attract much attention
in Switzerland, were by no means overlooked in Suffolk.
In a word, both the season and the place were charming,
though most of the flowers had already faded; and the
apple
,
and the pear, and the peach, were taking the places
of the inviting cherry. Fruit abounded, notwithstanding
the close vicinity of the district to salt water, the airs from
the sea being broken, or somewhat tempered, by the land
that lay to the southward.
We have spoken of the coasters that ply between the
emporium and all the creeks and bays of the Sound, as
well as of the numberless rivers that find an outlet for their
waters between Sandy Hook and Rockaway. Wharves
were constructed, at favourable points,
inside
the prong,
and occasionally a sloop was seen at them loading its truck,
or discharging its ashes or street manure, the latter being
a very common return cargo for a Long Island coaster.
At one wharf, however, now lay a vessel of a different
mould, and one which, though of no great size, was
manifestly
intended to go
outside
. This was a schooner that
that had been recently launched, and which had advanced no
farther in its first equipment than to get in its two
principal
spars, the rigging of which hung suspended over the
mast-heads, in readiness to be set up for the first time.
The day being Sunday, work was suspended, and this so
much the more, because the owner of the vessel was a
certain
Deacon Pratt, who dwelt in a house within half a mile
of the wharf, and who was also the proprietor of three
several parcels of land in that neighbourhood, each of which
had its own buildings and conveniences, and was properly
enough dignified with the name of a farm. To be sure,
neither of these farms was very large, their acres united
amounting to but little more than two hundred; but, owing
to their condition, the native richness of the soil, and the
mode of turning them to account, they had made Deacon
Pratt a warm man, for Suffolk.
There are two great species of deacons; for we suppose
they must all be referred to the same
genera
. One species
belong to the priesthood, and become priests and bishops;
passing away, as priests and bishops are apt to do, with
more or less of the savour of godliness. The other species
are purely laymen, and are
sui generis
. They are,
ex
officio
,
the most pious men in a neighbourhood, as they
sometimes
are, as it would seem to us,
ex officio
, also the most
grasping and mercenary. As we are not in the secrets of
the sects to which these lay deacons belong, we shall not
presume to pronounce whether the individual is elevated
to the deaconate because he is prosperous, in a worldly
sense, or whether the prosperity is a consequence of the
deaconate; but, that the two usually go together is quite
certain; which being the cause, and which the effect, we
leave to wiser heads to determine.
Deacon Pratt was no exception to the rule. A tighter
fisted sinner did not exist in the county than this pious
soul, who certainly not only wore, but wore out the form
of godliness, while he was devoted, heart and hand, to the
daily increase of worldly gear. No one spoke disparagingly
of the deacon, notwithstanding. So completely had he got
to be interwoven with the church`meeting,' we ought to
sayin that vicinity, that speaking disparagingly of him
would have appeared like assailing Christianity. It is true,
that many an unfortunate fellow-citizen in Suffolk had
been made to feel how close was the gripe of his hand, when
he found himself in its grasp; but there is a way of
practising
the most ruthless extortion, that serves not only to
deceive the world, but which would really seem to mislead
the extortioner himself. Phrases take the place of deeds,
sentiments those of facts, and grimaces those of benevolent
looks, so ingeniously and so impudently, that the wronged
often fancy that they are the victims of a severe
dispensation
of Providence, when the truth would have shown that
they were simply robbed.
We do not mean, however, that Deacon Pratt was a
robber. He was merely a hard man in the management of
his affairs; never cheating, in a direct sense, but seldom
conceding a cent to generous impulses, or to the duties of
kind. He was a widower, and childless, circumstances
that rendered his love of gain still less pardonable; for
many a man who is indifferent to money on his own
account
,
will toil and save to lay up hoards for those who are
to come after him. The deacon had only a niece to
inherit
his effects, unless he might choose to step beyond
that degree of consanguinity, and bestow a portion of his
means on cousins. The churchor, to be more literal,
the `meeting'had an eye on his resources, however; and
it was whispered it had actually succeeded, by means
known to itself, in squeezing out of his tight grasp no less
a sum than one hundred dollars, as a donation to a certain
theological college. It was conjectured by some persons
that this was only the beginning of a religious liberality,
and that the excellent and godly-minded deacon would
bestow
most of his property in a similar way, when the
moment
should come that it could be no longer of any use to
himself. This opinion was much in favour with divers
devout females of the deacon's congregation, who had
daughters of their own, and who seldom failed to conclude
their observations on this interesting subject with some
such remark as, Well, in
that
case, and it seems to me
that every thing points that way, Mary Pratt will get no
more than any other poor man's daughter.
Little did Mary, the only child of Israel Pratt, an elder
brother of the deacon, think of all this. She had been left
an orphan in her tenth year, both parents dying within a
few months of each other, and had lived beneath her uncle's
roof for nearly ten more years, until use, and natural
affection
,
and the customs of the country, had made her feel
absolutely at home there. A less interested, or less selfish
being than Mary Pratt, never existed. In this respect she
was the very antipodes of her uncle, who often stealthily
rebuked her for her charities and acts of neighbourly
kindness
,
which he was wont to term waste. But Mary kept
the even tenor of her way, seemingly not hearing such
remarks
,
and doing her duty quietly, and in all humility.
Suffolk was settled originally by emigrants from New
England, and the character of its people is, to this hour,
of modified New England habits and notions. Now, one
of the marked peculiarities of Connecticut is an
indisposition
to part with anything without a
quid pro quo
. Those
little services, offerings, and conveniences that are
elsewhere
parted with without a thought of remuneration, go
regularly upon the day-book, and often reappear on a `
settlement
,'
years after they have been forgotten by those who
received the favours. Even the man who keeps a carriage
will let it out for hire; and the manner in which money is
accepted, and even asked for by persons in easy
circumstances
,
and for things that would be gratuitous in the
Middle States, often causes disappointment, and sometimes
disgust. In this particular, Scottish and Swiss thrift, both
notorious, and the latter particularly so, are nearly equalled
by New England thrift; more especially in the close
estimate of the value of services rendered. So marked,
indeed, is this practice of looking for requitals, that even
the language is infected with it. Thus, should a person
pass a few months by invitation with a friend, his visit is
termed `boarding;' it being regarded as a matter of course
that he pays his way. It would scarcely be safe, indeed,
without the precaution of passing receipts on quitting,
for one to stay any time in a New England dwelling, unless
prepared to pay for his board. The free and frank habits
that prevail among relatives and friends elsewhere, are
nearly unknown there, every service having its price.
These customs are exceedingly repugnant to all who have
been educated in different notions; yet are they not
without
their redeeming qualities, that might be pointed out to
advantage, though our limits will not permit us, at this
moment, so to do.
Little did Mary Pratt suspect the truth; but habit, or
covetousness, or some vague expectation that the girl might
yet contract a marriage that would enable him to claim all
his advances, had induced the deacon never to bestow
a cent on her education, or dress, or pleasures of any
sort, that the money was not regularly charged against
her, in that nefarious work that he called his day-book.
As for the self-respect, and the feelings of caste, which
prevent a gentleman from practising any of these
tradesmen's
tricks, the deacon knew nothing of them. He would
have set the man down as a fool who deferred to any
notions
so unprofitable. With him, not only every
man
, but
every
thing
had its price, and usually it was a good
price, too. At the very moment when our tale opens there
stood charged in his book, against his unsuspecting and
affectionate niece, items in the way of schooling, dress,
board, and pocket-money, that amounted to the
considerable
sum of one thousand dollars, money fairly expended.
The deacon was only intensely mean and avaricious, while
he was as honest as the day. Not a cent was overcharged;
and to own the truth, Mary was so great a favourite with
him, that most of his charges against
her
were rather of a
reasonable rate than otherwise.
CHAPTER II.
Marry, I saw your niece do more favours
To the count's serving-man, than ever she bestowed
Upon me; I saw it i' the orchard.
Twelfth Night
.
On
the Sunday in question, Deacon Pratt went to
meeting
as usual, the building in which divine service was held
that day, standing less than two miles from his residence;
but, instead of remaining for the afternoon's preaching, as
was his wont, he got into his one-horse chaise, the vehicle
then in universal use among the middle classes, though
now so seldom seen, and skirred away homeward as fast as
an active, well-fed and powerful switch-tailed mare could
draw him; the animal being accompanied in her rapid
progress by a colt of some three months' existence. The
residence of the deacon was unusually inviting for a man
of his narrow habits. It stood on the edge of a fine
apple-orchard
,
having a door-yard of nearly two acres in its front.
This door-yard, which had been twice mown that summer,
was prettily embellished with flowers, and was shaded by
four rows of noble cherry-trees. The house itself was of
wood, as is almost uniformly the case in Suffolk, where
little stone is to be found, and where brick constructions
are apt to be thought damp: but, it was a respectable
edifice
,
with five windows in front, and of two stories. The
siding was of unpainted cedar-shingles; and, although the
house had been erected long previously to the revolution,
the siding had been renewed but once, about ten years
before
the opening of our tale, and the whole building was in
a perfect state of repair. The thrift of the deacon rendered
him careful, and he was thoroughly convinced of the truth
of the familiar adage which tells us that a stitch in time,
saves nine. All around the house and farm was in perfect
order, proving the application of the saying. As for the
view, it was sufficiently pleasant, the house having its front
towards the east, while its end windows looked, the one set
in the direction of the Sound, and the other in that of the
arm of the sea, which belongs properly to Peconic Bay,
we believe. All this water, some of which was visible
over points and among islands, together with a smiling and
fertile, though narrow stretch of foreground, could not fail
of making an agreeable landscape.
It was little, however, that Deacon Pratt thought of
views, or beauty of any sort, as the mare reached the open
gate of his own abode. Mary was standing in the stoop,
or porch of the house, and appeared to be anxiously
awaiting
her uncle's return. The latter gave the reins to a
black, one who was no longer a slave, but who was a
descendant
of some of the ancient slaves of the Pratts, and in
that character consented still to dawdle about the place,
working for half price. On alighting, the uncle approached
the niece with somewhat of interest in his manner.
Well, Mary, said the former, how does he get on,
now?
Oh! my dear sir, he cannot possibly live, I think, and
I do most earnestly entreat that you will let me send across
to the Harbour for Dr. Sage.
By the Harbour was meant Sag's, and the physician
named was one of merited celebrity in old Suffolk. So
healthy was the country in general, and so simple were the
habits of the people, that neither lawyer nor physician was
to be found in every hamlet, as is the case to-day. Both
were to be had at Riverhead, as well as at Sag Harbour;
but, if a man called out Squire, or Doctor, in the
highways of Suffolk, sixteen men did not turn round to
reply, as is said to be the case in other regions; one half
answering to the one appellation, and the second half to
the other. The deacon had two objections to yielding to
his niece's earnest request; the expense being one, though
it was not, in this instance, the greatest; there was another
reason that he kept to himself, but which will appear as
our narrative proceeds.
A few weeks previously to the Sunday in question, a
sea-going vessel, inward bound, had brought up in
Gardiner's
Bay, which is a usual anchorage for all sorts of craft.
A worn-out and battered seaman had been put ashore on
Oyster Pond, by a boat from this vessel, which sailed to
the westward soon after, proceeding most probably to New
York. The stranger was not only well advanced in life,
but he was obviously wasting away with disease.
The account given of himself by this seaman was
sufficiently
explicit. He was born on Martha's Vineyard, but, as
is customary with the boys of that island, he had left home
in his twelfth year, and had now been absent from the
place of his birth a little more than half a century.
Conscious
of the decay which beset him, and fully convinced
that his days were few and numbered, the seaman, who
called himself Tom Daggett, had felt a desire to close his
eyes in the place where they had first been opened to the
light of day. He had persuaded the commander of the
craft mentioned, to bring him from the West Indies, and
to put him ashore as related, the Vineyard being only a
hundred miles or so to the eastward of Oyster Pond Point.
He trusted to luck to give him the necessary opportunity
of overcoming these last hundred miles.
Daggett was poor, as he admitted, as well as friendless
and unknown. He had with him, nevertheless, a
substantial
sea-chest, one of those that the sailors of that day
uniformly
used in merchant-vessels, a man-of-war compelling
them to carry their clothes in bags, for the convenience of
compact stowage. The chest of Daggett, however, was a
regular inmate of the forecastle, and, from its appearance,
had made almost as many voyages as its owner. The last,
indeed, was heard to say that he had succeeded in saving
it from no less than three shipwrecks. It was a reasonably
heavy chest, though its contents, when opened, did not
seem to be of any very great value.
A few hours after landing, this man had made a bargain
with a middle-aged widow, in very humble circumstances,
and who dwelt quite near to the residence of Deacon Pratt,
to receive him as a temporary inmate; or, until he could get
a chance across to the Vineyard. At first, Daggett
kept about, and was much in the open air. While able to
walk, he met the deacon, and singular, nay, unaccountable
as it seemed to the niece, the uncle soon contracted a
species
of friendship for, not to say intimacy with, this
stranger
.
In the first place, the deacon was a little particular
in not having intimates among the necessitous, and the
Widow White soon let it be known that her guest had not
even a red cent. He had chattels, however, that were
of some estimation among seamen; and Roswell Gardiner,
or Gar'ner, as he was called, the young seaman
par
excellence
of the Point, one who had been not only a whaling,
but who had also been a sealing, and who at that moment
was on board the deacon's schooner, in the capacity of
master, had been applied to for advice and assistance. By
the agency of Mr. Gar'ner, as the young mate was then
termed, sundry palms, sets of sail-needles, a fid or two,
and various other similar articles, that obviously could no
longer be of any use to Daggett, were sent across to the
`Harbour,' and disposed of there, to advantage, among the
many seamen of the port. By these means the stranger
was, for a few weeks, enabled to pay his way, the board
he got being both poor and cheap.
A much better result attended this intercourse with
Gardiner, than that of raising the worn-out seaman's
immediate
ways and means. Between Mary Pratt and
Roswell
Vol. I.  3
Gardiner there existed an intimacy of long standing
for their years, as well as of some peculiar features, to
which there will be occasion to advert hereafter. Mary
was the very soul of charity in all its significations, and
this Gardiner knew. When, therefore, Daggett became
really necessitous, in the way of comforts that even money
could not command beneath the roof of the Widow White,
the young man let the fact be known to the deacon's niece,
who immediately provided sundry delicacies that were
acceptable
to the palate of even disease. As for her uncle,
nothing was at first said to him on the subject. Although
his intimacy with Daggett went on increasing, and they
were daily more and more together, in long and secret
conference, not a suggestion was ever made by the deacon
in the way of contributing to his new friend's comforts.
To own the truth, to give was the last idea that ever
occurred to this man's thoughts.
Mary Pratt was observant, and of a mind so constituted,
that its observations usually led her to safe and accurate
deductions. Great was the surprise of all on the Point
when it became known that Deacon Pratt had purchased
and put into the water, the new sea-going craft that was
building on speculation, at Southold. Not only had he
done this, but he had actually bought some half-worn
copper
,
and had it placed on the schooner's bottom, as high
as the bends, ere he had her launched. While the whole
neighbourhood was exercised with conjectures on the
motive which could induce the deacon to become a
ship-owner
in his age, Mary did not fail to impute it to some
secret but powerful influence, that the sick stranger had
obtained over him. He now spent nearly half his time in
private communications with Daggett; and, on more than
one occasion, when the niece had taken some light article
of food over for the use of the last, she found him and her
uncle examining one or two dirty and well-worn charts of
the ocean. As she entered, the conversation invariably
was changed; nor was Mrs. White ever permitted to be
present at one of these secret conferences.
Not only was the schooner purchased, and coppered,
and launched, and preparations made to fit her for sea,
but Young Gar'ner was appointed to command her!
As respects Roswell Gardiner, or Gar'ner, as it would
be almost thought a breach of decorum, in Suffolk, not to
call him, there was no mystery. Six-and-twenty years
before
the opening of our legend, he had been born on Oyster
Pond itself, and of one of its best families. Indeed, he
was known to be a descendant of Lyon Gardiner, that
engineer
who had been sent to the settlement of the lords
Saye and Seal, and Brook, since called Saybrook, near
two centuries before, to lay out a town and a fort. This
Lyon Gardiner had purchased of the Indians the island in
that neighbourhood, which still bears his name. This
establishment
on the island was made in 1639; and now, at
an interval of two hundred and nine years, it is in
possession
of its ninth owner, all having been of the name and
blood of its original patentee. This is great antiquity for
America, which, while it has produced many families of
greater wealth, and renown, and importance, than that of
the Gardiners, has seldom produced any of more permanent
local respectability. This is a feature in society that we
so much love to see, and which is so much endangered by
the uncertain and migratory habits of the people, that we
pause a moment to record this instance of stability, so
pleasing and so commendable, in an age and country of
changes.
The descendants of any family of two centuries standing,
will, as a matter of course, be numerous. There are
exceptions
,
certainly; but such is the rule. Thus is it with
Lyon Gardiner, and his progeny, who are now to be
numbered
in scores, including persons in all classes of life,
though it carries with it a stamp of caste to be known in
Suffolk as having come direct from the lions of old Lyon
Gardiner. Roswell, of that name, if not of that Ilk, the
island then being the sole property of David Johnson
Gardiner
,
the predecessor and brother of its present proprietor,
was allowed to have this claim, though it would exceed our
genealogical knowledge to point out the precise line by
which this descent was claimed. Young Roswell was of
respectable blood on both sides, without being very
brilliantly
connected, or rich. On the contrary, early left an
orphan, fatherless and motherless, as was the case with
Mary Pratt, he had been taken from a country academy
when only fifteen, and sent to sea, that he might make his
own way in the world. Hitherto, his success had not been
of a very flattering character. He had risen,
notwithstanding
,
to be the chief mate of a whaler, and bore an excellent
reputation among the people of Suffolk. Had it only been
a year or two later, when speculation took hold of the
whaling business in a larger way, he would not have had
the least difficulty in obtaining a ship. As it was, however,
great was his delight when Deacon Pratt engaged him as
master of the new schooner, which had been already
named the Sea Lion  or Sea Lyon, as Roswell
sometimes affected to spell the word, in honour of his old
progenitor, the engineer.
Mary Pratt had noted all these proceedings, partly with
pain, partly with pleasure, but always with great interest.
It pained her to find her uncle, in the decline of life,
engaging
in a business about which he knew nothing. It
pained her, still more, to see one whom she loved from
habit, if not from moral sympathies, wasting the few hours
that remained for preparing for the last great change, in
attempts to increase possessions that were already much
more than sufficient for his wants. This consideration, in
particular, deeply grieved Mary Pratt; for she was
profoundly
pious, with a conscience that was so sensitive as
materially to interfere with her happiness, as will presently
be shown, while her uncle was merely a deacon. It is one
thing to be a deacon, and another to be devoted to the love
of God, and to that love of our species which we are told
is the consequence of a love of the Deity. The two are not
incompatible; neither are they identical. This Mary had
been made to see, in spite of all her wishes to be blind as
respects the particular subject from whom she had learned
the unpleasant lesson. The pleasure felt by our heroine,
for such we now announce Mary Pratt to be, was derived
from the preferment bestowed on Roswell Gardiner. She
had many a palpitation of the heart when she heard of his
good conduct as a seaman, as she always did whenever she
heard his professional career alluded to at all. On this
point, Roswell was without spot, as all Suffolk knew and
confessed. On Oyster Pond, he was regarded as a species
of sea lion himself, so numerous and so exciting were the
incidents that were related of his prowess among the whales.
But, there was a dark cloud before all these glories, in the
eyes of Mary Pratt, which for two years had disinclined
her to listen to the young man's tale of love, which had
induced her to decline accepting a hand that had now been
offered to her, with a seaman's ardour, a seaman's
frankness
,
and a seaman's sincerity, some twenty times at least,
which had induced her to struggle severely with her own
heart, which she had long found to be a powerful ally of
her suitor. That cloud came from a species of infidelity
that is getting to be so widely spread in America as no
longer to work in secret, but which lifts its head boldly
among us, claiming openly to belong to one of the
numerous
sects of the land. Mary had reason to think that
Roswell
Gardiner denied the divinity of Christ, while he
professed
to honour and defer to him as a man far elevated
above all other men, and as one whose blood had purchased
the redemption of his race!
We will take this occasion to say that our legend is not
polemical in any sense, and that we have no intention to
enter into discussions or arguments connected with this
subject, beyond those that we may conceive to be
necessary
to illustrate the picture which it is our real aim to
draw  that of a confiding, affectionate, nay, devoted
woman's
heart, in conflict with a deep sense of religious
duty.
Still, Mary rejoiced that Roswell Gardiner was to
command
the Sea Lion. Whither this little vessel, a schooner
of about one hundred and forty tons measurement, was to
sail, she had not the slightest notion; but, go where it
might, her thoughts and prayers were certain to accompany
it. These are woman's means of exerting influence, and
who shall presume to say that they are without results, and
useless? On the contrary, we believe them to be most
efficacious; and thrice happy is the man who, as he treads
the mazes and wiles of the world, goes accompanied by
the petitions of such gentle and pure-minded beings at
home, as seldom think of approaching the throne of Grace
without also thinking of him and of his necessities. The
Romanists say, and say it rightly too, could one only
believe
in their efficacy, that the prayers they offer up in
behalf
3*
of departed friends, are of the most endearing nature;
but it would be difficult to prove that petitions for the souls
of the dead can demonstrate greater interest, or bind the
parties more closely together in the unity of love, than
those that are constantly offered up in behalf of the living.
The interest that Mary Pratt felt in Roswell's success
needs little explanation. In all things he was most
agreeable
to her, but in the one just mentioned. Their ages,
their social positions, their habits, their orphan condition,
even their prejudicesand who that dwells aside from the
world is without them, when most of those who encounter
its collisions still cherish them so strongly?all united to
render them of interest to each other. Nor was Deacon
Pratt at all opposed to the connection; on the contrary, he
appeared rather to favour it.
The objections came solely from Mary, whose heart was
nearly ready to break each time that she was required to
urge them. As for the uncle, it is not easy to say what
could induce him to acquiesce in, to favour indeed, the
addresses
to his niece and nearest relative, of one who was
known not to possess five hundred dollars in the world. As
his opinions on this subject were well known to all on
Oyster Pond, they had excited a good deal of speculation;
exercising the whole neighbourhood, as was very apt to
be the case whenever anything occurred in the least out
of the ordinary track. The several modes of reasoning
were something like these:
Some were of opinion that the deacon foresaw a
successful
career to, and eventual prosperity in the habits and
enterprise of, the young mate, and that he was willing to
commit to his keeping, not only his niece, but the three
farms, his money at use, and certain shares he was
known to own in a whaler and no less than three coasters,
as well as an interest in a store at Southold; that is to say,
to commit them all to the keeping of young Gar'ner when
he was himself dead; for no one believed he would part
with more than Mary, in his own lifetime.
Others fancied he was desirous of getting the orphan off
his hands, in the easiest possible way, that he might make
a bequest of his whole estate to the Theological Institution
that had been conquetting with him now, for several years,
through its recognised agents, and to which he had already
made the liberal donation of one hundred dollars. It was
well ascertained that the agents of that Institution openly
talked of getting Deacon Pratt to sit for his portrait, in
order
that it might be suspended among those of others of its
benefactors.
A third set reasoned differently from both the foregoing.
The Gar'ners were a better family than the Pratts, and
the deacon being so well to do, it was believed by these
persons that he was disposed to unite money with name,
and thus give to his family consideration, from a source
that was somewhat novel in its history. This class of
reasoners
was quite small, however, and mainly consisted of
those who had rarely been off of Oyster Pond, and who
passed their days with Gar'ner's Island directly before
their eyes. A few of the gossips of this class pretended to
say that their own young sailor stood next in succession
after the immediate family actually in possession should run
out, of which there was then some prospect; and that the
deacon, sly fellow, knew all about it! For this surmise,
to prevent useless expectations in the reader, it may be well
to say at once, there was no foundation whatever, Roswell's
connection with the owner of the island being much too
remote to give him any chance of succeeding to that estate,
or to anything else that belonged to him.
There was a fourth and last set, among those who
speculated
on the deacon's favour towards young Gar'ner,
and these were they who fancied that the old man had
opened his heart towards the young couple, and was
disposed
to render a deserving youth and a beloved niece
happy. This was the smallest class of all; and, what is a
little remarkable, it contained only the most reckless and
least virtuous of all those who dwelt on Oyster Pond. The
parson of the parish, or the Pastor as he was usually
termed
,
belonged to the second category, that good man being
firmly impressed that most, if not all of Deacon Pratt's
worldly effects would eventually go to help propagate the
gospel.
Such was the state of things when the deacon returned
from meeting, as related in the opening chapter. At his
niece's suggestion of sending to the Harbour for Dr. Sage,
he had demurred, not only on account of the expense, but
for a still more cogent reason. To tell the truth, he was
exceedingly distrustful of any one's being admitted to a
communication with Daggett, who had revealed to him
matters that he deemed to be of great importance, but who
still retained the key to his most material mystery.
Nevertheless
,
decency, to say nothing of the influence of what
folks would say, the Archimedean lever of all society of
puritanical origin, exhorted him to consent to his niece's
proposal.
It is such a round-about road to get to the Harbour,
Mary, the uncle slowly objected, after a pause.
Boats often go there, and return in a few hours.
Yes, yes
boats;
but I'm not certain it is lawful to
work boats of a Sabbath, child.
I believe, sir, it was deemed lawful to do good on the
Lord's day.
Yes, if a body was certain it
would
do any good. To
be sure, Sage is a capital doctoras good as any going in
these parts  but, half the time, money paid for doctor's
stuff is thrown away.
Still, I think it our duty to try to serve a
fellow-creature
that is in distress; and Daggett, I fear, will not go
through the week, if indeed he go through the night.
I should be sorry to have him die! exclaimed the
deacon, looking really distressed at this intelligence.
Right sorry should I be, to have him diejust yet.
The last two words were uttered unconsciously, and in
a way to cause the niece to regret that they had been
uttered
at all. But they had come, notwithstanding, and the
deacon saw that he had been too frank. The fault could
not now be remedied, and he was fain to allow his words
to produce their own effect.
Die he will, I fear, uncle, returned Mary, after a short
pause; and sorry should I be to have it so without our
feeling the consolation of knowing we had done all in our
power to save him, or to serve him.
It is so far to the Harbour, that no good might come
of a messenger; and the money paid
him
would be thrown
away, too.
I dare say Roswell Gar'ner would be glad to go to
help a fellow-creature who is suffering.
He
would not
think of demanding any pay.
Yes, that is true. I will say this for Gar'ner, that he
is as reasonable a young man, when he does an odd job, as
any one I know. I like to employ him.
Mary understood this very well. It amounted to neither
more nor less, than the deacon's perfect consciousness that
the youth had, again and again, given him his time and
his services gratuitously; and that too, more than once,
under circumstances when it would have been quite proper
that he should look for a remuneration. A slight colour
stole over the face of the niece, as memory recalled to her
mind these different occasions. Was that sensitive blush
owing to her perceiving the besetting weakness of one who
stood in the light of a parent to her, and towards whom
she endeavoured to feel the affection of a child? We shall
not gainsay this, so far as a portion of the feeling which
produced that blush was concerned; but, certain it is, that
the thought that Roswell had exerted himself to oblige
her
uncle, obtruded itself somewhat vividly among her other
recollections.
Well, sir, the niece resumed, after another brief
pause, we can send for Roswell, if you think it best, and
ask him to do the poor man this act of kindness.
Your messengers after doctors are always in such a
hurry! I dare say, Gar'ner would think it necessary to
hire a horse to cross Shelter Island, and then perhaps a
boat to get across to the Harbour. If no boat was to be
found, it might be another horse to gallop away round the
head of the Bay. Why, five dollars would scarce meet the
cost of such a race!
If five dollars were needed, Roswell would pay them
out of his own pocket, rather than ask another to assist
him in doing an act of charity. But, no horse will be
necessary
;
the whale-boat is at the wharf, and is ready for
use, at any moment.
True, I had forgotten the whale-boat. If that is home,
the doctor might be brought across at a reasonable rate;
especially if Gar'ner will volunteer. I dare say Daggett's
effects will pay the bill for attendance, since they have
answered
,
as yet, to meet the Widow White's charges. As
I live, here comes Gar'ner, at this moment, and just as we
want him.
I knew of no other to ask to cross the bays, sir, and
sent for Roswell before you returned. Had you not got
back, as you did, I should have taken on myself the duty
of sending for the doctor.
In which case, girl, you would have made yourself
liable. I have too many demands on my means, to be
scattering dollars broadcast. But, here is Gar'ner, and I
dare say all will be made right.
Gardiner now joined the uncle and niece, who had held
this conversation in the porch, having hastened up from
the schooner the instant he received Mary's summons. He
was rewarded by a kind look and a friendly shake of the
hand, each of which was slightly more cordial than those
that prudent and thoughtful young woman was accustomed
to bestow on him. He saw that Mary was a little earnest
in her manner, and looked curious, as well as interested,
to learn why he had been summoned at all. Sunday was
kept so rigidly at the deacon's, that the young man did not
dare visit the house until after the sun had set; the New
England practice of commencing the Sabbath of a
Saturday
evening, and bringing it to a close at the succeeding
sunset, prevailing among most of the people of Suffolk, the
Episcopalians forming nearly all the exceptions to the usage.
Sunday evening, consequently, was in great request for
visits, it being the favourite time for the young people to
meet, as they were not only certain to be unemployed, but
to be in their best. Roswell Gardiner was in the practice
of visiting Mary Pratt on Sunday evenings; but he would
almost as soon think of desecrating a church, as think of
entering the deacon's abode, on the Sabbath, until after
sunset, or sun
down
, to use the familiar Americanism
that is commonly applied to this hour of the day. Here
he was, now, however, wondering, and anxious to learn
why he had been sent for.
Roswell, said Mary, earnestly, slightly colouring again
as she spoke, we have a great favour to ask. You know
the poor old sailor who has been staying at the Widow
White's, this month or morehe is now very low; so low,
we think he ought to have better advice than can be found
on Oyster Pond, and we wish to get Dr. Sage over from
the Harbour. How to do it has been the question, when
I thought of you. If you could take the whale-boat and
go across, the poor man might have the benefit of the
doctor's
advice in the course of a few hours.
Yes, put in the uncle, and I shall charge nothing
for the use of the boat; so that, if
you
volunteer, Gar'ner,
it will leave so much towards settling up the man's
accounts
,
when settling day comes.
Roswell Gardiner understood both uncle and niece
perfectly
.
The intense selfishness of the first was no more a
secret to him than was the entire disinterestedness of the
last. He gazed a moment, in fervent admiration, at Mary;
then he turned to the deacon, and professed his readiness
to volunteer. Knowing the man so well, he took care
distinctly to express the word, so as to put the mind of this
votary of Mammon at ease.
Gar'ner will
volunteer
, then, rejoined the uncle, and
I shall charge nothing for the use of the boat. This is
`doing as we would be done by,' and is all right,
considering
that Daggett is sick and among strangers. The wind
is fair, or nearly fair, to go and to come back, and you'll
make a short trip of it. Yes, it will cost nothing, and may
do the poor man good.
Now, go at once, Roswell, said Mary, in an
entreating
manner; and show the same skill in managing the
boat that you did the day you won the race against the
Harbour oarsmen.
I will do all a man can, to oblige you, Mary, as well
as to serve the sick. If Dr. Sage should not be at home,
am I to look for another physician, Mr. Pratt?
Sage
must
be at homewe can employ no other. Your
old, long-established physicians understand how to consider
practice, and don't make mistakesby the way, Gar'ner,
you needn't mention
my
name in the business, at all. Just
say that a sick man, at the Widow White's, needs his
services
,
and that you had
volunteered
to take him across.
That
will bring himI know the man.
Again Gardiner understood what the deacon meant.
He was just as desirous of not paying the physician as of
not paying the messenger. Mary understood him, too;
and, with a face still more sad than anxiety had previously
made it, she walked into the house, leaving her uncle and
lover in the porch. After a few more injunctions from the
former, in the way of prudent precaution, the latter
departed
,
hurrying down to the water-side, in order to take
to the boat.
CHAPTER III.
All that glisters is not gold,
Often have you heard that told;
Many a man his life hath sold,
But my outside to behold.
Merchant of Venice
.
No sooner was Deacon Pratt left alone, than he hastened
to the humble dwelling of the Widow White. The disease
of Daggett was a general decay that was not attended with
much suffering. He was now seated in a homely
arm-chair
,
and was able to converse. He was not aware,
indeed
,
of the real danger of his case, and still had hopes of
surviving many years. The deacon came in at the door,
just as the widow had passed through it, on her way to
visit another crone, who lived hard by, and with whom she
was in the constant habit of consulting. She had seen the
deacon in the distance, and took that occasion to run across
the road, having a sort of instinctive notion that her
presence
was not required when the two men conferred
together
.
What was the subject of their frequent private
communications, the Widow White did not exactly know;
but what she imagined, will in part appear in her discourse
with her neighbour, the Widow Stone.
Here's the deacon, ag'in! cried the Widow White,
as she bolted hurriedly into her friend's presence. This
makes the third time he has been at
my
house since
yesterday
morning. What
can
he mean?
Oh! I dare say, Betsy, he means no more than to
visit the sick, as he pretends is the reason of his many
visits.
You forget it is Sabba' day! added the Widow White,
with emphasis.
The better day, the better deed, Betsy.
I know that; but it's dreadful often for a
man
to visit
the sickthree times in twenty-four hours!
Yes; 't would have been more nat'ral for a woman, a
body must own, returned the Widow Stone, a little drily.
Had the deacon been a woman, I dare say, Betsy, you
would not have thought so much of his visits.
I should think nothing of them at all, rejoined the
sister widow, innocently enough. But it is dreadful odd
in a
man
to be visiting about among the sick so much
and he a deacon of the meeting!
Yes, it is not as common as it might be, particularly
among deacons. But, come in, Betsy, and I will show
you the text from which minister preached this morning.
It's well worth attending to, for it touches on our forlorn
state. Hereupon, the two relicts entered an inner room,
where we shall leave them to discuss the merits of the ser
mon, interrupted by many protestations on the part of the
Widow White, concerning the dreadful character of
Deacon Pratt's many visits to
her
cottage, Sabba' days
as well as week days.
In the meanwhile, the interview between the deacon,
himself, and the sick mariner, had its course. After the
first salutations, and the usual inquiries, the visiter, with
some parade of manner, alluded to the fact that he had
sent for a physician for the other's benefit.
I did it of my own head, added the deacon; or, I
might better say, of my own heart. It was unpleasant to
me to witness your sufferings, without doing something to
alleviate them. To alleviate sorrow, and pain, and the
throes of conscience, is one of the most pleasant of all the
Christian offices. Yes, I have sent young Gar'ner across
the bays, to the Harbour; and three or four hours hence
we may look for him back, with Dr. Sage in his boat.
I only hope I shall have the means to pay for all this
expense and trouble, deacon, returned Daggett, in a sort
of doubting way, that, for a moment, rendered his friend
exceedingly uncomfortable. Go, I know I must, sooner
or later; but could I only live to get to the Vineyard,
Vol. I.  4
't would be found that my share of the old homestead would
make up for all my wants. I
may
live to see the end of
the other business.
Among the other tales of Daggett, was one which said
that he had never yet received his share of his father's
property
;
an account that was true enough, though the truth
might have shown that the old man had left nothing worth
dividing. He had been a common mariner, like the son,
and had left behind him a common mariner's estate. The
deacon mused a moment, and then he took an occasion to
advert to the subject that had now been uppermost in his
thoughts ever since he had been in the habit of holding
secret conferences with the sick man. What that subject
was, will appear in the course of the conversation that
ensued.
Have you thought of the chart, Daggett, asked the
deacon, and given an eye to that journal?
Both, sir. Your kindness to me has been so great, that
I am not a man apt to forget it.
I wish you would show me, yourself, the precise places
on the chart, where them islands are to be found. There
is nothing like seeing a thing with one's own eyes.
You forget my oath, deacon Pratt. Every man on us
took his bible oath not to point out the position of the
islands, until a'ter the year 1820. Then, each and all on
us is at liberty to do as he pleases. But, the chart is in
my chest, and not only the islands, but the key, is so plainly
laid down, that any mariner could find 'em. With that
chest, however, I cannot part so long as I live. Get me
well, and I will sail in the Sea Lion, and tell your captain
Gar'ner all he will have occasion to know. The man's
fortune will be made who first gets to either of them places.
Yes, I can imagine that, easy enough, from your
accounts
,
Daggett  but, how am I to be certain that some
other vessel will not get the start of me?
Because the secret is now my own. There was but
seven on us, in that brig, all told. Of them seven, four
died at the islands of the fever, homeward bound; and of
the other three, the captain was drowned in the squall I
told you of, when he was washed overboard. That left
only Jack Thompson and me; and Jack, I think, must be
the very man whose death I see'd, six months since, as
being
killed by a whale on the False Banks.
Jack Thompson is so common a name, a body never
knows. Besides, if he was killed by that whale, he may
have told the secret to a dozen before the accident.
There's his oath ag'in it. Jack was sworn, as well as
all on us, and he was a man likely to stand by what he
swore to. This was none of your custom-house oaths, of
which a chap might take a dozen of a morning, and all
should be false; but it was an oath that put a seaman on
his honour, since it was a good-fellowship affair, all round.
Deacon Pratt did not
tell
Daggett that Thompson might
have as good reasons for disregarding the oath as he had
himself; but he
thought
it. These are things that no wise
man utters on such occasions; and this opinion touching
the equality of the obligation of that oath was one of them.
There is another hold upon Jack, continued Daggett,
after reflecting a moment. He never could make any
fist of latitude and longitude at all, and he kept no journal.
Now, should he get it wrong, he and his friends might
hunt a year without finding either of the places.
You think there was no mistake in the pirate's account
of that key, and of the buried treasure? asked the deacon,
anxiously.
I would swear to the truth of what
he
said, as freely as
if I had seen the box myself. They was necessitated, as
you may suppose, or they never would have left so much
gold, in sich an uninhabited place; but leave it they did,
on the word of a dying man.
Dying?You mean the pirate, I suppose?
To be sure I do. We was shut up in the same prison,
and we talked the matter over at least twenty times, before
he was swung off. When they was satisfied I had nothing
to do with the pirates, I was cleared; and I was on my way
to the Vineyard, to get some craft or other, to go a'ter
these two treasures (for one is just as much a treasure as
t'other) when I was put ashore here. It's much the same
to me, whether the craft sails from Oyster Pond or from
the Vineyard.
Of course. Well, as much to oblige you, and to put
your mind at rest, as anything else, I've bought this Sea
Lion, and engaged young Roswell Gar'ner to go out in her,
as her master. She'll be ready to sail in a fortnight, and,
if things turn out as you say, a good voyage will she make.
All interested in her will have reason to rejoice. I see but
one thing needful just now, and that is that you should give
me the chart at once, in order that I may study it well,
before
the schooner sails.
Do you mean to make the v'y'ge yourself, deacon?
asked Daggett, in some surprise.
Not in person, certainly, was the answer. I'm
getting somewhat too old to leave home for so long a time;
and, though born and brought up in sight of salt-water,
I've never tried it beyond a trip to York, or one to Boston.
Still, I shall have my property in the adventure, and it's
nat'ral to keep an eye on
that
. Now, the chart well studied
before-hand would be much more useful, it seems to me,
than it can possibly be, if taken up at a late hour.
There will be time enough for captain Gar'ner to
overhaul
his chart well, afore he reaches either of his ports,
returned the mariner, evasively. If I sail with him, as I
suppose I
must
, nothing will be easier than for me to give
all the courses and distances.
This reply produced a long and brooding silence. By
this time, the reader will have got a clue to the nature of
the secret that was discussed so much, and so often,
between
these two men. Daggett, finding himself sick, poor,
and friendless, among strangers, had early cast about him
for the means of obtaining an interest with those who
might serve him. He had soon got an insight into the
character of Deacon Pratt, from the passing remarks of the
Widow White, who was induced to allude to the uncle, in
consequence of the charitable visits of the niece. One day,
when matters appeared to be at a very low ebb with him,
and shortly after he had been put ashore, the sick mariner
requested an interview with the deacon himself. The
request
had been reluctantly granted; but, during the visit,
Daggett had managed so well to whet his visiter's appetite
for gain, that henceforth there was no trouble in procuring
the deacon's company. Little by little had Daggett let out
his facts, always keeping enough in reserve to render
himself
necessary, until he had got his new acquaintance in
the highest state of feverish excitement. The schooner
was purchased, and all the arrangements necessary to her
outfit were pressed forward as fast as prudence would at
all allow. The chart, and the latitude and longitude, were
the circumstances over which Daggett retained the control.
These he kept to himself, though he averred that he had
laid down on the charts that were in his chest the two
important
points which had been the subjects of his
communications
.
Although this man had been wily in making his
revelations
;
and had chosen his confidant with caution and
sagacity
,
most of that which he related was true. He had
belonged to a sealer that had been in a very high southern
latitude, where it had made some very important
discoveries
,
touching the animals that formed the objects of its
search. It was possible to fill a vessel in those islands in a
few weeks; and the master of the sealer, Daggett having
been his mate, had made all his people swear on their
bible oaths not to reveal the facts, except under
prescribed
circumstances. His own vessel was full when he
made the discoveries, but misfortune befel her on her
homeward-bound passage, until she was herself totally lost
in the West Indies, and that in a part of the ocean where
she had no business to be.
In consequence of these several calamities, Daggett and
one more man were the sole living depositories of the
important
information. These men separated, and, as stated,
Daggett had reason to think that his former shipmate had
been recently killed by a whale. The life and movements
of a sailor are usually as eccentric as the career of a comet.
After the loss of the sealing-vessel, Daggett remained in the
West Indies and on the Spanish Main for some time, until
falling into evil company he was imprisoned on a charge
of piracy, in company with one who better deserved the
imputation. While in the same cell, the pirate had made a
relation to Daggett of all the incidents of a very eventful
life. Among other things revealed was the fact that, on a
certain occasion, he and two others had deposited a very
considerable amount of treasure on a key that he described
very minutely, and which he now bestowed on Daggett as
some compensation for his present unmerited sufferings,
4*
his companions having both been drowned by the upsetting
of their boat on the return from the key in question.
Subsequently
,
this pirate had been executed, and Daggett
liberated. He was not able to get to the key without
making friends and confidants on whom he could rely, and
he was actually making the best of his way to Martha's
Vineyard with that intent, when put ashore on Oyster
Pond. In most of that which this man had related to the
deacon, therefore, he had told the truth, though it was the
truth embellished, as is so apt to be the case with men of
vulgar minds. He might have been misled by the narrative
of the pirate, but it was his own opinion that he had not
been. The man was a Scot, prudent, wary, and sagacious;
and in the revelations he made he appeared to be governed
by a conviction that his own course was run, and that it
was best that his secret should not die with him. Daggett
had rendered him certain services, too, and gratitude might
have had some influence.
My mind has been much exercised with this matter of
the hidden gold, resumed the deacon, after the long pause
already mentioned. You will remember that there may
be lawful owners of that money, should Gar'ner even
succeed
in finding it.
'T would be hard for 'em to prove their claims, sir, if
what McGosh told me was true. Accordin' to his account,
the gold came from all sidesstarboard and larboard, as a
body might sayand it was jumbled together, and so mixed,
that a young girl could not pick out her lover's keepsake
from among the other pieces. 'T was the 'arnin's of three
years cruisin', as I understood him to say; and much of the
stuff had been exchanged in port, especially to get the
custom-house
officers and king's officers out of its wake.
There's king's officers among them bloody Spaniards,
Deacon Pratt, all the same as among the English.
Be temperate in your language, friend; a rough speech
is unseemly, particularly of the Lord's day.
Daggett rolled the tobacco over his tongue, and his eyes
twinkled with a sort of leer, which indicated that the fellow
was not without some humour. He submitted patiently to
the rebuke, however, making no remonstrance against its
reception.
No, no, he added presently, a starn chase, they say,
is a long chase; and the owners of them doubloons, if
owners they can now be called, must be out of sight, long
before this. Accordin' to McGosh, some of the gold r'aally
captured had passed back through the hands of them that
sent it to sea, and they did not know their own children!
It is certainly hard to identify coin, and it would be a
bold man who should stand up, in open court, and make
oath to its being the same he had once held. I have heard
of the same gold's having answered the purposes of twenty
banks, one piece being so like another.
Ay, ay, sir, gold is gold; and any of it is good enough
for me, though doubloons is my favour
ites
. When a fellow
has got half-a-dozen doubloons alongside of his ribs, he can
look the landlord full in the eye; and no one thinks of
saying to sich as he, `it's time to think of shipping ag'in.'
From the nature of this discourse, it will not be easy for
the reader to imagine the real condition of Daggett. At
the very moment he was thus conversing of money, and
incidentally manifesting his expectations of accompanying
Roswell Gardiner in the expedition that was about to sail,
the man had not actually four-and-twenty hours of life in
him. Mary Pratt had foreseen his true state, accustomed
as she was to administer to the wants of the dying; but
no one else appeared to be aware of it, not even the deacon.
It was true that the fellow spoke, as it might be, from his
throat only, and that his voice was hollow, and sometimes
reduced to a whisper; but he ascribed this, himself, to the
circumstance that he had taken a cold. Whether the
deacon
believed this account or not, it might be difficult to
say; but he appeared to give it full credit. Perhaps his
mind was so much occupied with the subject of his
discussions
with Daggett, that it did not sufficiently advert to the
real condition of the man.
Twice, that afternoon, did Deacon Pratt go between the
cottage of the Widow White and his own dwelling. As often
did the relict fly across the way to express her wonder to
the Widow Stone, at the frequency of the rich man's visits.
The second time that he came was when he saw the
whale-boat
rounding the end of Shelter Island, and he perceived,
by means of his glass, that Dr. Sage was in it. At this
sight the deacon hurried off to the cottage again, having
something to say to Daggett that could no longer be
delayed
.
The whale-boat will soon be in, he observed, as soon
as he had taken his seat, and we shall shortly have the
doctor here. That young Gar'ner does what he has to do,
always, with a jerk! There was no such haste, but he
seems to be ever in a hurry!
Do what is to be done at once, and then lie by, is the
sailor's rule, deacon, rejoined the mariner. Squalls,
and gusts, and reefin', and brailin' up, and haulin' down,
won't wait for the seaman's leisure.
His
work must be
done at once, or it will not be done at all. I'm not afeard
of the doctor; so let him come as soon as he pleases.
Medicine
can't hurt a body, if he don't take it.
There's one thing I wish to say to you, Daggett,
before
Dr. Sage comes in. Talking too much may excite
you, especially talking of matters that are of interest; and
you may give him a false impression of your state, should
you get the pulse up, and the cheek flushed, by
over-talking
.
I understand you, deacon. My secret is my secret,
and no doctor shall get it out of me as long as I know what
I say. I'm not so friendly with them, as to seek counsel
among doctors.
Then it's the Lord's day, added the Pharisee, and it is not seemly to dwell too much on worldly interests, on the Sabbath.
A novice might have been surprised, after what had
passed, at the exceeding coolness with which the deacon
uttered
this sentiment. Daggett was not so in the least,
however
;
for he had taken the measure of his new confidant's
conscience, and had lived long enough to know how marked
was the difference between professions and practice.
Nothing
,
indeed, is more common than to meet with those
who denounce that in others, which is of constant
occurrence
with themselves; and who rail at vices that are so
interwoven with their own moral being, as to compose
integral
portions of their existence. As for the deacon, he
really thought it would be unseemly, and of evil example,
for Daggett to converse with Dr. Sage, touching these
doubloons, of the Lord's day; while he had felt no
scruples
himself, a short hour before, to make them the theme
of a long and interesting discussion, in his own person.
It might not repay us for the trouble, to look for the salve
that the worthy man applied to his own conscience, by way
of reconciling the apparent contradiction; though it
probably
was connected with some fancied and especial duty
on his part, of taking care of the sick man's secrets.
Sickness
,
it is well known, forms the apology for many an error,
both of omission and commission.
Dr. Sage now arrived; a shrewd, observant, intelligent
man, who nad formerly represented the district in which
he lived, in Congress. He was skilful in his profession,
and soon made up his mind concerning the state of his
patient. As the deacon never left him for a moment, to
him he first communicated his opinion, after the visit, as
the two walked back towards the well-known dwelling of
the Pratts.
This poor man is in the last stages of a decline, said
the physician, coolly, and medicine can do him no good.
He
may
live a month; though it would not surprise me to
hear of his death in an hour.
Do you think his time so short! exclaimed the deacon.
I was in hopes he might last until the Sea Lion goes out,
and that a voyage might help to set him up.
Nothing will ever set him up again, deacon, you may
depend on that. No sea-voyage will do him any good;
and it is better that he should remain on shore, on account
of the greater comforts he will get. Does he belong on
Oyster Pond?
He comes from somewhere east, answered the
deacon
,
careful not to let the doctor know the place whence
the stranger had come, though to little purpose, as will
presently be seen. He has neither friend nor
acquaintance
,
here; though I should think his effects sufficient to
meet all charges.
Should they not be, he is welcome to my visit,
answered
the doctor, promptly; for he well understood the
deacon's motive in making the remark. I have enjoyed
a pleasant sail across the bays with young Gar'ner, who
has promised to take me back again. I like boating,
and am always better for one of these sailing excursions.
Could I carry my patients along, half of them would be
benefited by the pure air and the exercise.
It's a grateful thing to meet with one of your
temperament
,
doctorbut Daggett
Is this man named Daggett? interrupted the physician.
I
believe
that is what he calls himself, though a body
never is certain of what such people say.
That's true, deacon; your rambling, houseless sailor
is commonly a great liarat least so have I always found
him. Most of their log-books will not do to read; or, for
that matter, to be written out, in full. But if this man's
name is really Daggett, he must come from the Vineyard.
There are Daggetts there in scores; yes, he must be a
Vineyard man.
There are Daggetts in Connecticut, as I know, of a
certainty
We all know that, for it is a name of weight there;
but the Vineyard is the cradle of the breed. The man has
a Vineyard look about him, too. I dare say, now, he has
not been home for many a day.
The deacon was in an agony. He was menaced with
the very thing he was in the hope of staving off, or a
discussion
on the subject of the sick man's previous life.
The doctor was so mercurial and quick of apprehension,
that, once fairly on the scent, he was nearly certain he
would extract every thing from the patient. This was the
principal reason why the deacon did not wish to send for
him; the expense, though a serious objection to one so
niggardly, being of secondary consideration when so many
doubloons were at state. It was necessary, however, to
talk on boldly, as any appearance of hesitation might
excite
the doctor's distrust. The answers, therefore, came
instantaneously.
It may be as you say, doctor, returned the deacon;
for them Vineyard folks (Anglic folk) are great
wanderers
.
That are they I had occasion to pass a day there, a
few years since, on my way to Boston, and I found five
women on the island to one man. It must be a
particularly
conscientious person who could pass a week there,
and escape committing the crime of bigamy. As for your
bachelors, I have heard that a poor wretch of that
description
,
who unluckily found himself cast ashore there, was
married three times the same morning.
As the doctor was a little of a wag, deacon Pratt did not
deem it necessary religiously to believe all that now escaped
him; but he was glad to keep him in this vein, in order to
prevent his getting again on the track of Daggett's early
life. The device succeeded, Martha's Vineyard being a
standing joke for all in that quarter of the world, on the
subject of the ladies.
Mary was in the porch to receive her uncle and the
physician. It was unnecessary for her to ask any questions, for her speaking countenance said all that was required, in
order to obtain an answer.
He's in a bad way, certainly, young lady, observed
the doctor, taking a seat on one of the benches, and I
can give no hope. How long he may live, is another
matter
.
If he has friends whom he wishes to see, or if he has
any affairs to settle, the truth should be told him at once,
and no time lost.
He knows nothing of his friends, interrupted the
deacon, quite thrown off his guard by his own eagerness,
and unconscious, at the moment, of the manner in which
he was committing himself on the subject of a knowledge
of the sick man's birth-place, not having been on the
Vineyard, or heard from there, since he first left home,
quite fifty years since.
The doctor saw the contradiction, and it set him
thinking
,
and conjecturing, but he was too discreet to betray
himself. An explanation there probably was, and he trusted
to time to ascertain it.
What has become of captain Gar'ner? he asked,
looking
curiously around, as if he expected to find him tied to
the niece's apron-string.
Mary blushed, but she was too innocent to betray any
real confusion.
He has gone back to the schooner, in order to have the
boat ready for your return.
And that return must take place, young lady, as soon
as I have drunk two cups of your tea. I have patients at
the Harbour who must yet be visited this evening, and the
wind goes down with the sun. Let the poor man take the
draughts I have left for him  they will soothe him, and
help his breathingmore than this my skill can do nothing
for him. Deacon, you need say nothing of this visitI
am sufficiently repaid by the air, the sail, and Miss Mary's
welcome. I perceive that she is glad to see me, and that
is something, between so young a woman and so old a
man. And now for the two cups of tea.
The tea was drunk, and the doctor took his leave,
shaking his head as he repeated to the niece, that the
medical science could do nothing for the sick man.
Let his friends know his situation at once, deacon,
he said, as they walked towards the wharf, where the
whale-boat was all ready for a start. There is not an
hour to lose. Now I think of it, the Flash, captain Smith,
is to take a cargo of oil to Boston, and sails to-morrow. I
can write a line by her, as it is ten to one she will go into
the Hole. All our craft get into that Hole, or into
Tarpaulin
Cove, before they venture across the Shoals; and a
letter addressed to any person of the name of Daggett
might find the right man. I'll write it this very evening.
The announcement of this intention threw the deacon
into a cold-sweat, but he did not think it prudent to say
aught against it. He had bought the Sea Lion, engaged
Roswell Gardiner, and otherwise expended a large sum of
money, in the expectation of handling those doubloons, to
say nothing of the furs; and here was a chance of all his
calculations being defeated by the interference of
impertinent
and greedy relatives! There was no remedy but
patience
,
and this the deacon endeavoured to exercise.
Deacon Pratt did not accompany the doctor beyond the
limits of his own orchard. It was not deemed seemly for a
member of the meeting to be seen walking out on the
Sabbath
,
and this was remembered in season to prevent
neighbourly
comments. It is true, the
doctor
might furnish an
apology; but, your strictly religious people, when they
undertake
the care of other people's consciences, do not often
descend to these particulars.
No sooner had Gardiner and the physician re-embarked,
than the deacon returned to the cottage of the Widow
White. Here he had another long and searching discourse
with the sick mariner. Poor Daggett was wearied with
the subject; but Dr. Sage's predictions of an early
termination
of the case, and the possibility that kinsmen might
cross over from the `Vineyard,' in order to learn what the
long absent man had in his possession, acted on him as
keen incentives. By learning the most material facts now,
the Sea Lion might get so far ahead of all competitors as
to secure the prizes, even should Daggett let others into
the secret, and start another vessel on the same expedition.
His own schooner was nearly ready for sea, whereas time
would be needed in order to make an entire outfit.
But Daggett did not appear to be disposed to be more
communicative than heretofore. He went over the
narrative
of the discovery of the sealing-island, and gave a
graphic
account of the number and tame condition of the
animals who frequented it. A man might walk in their
midst without giving the smallest alarm. In a word, all
that a gang of good hands would have to do, would be to
kill, and skin, and secure the oil. It would be like
picking
up dollars on a sea-beach. Sadly! sadly! indeed, was
the deacon's cupidity excited by this account; a vivid
picture
of whales, or seals, having some such effect on the
imagination of a true Suffolk county man, or more
properly
on that of an East-ender, as those who live beyond
Riverhead are termed, as a glowing account of a prairie
covered with wheat has on that of a Wolverine or a
Buckeye
;
or an enumeration of cent per cent. has on the
feelings
of a Wall-street broker. Never before had Deacon
Pratt been so much exercised with a love of Mammon.
The pirate's tale, which was also recapitulated with much
gusto, scarce excited him as much as Daggett's glowing
account of the number, condition, and size of the seals.
Nothing was withheld but the latitudes and longitudes.
No art of the deacon's, and he practised many, could
extort
from the mariner these most material facts, without
which all the rest were useless; and the old man worked
himself into a fever almost as high as that which soon
came over Daggett, in the effort to come at these factsbut
all in vain.
At that hour the pulse of the sick man usually
quickened
;
Vol. I.  5
but, on this occasion, it fairly thumped. He had
excited himself, as well as his listener; and the
inconsiderate
manner in which both had yielded up their energies
to these enticing images of wealth, contributed largely to
increase the evil. At length, exhaustion came to put an
end to the scene, which was getting to be dramatic as well
as revolting.
So conscious was the deacon, on returning home that
evening, that his mind was not in such a condition as it
behoved him to keep it in on the Lord's Day, that he was
afraid to encounter the placid eye of his devout and
single-minded
niece. Instead of joining her, and uniting in the
services that were customary at that hour, he walked in
the adjoining orchard until near nine o'clock. Mammon
was uppermost in the place of the Deity, and habit offered
too strong a barrier to permit him to bring, as it were, the
false god openly into the presence of the true.
CHAPTER IV.
Oh! mourn not for them, their grief is o'er,
Oh! weep not for them, they weep no more;
For deep is their sleep, though cold and hard
Their pillow may be in the old kirk-yard.
Bayly
.
Early
on the succeeding morning, the whole household
of deacon Pratt, himself included, were up and doing. It
was as the sun came up out of the waters that Mary and
her uncle met in the porch, as if to greet each other.
Yonder comes the Widow White, and seemingly in a
great hurry, said the niece, anxiously; I am afraid her
patient is worse!
He seemed better when I left him last evening, though
a little tired with talking, returned the uncle. The man
would
talk, do all I could to stop him. I wanted to get
but two or three words from him, and he used a thousand,
without once using the few I wished most to hear. A
talking
man is that Daggett, I can tell you, Mary!
He'll never talk ag'in, deacon! exclaimed the Widow
White, who had got so near as to hear the concluding
words of the last speakerHe'll never say good or evil
more!
The deacon was so confounded as to be speechless. As
for Mary, she expressed her deep regrets that the summons
should have been so sudden, and that the previous
preparation
was so small; matters that gave her far more concern
than any other consideration. They were not long left to
conjectures, the voluble widow soon supplying all the facts
that had occurred. It appeared that Daggett died in the
night, the widow having found him stiff and cold on
visiting
his bed-side a few minutes before. That this somewhat
unexpected event, as to the time at least, was hastened by
the excitement of the conversation mentioned, there can
be little doubt, though no comment was made on the
circumstance
.
The immediate cause of death was suffocation
from the effects of suppuration, as so often occurs in rapid
consumption.
It would be representing deacon Pratt as a worse man
than he actually was, to say that this sudden death had no
effect on his feelings. For a short time it brought him
back to a sense of his own age, and condition, and
prospects
.
For half an hour these considerations troubled him,
but the power of Mammon gradually resumed its sway, and
the unpleasant images slowly disappeared in others that he
found more agreeable. Then he began seriously to bethink
him of what the circumstances required to be done.
As there was nothing unusual in the death of Daggett,
the investigations of the coroner were not required. It
was clearly a natural, though a sudden death. It remained,
therefore, only to give directions about the funeral, and to
have an eye to the safe-keeping of the effects of the
deceased
.
The deacon assumed the duty of taking charge
of everything. The chest of Daggett was removed to his
house for safe-keeping, the key having been taken from the
pocket of his vest, and the necessary orders were given for
the final disposition of the body.
The deacon had another serious, and even painful
half-hour
,
when he first looked upon the corpse. There it lay,
a senseless shell, deserted by its immortal tenant, and
totally
unconscious of that subject which had so lately and
so intensely interested them both. It appeared as if the
ghastly countenance expressed its sense of the utter
worthlessness
of all earthly schemes of wealth and happiness.
Eternity seemed stamped upon the pinched and sunken
features; not eternity in the sense of imperishable matter,
but in the sense of the fate of man. Had all the gold of
the Indies lain within his reach, the arm of Daggett was
now powerless to touch it. His eye could no longer gloat
upon treasure, nor any part of his corporeal system profit
by its possession. A more striking commentary on the
vanity of human wishes could not, just then, have been
offered to the consideration of the deacon. His moral
being was very strangely constituted. From early childhood
he had been accustomed to the cant of religion; and, in
many instances, impressions had been made on him that
produced effects that it was easy to confound with the
fruits that real piety brings forth. This is a result that we
often find in a state of society in which appearances are
made to take the place of reality. What is more, it is a
result that we may look for equally among the formalists
of established sects, and among the descendants of those
who once deserted the homes of their fathers in order to
escape from the impiety of so meretricious an abuse of the
substance of godliness. In the case of the latter,
appearances
occupy the mind more than that love of God which
is the one great test of human conversion from sin to an
improving state of that holiness, without which we are told
no man shall see his Creator; without which, indeed, no
man could endure to look upon that dread Being face to
face.
The deacon had all the forms of godliness in puritanical
perfection. He had never taken the name of his God in
vain, throughout the course of a long life; but, he had
abstained from this revolting and gratuitous sin, more
because
it was a part of the teachings of his youth so to do,
and because the neighbours would have been shocked at
its commission, than because he felt the deep reverence for
his Marker, which it became the insignificant being that
was the work of his hand to entertain; and which would,
of itself, most effectually have prevented any wanton use
of his holy name, let the neighbours feel or think as they
might on the subject. In this way Deacon Pratt might be
said to have respected most of the commands of the
decalogue
;
not, however, because the spirit of God impelled
him, through love, to reverence and obey, but because he
had been brought up in a part of the country where it was
considered seemly and right to be moral, to the senses, at
least, if not to the all-seeing eye above. It was in this way
that the deacon had arrived at his preferment in the
meeting
.
He had all the usual sectarian terms at the end of
his tongue; never uttered a careless expression; was
regular
at meeting; apparently performed all the duties that his
church required of its professors, in the way of mere
religious
observances; yet was he as far from being in that
state which St. Paul has described succinctly as for me
to live in Christ, and to die is gain, as if he had been a
pagan. It was not the love of God that was active in his
soul, but the love of self; and he happened to exhibit his
passion under these restrained and deceptive forms, simply
because he had been born and educated in a state of
society
where they composed an integral part of existence.
Covetousness was the deacon's besetting sin; and, as it is
a vice that may be pretty well concealed, with a little
attention
to appearances, it was the less likely to expose him
to comments than almost any other sin. It is true, that
the neighbourhood sometimes fancied him `close,' or, as
they expressed it, cluss, and men got to look sharply to
their own interests in their dealings with him; but, on the
whole, there was perhaps more reason to apprehend, in
such a community, that the example of so good a man
should be accepted as authority, than that his acts should
impeach his character, or endanger his standing.
Very different were the situation, feelings, and motives
of the niece. She devoutly loved God, and, as a
consequence
,
all of those whom he had created, and placed
around her. Her meek and gentle spirit led her to
worship
in sincerity and truth; and all that she thought, said,
and did, was under the correction of the principles such
motives could best produce. Her woman's love for
Roswell
5*
Gardiner alone troubled her otherwise happy and
peaceful existence. That, indeed, had caused her more
than once to falter in her way; but she struggled with the
weakness, and had strong hopes of being able to overcome
it. To accept of any other man as a husband, was, in her
eyes, impossible; with the feelings she was fully conscious
of entertaining towards him, it would have been both
indelicate
and unjust: but, to accept
him
, while he regarded
the Redeemer as only man, however pure and exalted, she
felt would be putting herself willingly, or wilfully, into the
hands of the great enemy of her salvation. Often and often
had she prayed for her lover, even more devoutly, and with
hotter tears, than she had ever prayed for herself; but, so
far as she could discover, without any visible fruits. His
opinions remained unchanged, and his frank nature forbade
him from concealing their state from Mary. In this way,
then, was unhappiness stealing on the early and innocent
hours of one who might, otherwise, have been so contented
and blessed. It formed a somewhat peculiar feature in
her case, that her uncle favoured the views of her suitor.
This rendered the trials of the niece so much the more
severe, as she had no other judgment to sustain her than
her own, fortified as that was, however, by the
consciousness
of right, and the support of that great power which
never deserts the faithful.
Such was the state of feeling among some of the
principal
actors of our tale, when the sudden death of Daggett
occurred. The body was not removed from the house of
the Widow White, but the next morning it was conveyed
to the grave-yard`church-yard' would have sounded
too episcopaland interred in a corner that was bestowed
on the unhonoured and unknown. It was then, only, that
the deacon believed he was the sole depository of the
important
secrets. He had the charts in his possession, and
no more revelations could pass the lips of Daggett. Should
the friends of the deceased sailor hear of his death, and
come to look after his effects, there was very little
probability
of their finding anything among them to furnish a
clue to either the new sealing-ground, or to the buried
treasure of the pirate. In order to be secured, he even
went a little beyond his usual precautions, actually
discharging
all indebtedness of the deceased to the Widow
White out of his own pocket, by giving to her the sum of
ten dollars. This was handsome compensation in her eyes
as well as in his, and he quieted the suspicions so great
and unusual an act of liberality would be apt to awaken,
by saying, he would look to the friends, or if they failed
him, to the effects, for his returns; for it was better he
should lose by the stranger, than a lone widow. He also
paid for the coffin, the digging of the grave, and the other
light expenses of the interment. In a word, the deacon
endeavoured to hush all impertinent inquiries by applying
the salve of silver, wherever it was needed.
The chest had been removed to a large, light closet, that
communicated with the deacon's own room. When all
his accounts were settled, thither he repaired, armed with
the key that was to expose so much treasure to his longing
eyes. Some slight qualms arose, after he had locked
himself
in the room, touching the propriety of his opening the
chest. It was not his, certainly; but he put such a
construction
on the nature of the revelations of Daggett, as he
thought would fully justify him in proceeding. He had
purchased the schooner expressly to go in quest of the
seals and the treasure. This he had done with Daggett's
knowledge and acquiescence; nor did he conceive that his
own rights were lessened by the mariner's decease. As
for himself, the deacon had never believed that the
Martha's
Vineyard man could accompany the expedition, so
that his presence or absence could have no influence on
his own rights. It is true, the deacon possessed no direct
legal transfer of the charts; but he inferred that all the
previous circumstances gave him sufficient claims to justify
him in, at least, looking into their contents.
It was a solemn, as well as an anxious moment to the
deacon, when he first raised the lid of the chest. Solemn,
because it was not possible to forget the recent decease of
its late owner; and anxious, inasmuch as he had no
certainty
that he should find even on the charts, the places of
which he sought the latitudes and longitudes. Certainly,
nothing like treasure presented itself to his eyes, when all
that Daggett had left behind him lay exposed to view.
The chest of a common sailor is usually but ill-furnished,
unless it may be just after his return from a long and
well-paid
voyage, and before he has had time to fall back on his
purchases of clothes, as a fund to supply his cravings for
personal gratification. This of Daggett's formed no
exception
to the rule. The few clothes it contained were of
the lightest sort, having been procured in warm climates,
and were well worn, in addition. The palms, needles, and
shells, and carving in whale-bone, had all been sold, to
meet their owner's wants, and nothing of that sort remained.
There were two old, dirty, and ragged charts, and on these
the deacon laid his hands, much as the hawk, in its swoop,
descends on its prey. As it did, however, a tremor came
over him, that actually compelled him to throw himself into
a chair, and to rest for a moment.
The first of the charts opened, the deacon saw at a
glance, was that of the antarctic circle. There, sure
enough, was laid down in ink, three or four specks for
islands, with lat. , , and long. , , written out,
at its side. We are under obligations not to give the
figures that stand on the chart, for the discovery is deemed
to be important, by those who possess the secret, even to
the present hour. We are at liberty to tell the whole
story, with this one exception; and we shall proceed to do
so, with a proper regard to the pledges made in the
premises
.
The deacon scarcely breathed as he assured himself of
the important fact just mentioned, and his hands trembled
to such a degree as to fairly cause the paper of the chart
to rattle. Then he had recourse to an expedient that was
strictly characteristic of the man. He wrote the latitude
and longitude in a memorandum-book that he carried on
his person; after which he again sat down, and with great
care erased the island and the writing from the chart, with
the point of a penknife. This done, his mind felt infinitely
relieved. Nor was this all. Charts purchased for the
schooner were lying on a table in his own room, and he
projected on one of them, as well as his skill would allow,
the sealing-islands he had just removed from the chart left
by Daggett. There he also wrote, in pencil, the important
figures that we are commanded not to reveal.
The second chart was then opened. It was of the West
Indies, and particularly of certain keys. One of these last
was pointed out in a way to leave no doubt that it was
meant for the key indicated by the pirate. The same
prohibition
existing as to this key that exists in respect to the
sealing-island, we cannot be more explicit. The writing
near this key being in pencil, it was effectually removed
by means of India-rubber. When this was done, the
deacon
used the precaution to rub some material on the clean
place made by his knife, on the other chart, when he
believed
no eye could detect what had just been done.
Having
marked the proper key, on his own chart of the West
Indies, he replaced the charts of Daggett in the chest, and
locked all up again. The verbal accounts of the sick
mariner
he had already transferred to paper, and he now
believed
himself secure of all the information that was
necessary
to render him the richest man in Suffolk!
When they next met, Mary was surprised at the gaiety
of her uncle, and that so soon after a funeral. He had a
lightened heart, however; for after leading him on, step
by step, until he had gone so far as to purchase and fit out
the schooner, Daggett had pertinaciously refused to enter
into those minute particulars which it is even now
forbidden
us to state, and a want of which would have rendered
his previous expenditures useless. Death, however, had
lifted the veil, and the deacon now believed himself secure
in his knowledge.
An hour or two later, Deacon Pratt and his niece were
seated, in company with two others, at the dinner-table.
The fare was simple, but good. Fish enters largely into
the domestic consumption of all those who dwell near the
water, in that part of the country; and, on that particular
occasion, the uncle had, in the lightness of his heart,
indulged
in what, for him, was a piece of extravagance.
In all such regions there are broken-down, elderly men,
who live by taking fish. Liquor has usually been their
great enemy, and all have the same generic character of
laziness, shiftless and ill-regulated exertions, followed by
much idleness, and fits of intemperance, that in the end
commonly cause their deaths. Such a man fished between
Oyster Pond and Shelter Island, being known to all who
dwelt within his beat, by the familiar appellation of Baiting
Joe.
Shortly after the discovery of the latitudes and
longitudes
on the charts, the deacon had gone to the wharf, in
his impatience to see how Roswell Gardiner got on with
the Sea Lion. The young man, with his gang of hands,
was hard at work, and a very material difference was to be
observed in the state of the schooner, from that in which
she was described in our opening chapter. Her rigging
had all been set up, every spar was in its place, and
altogether
she had a look of preparation and completeness.
Her water was taking in, and from time to time a country
wagon, or an ox-cart, delivered alongside articles
belonging
to her stores. Of cargo, proper, there was none, or
next to none; a sealer carrying little besides salt, and her
stores. In a word, the work was rapidly advancing, and
Captain Gar'ner told his impatient owner that the craft
would be ready to put to sea in all that week.
I have succeeded in engaging the first officer I
wanted
,
added the young man, and he is now busy in
looking
up and shipping hands, at Stonington. We must get
half-a-dozen reliable men on the main, and then we can
take some of our neighbours here, as beginners, just to
please them.
Yes, ship a goodly number of green hands, said the
deacon, zealously. They work at cheap `lays,' and leave
the owners the greater profits. Well, well, Captain
Gar'ner
,
things seem to be doing well in your hands, and I will
leave you. About two hours after dinner, I shall want to
have a word with you in private, and will thank you just
to step across to the house, where you will be certain to
find me. Baiting Joe seems to have hooked something
there, in 'arnest.
That has he! I'll answer for it that he has a
sheeps-head
at the end of his line that will weigh eight or ten
pounds.
The words of Gardiner proved true, for Joe actually
pulled in a fish of the description and weight he had just
mentioned. It was this sight that, in the lightness of his
heart, tempted the deacon to a little extravagance. Joe
was called ashore, and after a good deal of chaffering, the
deacon bought the prize for half a dollar. As Mary was
celebrated for her skill in preparing this particular fish, the
deacon, before he left the wharf, with the sheepshead
hanging
from one hand, fairly invited Captain Gar'ner so to
time his visit to the house, as to be present at the feast.
Nor was this all. Before the deacon had settled with
Joe, the Rev. Mr. Whittle came on the wharf, confessedly
in quest of something to eat. The regular occupations of
this divine were writing sermons, preaching, holding
conferences
,
marrying, christening and burying, and hunting
up something to eat. About half of his precious time
was consumed in the last of these pursuits. We do not wish
to represent this clergyman as having an undue
gastronomic
propensity; but, as having a due one, and a salary that
was so badly paid as quite to disable him from furnishing
his larder, or cellar, with anything worth mentioning, in
advance. Now, he was short of flour; then, the potatoes
were out; next, the pork was consumed; and always there
was a great scarcity of groceries, and other necessaries of
that nature. This neglect on the part of the parishioners,
coupled with a certain improvidence on that of the pastor,
left the clergyman's family completely in that state which
is usually described as being in the from hand to mouth
condition, and which consequently occupied so large a
portion of the good man's time in providing.
Deacon Pratt felt a little conscious and awkward, at
encountering the Rev. Mr. Whittle. It was not the fish
that caused the first any concern. Fifty times had he met
and gone by his pastor, running about with a perplexed and
hungry look, when his own hands, or chaise, or wagon, as
the case might be, contained enough to render the divine's
family happy and contented for a week. No compunctions
of that sort ever troubled the deacon's breast. But, he had
missed the afternoon's meeting the last Sabbath, a
delinquency
for which he felt an awkwardness in accounting,
while he saw its necessity. The salutations passed as
usual, the one party thinking intently on the absence from
service, and the other of the sheepshead. Now, it happily
occurred to the deacon to invite his pastor also to partake
of the fish. There was enough for all; and, though no
one on Oyster Pond was much in the habit of entertaining
at dinner, it was by no means unusual for the parishioners
to have their pastor for a guest. This lucky invitation so
occupied the parties that nothing was said about an
occurrence
so very unusual as the deacon's absence from
meeting
the last Sabba' day afternoon.
By these simple means the party at table consisted of
the deacon himself, Mary, Roswell Gardiner, and the Rev.
Mr. Whittle. The fish was excellent, being so fresh and
so skilfully prepared; and Mary was highly complimented
by all who ate of it, for her share in the entertainment.
But Mary Pratt seemed sad. She had not yet recovered
from the melancholy feelings awakened by the recent death
and funeral; and then her thoughts recurred, with few
interruptions
,
to the long voyage of Roswell, and most
especially
to the unhappy state of religious belief in which he
would undertake so hazardous an expedition. Several
times had she hinted to the clergyman her desire that he
would `talk to Roswell;' but the good man, though
well-enough
inclined, had really so much to do in `providing,'
that it was not a very easy matter for him to go beyond the
beaten track, in order to probe the consciences of
particular
individuals. He promised fairly, but always forgot to
perform; and in this he imitated closely the example set
him by his parishioners, in reference to his own salary.
Roswell Gardiner, therefore, remained in his unbelief;
or, what was tantamount to it, under the influence of a set
of opinions that conflicted with all that the church had
taught since the time of the apostles  at least so thought
Mary, and so think we.
On the contrary, the pastor and the deacon were
particularly
gay, for men of their habitual sobriety. Although
those were not the days of temperance,
par excellence
,
neither of the guests was what might be termed even a
moderate drinker. For a novelty in a sailor, Roswell
Gardiner seldom touched anything but water, while the
other two took their rum and water; but it was in
moderation
,
as all the gifts of God should be used. As for the
intemperate cry which makes it a sin to partake of any
liquor, however prudently, it was then never heard in the
land. On the whole, the clergy of all denominations might
be set down as brandy-and-water men, a few occasionally
carrying out their principle to exaggeration. But the Rev.
Mr. Whittle was a sober man, and, though he saw no
great harm in enlivening his heart and cheering his spirits
with brandy taken in small quantities, he was never known
to be any the worse for his libations. It was the same with
the deacon, though
he
drank rum-and-water of choice;
and no other beverage, Mary's currant-wine and cider
excepted
,
was ever seen on his table.
One thing may be said of liquor, whether it be in its
favour or not; it usually brings out all there is of the
facetious in a man, rendering him conversable and
pleasant
;
for the time being, at least. This was apt to be
peculiarly the case with the Rev. Mr. Whittle and his
deacons. In their ordinary intercourse with their
fellow-creatures
,
these good people had taken up the idea that, in
order to be religious, their countenances must be sombre,
and that care and anxiety should be stamped on their faces,
just as if they had no confidence in the efficacy of the
redemption
.
Few, indeed, are they who vindicate their
professions
by living at peace with God and man! At Oyster
Pond, it was much the fashion to imagine that the more a
person became impressed with the truths of
his
, and
particularly
with those of
her
, lost condition, the more it
became the party to be cynical, and to pry into, and
comment
,
on the backslidings of the entire community. This
weakness, however, was characteristic of neither the pastor
nor the deacon, each of whom regarded his professions too
much in the light of a regular business transaction, to
descend into these little abuses. As for Mary, good
creature
;
her humility was so profound as to cause her to
believe
herself among the weakest and least favoured of all
who belonged to meeting.
I was sorry that my late journey into Connecticut
prevented
my seeing the poor man who was so suddenly taken
away from the house of Widow White, observed the Rev.
Mr. Whittle, some little time after he had made his original
attack on the sheepshead. They tell me it was a hopeless
case from the first?
So Dr. Sage considered it, answered the deacon.
Captain Gar'ner volunteered to go across for the doctor
in
my
boat with a heavy emphasis on the possessive
Vol. I.  6
pronoun  and we had him to look at the patient. But,
if the salt-water
be
good for consumptive people, as some
pretend, I think there is generally little hope for seamen
whose lungs once give way.
The poor man was a mariner, was he? I did not
know his calling, but had rather got the impression that
he was a husbandman. Did he belong to Oyster Pond?
No; we have none of the name of Daggett here, which
is a tribe on the Vineyard. Most of the Daggetts are
sea-faring
folks (folk,
Anglic
), and this man was one of that
class,
I believe;
though I know nothing of him, or of his
pursuits, except by a word, here and there, dropped in
discourse
.
The deacon thought himself safe in venturing this little
departure from the literal truth, inasmuch as no one had
been present, or he
thought
no one had ever been present
at his many secret conferences with the deceased mariner.
Little, however, did he understand the character of the
Widow White, if he flattered himself with holding any
discourse
under her roof, in which she was not to participate
in its subject. So far from this having been the case, the
good woman had contrived to obtain, not only a
listening-place
,
but a peeping-hole, where she both heard and saw
most of that which passed between her guest and the
deacon
.
Had her powers of comprehension been equal to her
will, or had not her mind been prepossessed with the
notion
that the deacon
must
be after herself, old Suffolk
would have rung with the marvels that were thus revealed.
Not only would an unknown sealing-island been laid before
the East-enders, but twenty such islands, and keys without
number, each of which contained more hidden treasure
than `Gar'ner's Island,' Oyster Pond, the Plumb and
Fisher's, and all the coasts of the Sound put together;
enriched
as each and all of these places were thought to be,
by the hidden deposits of Kidd.
Nothing but an accident had prevented these rumours
from being circulated. It happened that on only one
occasion
Daggett was explicit and connected in his narrative.
At all other times his discourse was broken, consisting
more in allusions to what had been previously said than in
direct and clear revelations. The widow, most
unfortunately
for her means of information, was with neighbour
Stone when the connected narrative was given, and all
that she knew was disjointed, obscure, and a little
contradictory
.
Still, it was sufficient to set her thinking intensely,
and sufficient to produce a material influence on the future
fortunes of the Sea Lion, as will appear in the sequel.
It is always a misfortune for a human being to take his
departure away from home and friends, observed the Rev.
Mr. Whittle. Here was an immortal soul left to take its
last great flight, unsupported, I dare say, except by the
prayers of a few pious neighbours. I regret having been
absent during the time he was here. Getting home of a
Friday only, I was compelled to devote Saturday to
preparations
for the Sabbath; and Sabbath-night, as I
understand
it, he departed.
We are all in the hands of Divine Providence, said
the deacon, with a sober mien, and it is our duty to
submit
.
To my thinking, Oyster Pond catches more of its
share of the poor and needy, who are landed from vessels
passing east and west, and add considerably to our
burthens
.
This was said of a spot as much favoured by Divine
Providence
,
in the way of abundance, as any other in
highly-favoured
America. Some eight or ten such events as the
landing of a stranger had occurred within the last
half-century
,
and this was the only instance in which either of
them had cost the deacon a cent. But, so little was he
accustomed
,
and so little was he disposed, to give, that even
a threatened danger of that sort amounted, in his eyes,
nearly to a loss.
Well, exclaimed the literal Roswell Gardiner, I
think, deacon, that we have no great reason to complain.
Southold, Shelter Island, and all the islands about here, for
that matter, are pretty well off as to poor, and it is little
enough that we have to pay for their support.
That's the idea of a young man who never sees the
tax-gatherers, returned the deacon. However, there
are islands, captain Gar'ner, that are better off still, and I
hope you will live to find them.
Is our young friend to sail in the Sea Lion in quest of
any such? inquired the pastor, a little curiously.
The deacon now repented him of the allusion. But his
heart had warmed with the subject, and the rum-and-water
had unlocked some of its wards. So timid and nervous
had he become, however, that the slightest indication of
anything like a suspicion that his secrets were known,
threw him into a sweat.
Not at allnot at allthe captain goes on well-known
and beaten groundSam, what is wanting, now?
Here is Baiting Joe comed up from the wharf,
wanting
to see master, returned a grey-headed negro, who had
formerly been a slave, and who now lived about the place,
giving his services for his support.
Baiting Joe! He is not after his sheepshead, I hope
if he is, he is somewhat late in the day.
Ay, ay, put in the young sailor, laughingtell him,
Sam, that no small part of it is bound to the southward,
meaning to cross the line in my company, and that right
soon.
I paid Joe his half-dollar, certainly
you
saw me pay
him, captain Gar'ner.
I don't think it's any sich thing, master. There is a
stranger with Joe, that he has ferried across from Shelter
Island, and
he's
comed up from the wharf too. Yes
that's it, master.
A stranger! Who could it be? A command was given
to admit him, and no sooner did Mary get a sight of his
person, than she quietly arose to procure a plate, in order
that he, too, might have his share of the fish.
CHAPTER V.
Stranger! I fled the home of grief,
At Connocht Moran's tomb to fall;
I found the helmet of my chief,
His bow still hanging on our wall.
Campbell
.
Amphibious
! exclaimed Roswell Gardiner, in an
aside to Mary, as the stranger entered the room, following
Baiting Joe's lead. The last only came for his glass of
rum-and-water, served with which by the aid of the negro,
he passed the back of his hand across his mouth,
napkin-fashion
,
nodded his good-day, and withdrew. As for
the stranger, Roswell Gardiner's term being particularly
significant, it may be well to make a brief explanation.
The word amphibious is, or rather
was
, well applied to
many of the seamen, whalers, and sealers, who dwelt on the
eastern end of Long Island, or the Vineyard, around
Stonington
,
and, perhaps we might add, in the vicinity of New
Bedford. The Nantucket men had not base enough, in
the way of terra firma, to come properly within the
category
.
The class to which the remark strictly applied were
sailors without being seamen, in the severe signification
of the term. While they could do all that was
indispensably
necessary to take care of their vessels, were surpassed
by no other mariners in enterprise, and daring, and
hardihood
,
they knew little about crowning cables,
carrickbends
,
and all the mysteries of knotting, graffing,
and splicing. A regular Delaware-bay seaman would
have turned up his nose in contempt at many of their ways,
and at much of their real ignorance; but, when it came to
the drag, or to the oar, or to holding out in bad weather,
or to any of the more manly qualities of the business, he
would be certain to yield his respect to those at whom it
had originally been his disposition to laugh. It might best
describe these men to say that they bore some such relation
to the thorough-bred tar, as the volunteer bears to the
regular soldier.
6*
As a matter of course, the stranger was invited to take
his seat at the table. This he did without using many
phrases; and Mary had reason to believe, by his appetite,
that he thought well of her culinary skill. There was very
little of the sheepshead left when this, its last assailant,
shoved his plate back, the signal that he could do no more.
He then finished a glass of rum-and-water, and seemed to
be in a good condition to transact the business that had
brought him there. Until this moment, he had made no
allusion to the motive of his visit, leaving the deacon full
of conjectures.
The fish of Peconic and Gar'ner's is as good as any I
know, coolly observed this worthy, after certainly having
established some claim to give an opinion on the subject.
We think ourselves pretty well off, in this respect, on the
Vineyard
On the Vineyard! interrupted the deacon, without
waiting to hear what was to follow.
Yes, sir, on Martha's Vineyardfor that's the place
I come from. Perhaps I ought to have introduced myself
a little more particularilyI come from Martha's Vineyard,
and my name is Daggett.
The deacon fairly permitted the knife, with which he was
spreading some butter, to fall upon his plate. Daggett
and the Vineyard sounded ominously. Could it be that
Dr. Sage had managed to get a message so far, in so short
a time; and had this amphibious inhabitant of the
neighbouring
island come already to rob him of his treasure?
The perceptions of the deacon, at first, were far from clear;
and he even imagined that all he had expended on the Sea
Lion was thrown away, and that he might be even called
on to give some sort of an account, in a court of chancery,
of the information obtained from the deceased. A little
reflection, however, sufficed to get the better of this
weakness
,
and he made a civil inclination of his head, as much
as to tell the stranger, notwithstanding his name and place
of residence, that he was welcome. Of course no one but
the deacon himself knew of the thoughts that troubled him,
and after a very brief delay, the guest proceeded with his
explanations of the object of his visit.
The Daggetts are pretty numerous on the Vineyard,
continued the stranger, and when you name one of them
it is not always easy to tell just what family he belongs to.
One of our coasters came into the Hull (Holmes' Hole was
meant) a few weeks since, and reported that she spoke an
inward-bound brig, off New Haven, from which she heard
that the people of that craft had put ashore, at Oyster Pond,
a seafaring man, who belonged to the Vineyard, and who
was bound home, arter an absence of fifty years, and whose
name was Thomas Daggett. The word passed through
the island, and a great stir it made among all us Daggetts.
There's plenty of our Vineyard people wandering about
the 'arth, and sometimes one drops in upon the island, just
to die. As most of them that come back bring something
with them, it's gen'rally thought a good sign to hear of
their arrival. After casting about, and talking with all the
old folks, it has been concluded that this Thomas Daggett
must be a brother of my father's, who went to sea about
fifty years since, and has never been seen or heard of since.
He's the only person of the name for whom we can't
account
,
and the family have got me to come across to look
him up.
I am sorry, Mr. Daggett, that you are so late,
answered
the deacon, slowly, as if unwilling to give pain.
Had you come last week, you might have seen and
conversed
with your relation; or had you come early this
morning, only, you might have attended his funeral. He
came among us a stranger, and we endeavoured to imitate
the conduct of the good Samaritan. I believe he had all
the comforts that Oyster Pond can give; and, certainly,
he had the best advice. Dr. Sage, of Sag Harbour,
attended
him in his last illnessDr. Sage, of the Harbour:
doubtless you have heard
him
mentioned?
I know him by reputation, and make no doubt all was
done that could be done. As the sloop I named lay by the
brig some time, in a calm, the two captains had a long talk
together; and ours had prepared us to hear of our
kinsman's
speedy dissolution. He was in a decline when he
landed, and we suppose that no human skill could have
saved him. As he had so skilful a physician, and one who
came so far, I suppose my uncle must have left
property
?
This was a home-thrust; but, fortunately for the deacon,
he had already prepared himself with an answer.
Sea-faring men, that are landed on points and capes,
from inward-bound vessels, are not very apt to be
over-loaded
with worldly goods, he said, smiling. When a
man prospers in that calling, he usually comes ashore at a
wharf, in some large place, and gets into his coach, to ride
up to some grand tavern! I have remarked, pastor, that
sea-faring men love comforts and free-living,
unaccountably
,
when they can fairly get a chance at 'em.
That is natural, deaconquite natural; and what is
natural, is very likely to happen. The natural man loves
all sorts of indulgences, and these among others.
As there was no gainsaying this commonplace
commentary
on the species, it was permitted to pass unanswered.
I hope my kinsman has not been a burthen to any on
Oyster Pond? said the nephew, inquiringly.
I cannot say that he has, returned the deacon. He
was at little cost, at first, and got along by selling a few
odd things that he owned. As Providence had placed him
in the dwelling of a poor widow, I thought it might be
pleasing to the friendsand every man has
some
friends, I
supposeto settle with
her
. This I did, this very
morning
,
taking her receipt in full, as you can see, passing the
paper to the stranger. As a sort of security for my
advances
,
I had the chest of the deceased removed to this
house; and it is now up-stairs, ready to be examined. It
feels light, and I do not think much silver or gold will be
found in it.
To own the truth, the Vineyard seaman looked a little
disappointed. It was so natural that a man who has been
absent fifty years should bring back the fruits of his labour,
that he had expected some slight reward for the trouble he
was now taking, to be bestowed in this particular form.
This, however, was not the specific object of his visit, as
will appear as we proceed. Keeping in view his real
motive
,
the nephew continued his inquiries, always putting
his questions a little indirectly, and receiving answers that
were as evasive and cautious as his own interrogatories.
All this was characteristic of the wary people from which
both had sprung, who seldom speak, in a matter of
business
,
without bearing in mind all the possible constructions
of what they are saying. After a discourse of some
fifteen
minutes, in which the history of the chest, in its
outlines
,
was fully given, and during which the stranger
produced
written evidence of his right to interfere, it was
determined
to make an inventory, on the spot, of the property
left by Daggett, for the benefit of all who might have any
interest in it. Accordingly, the whole party, including
Mary, was soon assembled in the deacon's own room, with
the sea-chest placed invitingly in the centre. All eyes
were fastened on the lid, in curious anticipations of the
contents; for, the deacon excepted, all supposed that those
contents were a profound secret. The Widow White could
have told them better, she having rummaged that chest a
dozen times, at least, though without abstracting even a
pin. Curiosity had been her ruling motive, far more than
cupidity. It is true, the good woman had a prudent regard
to her own interests, and felt some anxiety to learn the
prospects of her receiving the stipulated price for board
only $1 50 per weekbut the sales of the needles, and
palms, and carved whale-bone, having kept her accounts
reasonably square, solicitude on this particular interest was
not at is height. No: curiosity, pure female curiosity, a
little quickened by the passion which is engendered among
the vulgar by the possession of a slight degree of
instruction
,
was really at the bottom of her researches. Not only
had she handled every article in the chest, but she had
read, and re-read, every paper it contained, half-a-dozen
letters included, and made her own surmises on their
nature
.
Still, the good woman was very little the wiser for
her inquiries. Of the great secret she knew absolutely
nothing, unless the broken hints collected in her many
listenings, could be so considered. But, here her
ignorance
ceased. Every hole in a shirt, every patch in a pair
of trousers, and every darn in a stocking, had been
examined
,
and its probable effect on the value of the garment
duly estimated. The only thing that had escaped her
scrutiny
was a small till, that was locked. Into that she could
not look, and there were moments when she would have
parted with a finger in order to overhaul it.
This jacket might sell for a dollar, had the Widow
White calculated, but for the hole in the elbow; and,
that well patched, would bring seventy-five cents. Them
trowsers must have cost two dollars, but they ar'n't worth
half price now. That pee-jacket is the best article in the
chest, and, sent across to the Harbour, about the time the
ships are going out, it would bring enough to maintain
Daggett a month!
Such had been the character of the widow's visitations
to the chest, though no one knew anything of her
discoveries
,
not even her sister-relict, neighbour Stone.
Here is the key, said the deacon, producing that
instrument
from the drawer of a table, as if he had laid it
carefully aside for some such moment. I dare say it will
be found to fit, for I remember to have seen Daggett use it
once or twice myself.
Roswell Gardiner, as the youngest man, and the one on
whom the labouring oar ought to fall, now took the key,
applied it to the lock, turned it without difficulty, and then
lifted the lid. Disappointment appeared on every face but
that of the deacon, at the meagre prospect before the
company
.
Not only was the chest more than half empty, but
the articles it did contain were of the coarsest materials;
well worn sea-clothes that had seen their best days, and
which had never been more than the coarse common attire
of a foremast hand.
There is little here to pay a man for crossing from the
Vineyard, observed Roswell Gardiner, a little drily; for
he did not half like the appearance of cupidity that shone
through the nephew's tardy concern for the fate of the
uncle. The last voyage has not been prosperous, I fear,
or the owners failed before the vessel got in! What is to
be done with all this dunnage, deacon?
It would be best to take out the contents, article by
article, answered the other, and examine each and all.
Now that we have made a beginning with the inventory, it
is best to go through with it.
The young man obeyed, calling out the name of each
article of dress, as he raised it from its receptacle, and
passing it over to him who stood there in the character of
a sort of heir-at-law. The last gave each garment a sharp
look, and prudently put his hand into every pocket, in
order to make sure that it was empty, before he laid the
article on the floor. Nothing was discovered for some
time, until a small key was found in the fob of a pair of old
`go-ashore' pantaloons. As there was the till to the chest
already mentioned, and a lock on that till, the heir-at-law
kept the key, saying nothing touching its existence.
The deceased does not appear to have been much
afflicted with this world's wealth, said the Rev. Mr.
Whittle, whose expectations, to own the truth, had been a
little disappointed. This may have been all the better for
him, when the moment of departure drew near.
I dare say he would have borne the burthen cheerfully,
put in Roswell Gardiner, to have been a little more
comfortable
.
I never knew a person, seaman or landsman, who
was ever the worse for having things snug about him, and
for holding on to the better end of his cheer, as long as he
could.
Your
notion of what is best for man as he draws near
to his end, captain Gar'ner, is not likely to be of the most
approved nature. The sea does not produce many very
orthodox divines.
The young sailor coloured, bit his lip, cast a glance at
Mary, and began a nearly inaudible whistle. In a moment
he forgot the rebuke he had received, and laughingly went
on with the inventory.
Well, he cried, this is rather a poorer outfit than
Jack is apt to carry!
In
fit, I suppose it should be called,
as the poor fellow who owned it was inward bound, when
he brought up on Oyster Pond. You'll hardly think it
worth while, captain Daggett, to take this dunnage across
to the Vineyard.
It is scarce worth the trouble, though friends and
relations
may set a value on it that strangers do not. I see a
couple of charts there  will you hand them this way, if
you please? They may have a value with a sea-faring man,
as old mariners sometimes make notes that are worth as
much as the charts themselves.
This was said very naturally and simply; but it gave the
deacon a good deal of concern. Nor was this feeling at all
lessened by the earnest, not to say eager, manner in which
Daggett, as we shall now call this member of the family,
spread the chart on the bed, and began to pry into its
records
.
The particular chart first opened in this way, was the
one including the antarctic circle, and, of course, was that
from which the deacon had been at so much pains to erase
the sealing-islands, that the deceased mariner had laid
down with so great precision and care. It was evident
that the Martha's Vineyard-man was looking for something
that he could not find, and that he felt disappointment.
Instead
of looking at the chart, indeed, he may be said to have
been peering at it, in all its holes and crannies, of which
there were not a few, in consequence of the torn condition
of the paper. Several minutes elapsed ere the investigation
terminated, the stranger seeming, all that time, to feel no
interest in the remainder of his relation's wardrobe.
This is an old chart, and of the date of 1802,
observed
Daggett, raising himself erect, as a man who has
long been bent takes the creaks out of his back. So old
a chart as to be of little use now-a-day. Our sealers have
gone over so much of the ground to the southward of the
two capes, as to be able to do much better than this now.
Your uncle had the appearance of an old-fashioned
sailor, coldly observed the deacon; and it may be that
he most liked old-fashioned charts.
If such was the case he must have pretty well forgotten
his Vineyard schooling. There is not a woman there who
doesn't know that the latest chart is commonly the best. I
own I'm disapp'inted somewhat; for the master of the
sloop gave me to understand he had heard from the master
of the brig, that some valuable information was to be found
on the old gentleman's charts.
The deacon started, as here was an indication that the
deceased had talked of his knowledge to others, as well as
to himself! It was so natural for a man like Daggett to
boast of what his charts were worth, that he saw the
extreme
probability that a difficulty might arise from this
source. It was his cue, however, to remain silent, and let
the truth develop itself in due course. His attention was
not likely to be drawn aside by the shirts and old clothes,
for the stranger began a second time to examine the chart,
and what was more, in the high latitudes at no great
distance
from the very spot where the sealing-islands had
been placed, and from which they had been so carefully
erased.
It is unaccountable that a man should wear out a chart
like this, and leave so few notes on it! said the
Vineyard-man
,
much as one complains of a delinquency. Here is
white water noted in the middle of the ocean, where I dare
say no other white water was seen but that which is made
by a fish, and nothing is said of any islands. What do you
think of this, captain Gar'ner? laying his finger on the
precise spot where the deacon had been at work so long
that very morning erasing the islands. This looks
well-fingered
,
if nothing else, eh?
Its a shoal laid down in dirt, answered Roswell
Gardiner
,
laughing  Let's see; that's about lat.  ,
and long.  . There can be no known land
thereaway
,
as even captain Cook did not succeed in getting as
far south. That's been a favourite spot with the skipper
for taking hold of his chart. I've known one of those
old-fashioned
chaps put his hand on a chart, in that way, and
never miss his holding ground for three years on a stretch.
Mighty go-by-rule people are some of our whaling-masters,
in particular, who think they know the countenances of
some of the elderly fish, who are too cunning to let a har
poon get fast to 'em.
You've been often in them seas, I some think, captain
Gar'ner? said the other, inquiringly.
I was brought up in the business, and have a
hankering
for it yet, returned the young man, frankly. Nor
do I care so much for charts. They are well enough when
a vessel is on her road; but, as for whales or seals, the
man who wishes to find either, in these times, has to look
for them, as I tell my owner. According to reports, the
time has been when a craft had only to get an offing to fall
in with something that was worth putting a harpoon into;
but those days are gone, captain Daggett; and whales are
to be looked after, out at sea, much as money is to be looked
for ashore here.
Is the craft I saw at the wharf fitting out for a whaler,
then?
She is going after luck, and will accept of it, in
whatever
form it may turn up.
Vol. I.  7
She is rather small for the whaling business, though
vessels of that size
have
done well, by keeping close in
upon our own coast.
We shall know better what she will do after she has
been tried, returned Gardiner, evasively. What do you
think of her for the Banks of Newfoundland?
The Martha's Vineyard-man gave his brother tar a quick,
impatient glance, which pretty plainly said, tell that to
the marines, when he opened the second chart, which as
yet had been neglected.
Sure enough, he muttered, in a low tone, though
loud enough to be heard by the keenly attentive deacon;
here it is  a chart of the West Indies, and of all the
keys!
By this casual, spontaneous outbreaking, as it might be,
the deacon got another clue to the stranger's knowledge,
that gave him increased uneasiness. He was now
convinced
that, by means of the masters of the brig and the
sloop, such information had been sent to the relatives of
Daggett as had prepared them to expect the very
revelations
on which he hoped to establish his own fortunes. To
what extent these revelations had been made, of course he
could only conjecture; but there must have been a good
deal of particularity to induce the individual who had come
over to Oyster Pond to look into the two charts so closely.
Under the circumstances, therefore, he felicitated himself on
the precaution he had so early taken to erase the important
notations from the paper.
Captain Gar'ner, your eyes are younger than mine,
said the Vineyard-man, holding the chart up to the light
will you be good enough to look here?does it not seem
as if that key had been noted, and the words rubbed off the
chart?
This caused the deacon to peer over Roswell Gardiner's
shoulder, and glad enough was he to ascertain that the
stranger had placed his finger on a key that must lie
several
hundred miles from that which was supposed to hold
the buried treasure of the pirates. Something like an
erasure did appear at the indicated point; but the chart
was so old and dirty, that little satisfaction could be had by
examining it. Should the inquirer settle down on the key
he evidently had in his eye, all would be well, since it was
far enough from the spot really noted.
It is strange that so old a seafaring man should wear
out a chart, and make no observation on it! repeated the
stranger, who was both vexed and at a loss what to
conjecture
.
All my charts are written over and marked off, just
as if I meant to get out an edition for myself.
Men differ in their tastes and habits, answered
Roswell
Gardiner, carelessly. Some navigators are for ever
finding rocks, and white water, and scribbling on their
charts, or in the newspapers, when they get back; but I
never knew any good come of it. The men who make the
charts are most to be trusted. For my part, I would not
give a sixpence for a note made by a man who passes a
shoal or a rock, in a squall or a gale.
What would you say to the note of a sealer who should
lay down an island where the seals lie about on the beach
like pigs in a pen, sunning themselves? Would you not
call a chart so noted a treasure?
That would alter the case, sure enough, returned
Gardiner, laughing; though I should not think of
looking
into this chest for any such riches. Most of our masters
navigate too much at random to make their charts of any
great value. They can find the places they look for
themselves
,
but don't seem to know how to tell other people the
road. I have known my old man lay down a shoal that he
fancied he saw, quite a degree out of the way. Now such
a note as that would do more harm than good. It might
make a foul wind of a fair one, and cause a fellow to go
about, or ware ship, when there was not the least occasion
in the world for doing anything of the sort.
Ay, ay; this will do for nervous men, who are always
thinking they see danger ahead; but it is different with
islands that a craft has actually visited. I do not see much
use, Deacon Pratt, in your giving yourself any further
trouble
.
My uncle was not a very rich man, I perceive, and I
must go to work and make my own fortune if I wish more
than I've got already. If there is any demand against the
deceased, I am ready to discharge it.
This was coming so much to the point that the deacon
hardly knew what to make of it. He recollected his own
ten dollars, and the covetousness of his disposition so far
got the better of his prudence as to induce him to mention
the circumstance.
Dr. Sage may have a charge  no doubt has one, that
ought to be settled, but your uncle mainly paid his way as
he went on. I thought the widow who took care of him
was entitled to something extra, and I handed her ten
dollars
this morning, which you may repay to me or not, just
as you please.
Captain Daggett drew forth his wallet and discharged
the obligation on the spot. He then replaced the charts,
and, without opening the till of the chest, he shut down
the lid, locked it, and put the key in his pocket, saying
that he would cause the whole to be removed, much as if
he felt anxious to relieve the deacon of an incumbrance.
This done, he asked a direction to the dwelling of the
Widow White, with whom he wished to converse, ere he
left the Point.
I shall have the questions of so many cousins to
answer
,
when I get home, he said, smiling, that it will
never do for me to go back without taking all the talk I
can get with me. If you will be kind enough to show me
the way, captain Gar'ner, I will promise to do as much for
you, when you come to hunt up the leavings of some old
relation on the Vineyard.
Roswell Gardiner very cheerfully complied, not observing
the look of dissatisfaction with which his owner listened to
the request. Away the two went, then, and were soon at
the widow's door. Here the young man left his companion,
having duty to attend to on board the Sea Lion. The
Widow White received her guest with lively interest, it
forming one of the greatest pleasures of her existence to
be imparting and receiving intelligence.
I dare say you found my uncle a companionable man,
observed the captain, as soon as amicable relations were
established between the parties, by means of a few
flattering
remarks on one side and on the other. The Vineyard
folks are generally quite conversable.
That he was, captain Daggett; and when the deacon
had not been over to perplex him, and wake up the worldly
spirit in him, he was as well inclined to preparation as any
sick person I ever waited on. To be sure it
was
different
arter the deacon had paid one of his visits.
Was Deacon Pratt in the habit of coming to read and
pray with the sick?
He pray! I don't believe he as much as went through
a single sentence of a prayer in all his visits. Their whull
talk was about islands and seals, when they was by
themselves
.
Indeed! exclaimed the nephew, manifesting a new
interest in the discourse. And what could they find to
say on such subjects? Islands and seals were a strange
topic for a dying man!
I know itanswered the widow, sharply. I know'd
it at the time; but what could a lone woman do to set 'em
right; and he a deacon of the meetin' the whull time? If
they
would
talk of worldly things at such times, it wasn't
for one like me to put 'em right.
Then this discourse was held openly in your presence
before your face, as it might be, ma'am?
I can't say that it was just that; nor was it altogether
when my back was turned. They talked, and I overheard
what was said, as will happen when a body is about, you
know.
The stranger did not press the point, having been brought
up in what might almost be termed a land of listeners.
An island, that is cut off from much communication with
the rest of the earth, and from which two-thirds of the
males must be periodically absent, would be very likely to
reach perfection in the art of gossiping, which includes
that of the listener.
Yes, he answered, one picks up a good deal, he
doesn't know how. So they talked of islands and seals?
Thus questioned, the widow cheerfully opened her stores
of knowledge. As she proceeded in her account of the
secret conferences between Deacon Pratt and her late
inmate
,
her zeal became quickened, and she omitted nothing
that she had ever heard, besides including a great deal that
she had not heard. But her companion was accustomed
to such narratives, and knew reasonably well how to make
allowances. He listened with a determination not to
believe
more than half of what she said, and by dint of long
7*
experience, he succeeded in separating the credible
portions
of the woman's almost breathless accounts, from those
that ought to have been regarded as incredible, with a
surprising
degree of success. The greatest difficulty in the
way of comprehending the Widow White's report, arose
from the fact that she had altogether missed the preliminary
and most explicit conference. This left so much to be
understood and inferred, that, in her own efforts to supply
the deficiencies, she made a great deal of confusion in the
statements. Captain Daggett was fully assured that the
deacon knew of the existence of the sealing-island, at least;
though he was in doubt whether the rumour that had been
brought to him, touching the buried treasure, had also been
imparted to this person. The purchase and equipment of
the Sea Lion, taken in connection with the widow's
account
,
were enough, of themselves, to convince one of his
experience and foresight, that an expedition after seal was
then fitting out, on the information derived from his
deceased
relative. Of this much he had no doubt; but he
was not able to assure himself, quite so satisfactorily, that
the key was to be looked at by the way.
The interview between Captain Daggett and the Widow
White lasted more than an hour. In that time the former
had gleaned all the information the latter could give, and
they parted on the best terms in the world. It is true that
the captain gave the widow nothinghe had acquitted his
conscience on this score, by re-paying the deacon the
money the last had advancedbut he listened in the most
exemplary manner to all she had to say; and, with a
certain
class of vehement talkers, the most favoured being in
the world is your good listener. Interest had given the
stranger an air of great attention, and the delighted woman
had poured out her torrent of words in a way that gratified,
in the highest degree, her intense desire to be imparting
information. When they separated, it was with an
understanding
that letters, on the same interesting subject,
should pass between them.
That afternoon, Captain Daggett found means to remove
the chest of his late kinsman, across the bays, to Sag
Harbour
,
whither he proceeded himself by the same
conveyance
.
There, he passed an hour or two in making
inquiries
touching the state of equipment, and the probable time
of the departure of the Sea Lion. The fitting out of this
schooner was the cause of a good deal of discourse in all
that region, and the Martha's Vineyard-man heard
numberless
conjectures, but very little accurate information.
On the whole, however, he arrived at the conclusion that
the Sea Lion would sail within the next ten days; that her
voyage was to be distant; that her absence was expected
to exceed a twelvemonth; and that it was thought she had
some other scheme in view, in addition to that of sealing.
That night, this hardy marinerhalf agriculturist as he
wasgot into his whale-boat, and sailed for the Vineyard,
all alone, taking the chest with him. This was nothing,
however; for quite often, before, had he been off at sea, in
his boat, alone, looking out for inward-bound vessels to
pilot.
CHAPTER VI.
Launch thy bark, mariner!
Christian, God speed thee!
Let loose the rudder-bands,
Good angels lead thee!
Set thy sails warily,
Tempests will come;
Steer thy course steadily,
Christian, steer home!
Mrs. Southey
.
The
visit of Captain Daggett, taken in connection with
all that he had said and done, while on Oyster Pond, and
at Sag Harbour, had the effect greatly to hasten the
equipments
of the Sea Lion. Deacon Pratt knew the characters
of the seamen of the island too well, to trifle in a matter
of so much moment. How much the Vineyard folk had
been told, in reference to his great secrets, he did not
know; but he felt assured that they knew enough, and had
learned enough in this visit, to quicken all their desires for
riches, and to set them in motion towards the antarctic
circle. With such a people, distance and difficulties are
of no account; a man who has been cradling oats, to-day,
in his own retired fields, where one would think ambition
and the love of change could never penetrate, being ready
to quit home at twenty-four hours' notice, assuming the
marlingspike as he lays aside the fork, and setting forth for
the uttermost confines of the earth, with as little hesitation
as another might quit his home for an ordinary journey of
a week. Such, did the deacon well know, was the
character
of those with whom he had now to deal, and he foresaw
the necessity of the utmost caution, perseverance,
diligence
,
and activity.
Philip Hazard, the mate mentioned by Roswell Gardiner,
was enjoined to lose no time; and the men engaged for the
voyage soon began to cross the Sound, and to make their
appearance on board the schooner. As for the craft
herself
,
she had all that was necessary for her wants below
hatches; and the deacon began to manifest some impatience
for the appearance of two or three men of particular
excellence
,
of whom Phil Hazard was in quest, and whom
Captain
Gardiner had made it a point should be obtained.
Little did the worthy owner suspect that the Vineyard
people
were tampering with these very hands, and keeping
them from coming to terms, in order that they might fit
out a second Sea Lion, which they had now been
preparing
for near a month; having purchased her at New
Bedford
,
with a view to profit by the imperfect information
that had reached them, through the masters of the brig and
sloop. The identity in the name was accidental, or, it
might be better to say, had been naturally enough
suggested
by the common nature of the enterprise; but, once
existing, it had been the means of suggesting to the
Vineyard
company a scheme of confounding the vessels, out of
which they hoped to reap some benefit, but which it would
be premature now fully to state.
After a delay of several days, Hazard sent across from
Stonington a man by the name of Watson, who had the
reputation of being a first-class sealer. This accession
was highly prized; and, in the absence of his mates, both
of whom were out looking for hands, Roswell Gardiner, to
whom command was still novel, consulted freely with this
experienced and skilful mariner. It was fortunate for the
schemes of the deacon that he had left his young master
still in the dark, as respected his two great secrets.
Gardiner
understood that the schooner was to go after seals,
sea-lions, sea-elephants, and all animals of the genus
phoca
;
but he had been told nothing concerning the revelations
of Daggett, or of the real motives that had induced him to
go so far out of his usual course, in the pursuit of gain.
We say it was fortunate that the deacon had been so wary;
for Watson had no intention whatever to sail out of Oyster
Pond, having been actually engaged as the second officer
of the rival Sea Lion, which had been purchased at New
Bedford, and was then in an active state of forwardness in
its equipments, with a view to compete with the craft that
was still lying so quietly and unconsciously alongside of
Deacon Pratt's wharf. In a word, Watson was a spy, sent
across by the Vineyard-men, to ascertain all he could of
the intentions of the schooner's owner, to worm himself into
Gardiner's confidence, and to report, from time to time,
the state of things generally, in order that the East-enders
might not get the start of his real employers. It is a
common
boast of Americans that there are no spies in their
country. This may be true in the every-day signification
of the term, though it is very untrue in all others. This is
probably the most spying country in christendom, if the
looking into other people's concerns be meant. Extensive
and recognised systems of
espionage
exist among
merchants
;
and nearly every man connected with the press
has enlisted himself as a sort of spy in the interests of
politics  many, in those of other concerns, also. The
reader, therefore, is not to run away with impressions
formed under general assertions that will scarce bear
investigation
,
and deny the truth of pictures that are drawn
with daguerreotype fidelity, because they do not happen to
reflect the cant of the day. The man Watson, who had
partially engaged to go out in the Sea Lion, captain
Roswell
Gardiner, was not only a spy, but a spy sent covertly
into an enemy's camp, with the meanest motives, and with
intentions as hostile as the nature of the circumstances
would permit.
Such was the state of things on Oyster Pond for quite a
week after the nephew had been to look after the effects
of the deceased uncle. The schooner was now quite ready
for sea, and her master began to talk of hauling off from
the wharf. It is true, there was no very apparent reason
why this step, preliminary to sailing, should be taken in
that port, where there were so few opportunities for her
people's running into excesses; but it sounded ship-shape,
and captain Gardiner had been heard to express an
intention
to that effect. The men arrived but slowly from the
main, and something like impatience was manifested by
the young commander, who had long before got all his
green hands, or youths from the neighbourhood, on board,
and was gradually breaking them in to the ways of a vessel.
Indeed, the best reason he could give to himself for `
hauling
off,' was the practice it might give to these lads with
the oars.
I don't know what Hazard and Green are about
called out Roswell Gardiner to his owner, the first being
on the quarter-deck of the Sea Lion, and the last on the
wharf, while Watson was busy in the main-rigging; they've
been long enough on the main to ship a dozen crews for a
craft of this size, and we are still short two hands, even
if this man sign the papers, which he has not yet done.
By the way, Watson, it's time we saw your hand-writing.
I'm a poor scholar, captain Gar'ner, returned the
cunning mariner, and it takes time for me to make out
even so small a matter as my name.
Ay, ay; you are a prudent fellow, and I like you all
the better for it. But you have had leisure, and a plenty
of it too, to make up your mind. You must know the
schooner from her keel up by this time, and ought to be
able to say now that you are willing to take luck's chances
in her.
Ay, ay, sir; that's all true enough, so far as the craft
is concerned. If this was a West India v'y'ge, I wouldn't
stand a minute about signing the articles; nor should I
make much question if the craft was large enough for a
common whalin' v'y'ge; but, sealin' is a different business,
and one onprofitable hand may make many an onprofitable
lay.
All this is true enough; but we do not intend to take
any unprofitable hands, or to have any unprofitable lays.
You know me
Oh! if all was like
you
, captain Gar'ner, I wouldn't
stand even to wipe the pen.
Your
repitation was made in
the southward, and no man can dispute your skill.
Well, both mates are old hands at the business, and
we intend that all the `ables' shall be as good men as you
are yourself.
It
needs
good men, sir, to be operatin' among some of
them sea-elephants! Sea-dogs; for sea-dogs is my sayin'.
They tell of seals getting scurce; but I say, it's all in knowin'
the business  `There's young captain Gar'ner,' says I,
`that's fittin' out a schooner for some onknown part of the
world,' says I, `maybe for the South Pole, for-ti-know, or
for some sich out-of-the-way hole; now he'll come back
full
, or I'm no judge o' the business,' says I.
Well, if this is your way of thinking, you have only to
clap your name to the articles, and take your lay.
Ay, ay, sir; when I've seed my shipmates. There
isn't the business under the sun that so much needs that
every man should be true, as the sea-elephant trade.
Smaller animals may be got along with, with a narvous
crew, perhaps; but when it comes to the raal old bulls, or
bull-dogs, as a body might better call 'em, give me stout
hearts, as well as stout hands.
Well, now, to my notion, Watson, it is less dangerous
to take a sea-elephant than to fasten to a regular old
bull-whale
,
that may be has had half a dozen irons in him
already
.
Yes, sir,
that's
sometimes skeary work, too; though I
don't think so much of a whale as I do of a sea-elephant,
or of a sea-lion. `Let me know my shipmates,' say I, `on
a sealin' expedition.'
Captain Gar'ner, said the deacon, who necessarily
overheard this discourse, you ought to know at once
whether this man is to go in the schooner or not. The
mates believe he is, and may come across from the main
without a hand to take his place should he leave us. The
thing should be settled at once.
I'm willing to come to tarms this minute, returned
Watson, as boldly as if he were perfectly sincere; only
let me understand what I undertake. If I know'd to what
islands the schooner was bound, it might make a difference
in my judgment.
This was a well-devised question of the spy's, though it
failed of its effect, in consequence of the deacon's great
caution in not having yet told his secret, even to the
master
of his craft. Had Gardiner known exactly where he
was about to go, the desire to secure a hand as valuable as
Watson might have drawn from him some imprudent
revelation
;
but knowing nothing himself, he was obliged to
make the best answer he could.
Going, he said; why, we are going after seals, to
be sure; and shall look for them where they are most to
be found. As experienced a hand as yourself ought to
know where that is.
Ay, ay, sir, answered the fellow, laughingit's just
neither here nor therethat's all.
Captain Gar'ner, interrupted the deacon, solemnly,
this is trifling, and we must come to terms with this
man, or write to Mr. Hazard to engage another in his
place. Come ashore, sir; I have business with you up at
the house.
The serious manner in which this was uttered took both
the captain and the man a little by surprise. As for the
first, he went below to conceal his good-looking throat
beneath
a black handkerchief, before he followed the deacon
where it was most probable he should meet with Mary.
While he was thus occupied, Watson came down out of
the main-rigging and descended into the forecastle. As
the young captain was walking fast towards the dwelling
of Deacon Pratt, Watson came on deck again, and hailed
Baiting Joe, who was fishing at no great distance from the
wharf. In a few minutes Watson was in Joe's boat, bag
and all  he had not brought a chest on board  and was
under way for the Harbour. From the Harbour he sailed
the same evening, in a whale-boat that was kept in
readiness
for him, carrying the news over to Holmes's Hole
that the Sea Lion, of Oyster Pond, would certainly be
ready to go out as early as the succeeding week. Although
Watson thus seemingly deserted his post, it was with a
perfect understanding with his real employers. He had
need of a few days to make his own preparations before he
left the 41st degree of north latitude to go as far south as
a vessel could proceed. He did not, however, leave his
post entirely vacant. One of Deacon Pratt's neighbours
had undertaken, for a consideration, to let the progress of
events be known, and tidings were sent by every
opportunity
,
reporting the movements of the schooner, and the
prospects of her getting to sea. These last were not quite
as flattering as Roswell Gardiner hoped and believed, the
agents of the Vineyard company having succeeded in
getting away two of Hazard's best men; and as reliable
sealers were not to be picked up as easily as pebbles on a
beach, the delay caused by this new stroke of management
might even be serious. All this time the Sea Lion, of
Holmes' Hole, was getting ahead with untiring industry,
and there was every prospect of her being ready to go out
as soon as her competitor. But, to return to Oyster Pond.
Deacon Pratt was in his porch ere Roswell Gardiner
overtook him. There the deacon gave his young friend to
understand he had private business of moment, and led the
way at once into his own apartment, which served the
purposes
of office, bed-room and closet; the good man being
accustomed to put up his petition to the throne of Mercy
there, as well as transact all his temporal affairs. Shutting
the door, and turning the key, not a little to Roswell's
surprise
,
the old man faced his companion with a most earnest
and solemn look, telling him at once that he was now about
to open his mind to him in a matter of the last concern.
The young sailor scarce knew what to think of it all; but
he hoped that Mary was, in some way, connected with the
result.
In the first place, captain Gar'ner, continued the
deacon, I must ask you to take an oath.
An oath, deacon!  This is quite new for the sealing
businessas ceremonious as Uncle Sam's people.
Yes, sir, an oath; and an oath that must be most
religiously
kept, and on this bible. Without the oath, our
whole connection must fall through, captain Gar'ner.
Rather than that should happen, deacon, I will
cheerfully
take two oaths; one to clench the other.
It is well. I ask you, Roswell Gar'ner, to swear on
Vol. I.  8
this Holy Book that the secrets I shall now reveal to you
shall not be told to any other, except in a manner prescribed
by myself; that in no other man's employment will you
profit by them; and that you will in all things connected
with them be true and faithful to your engagements to me
and to my interestsso help you God!
Roswell Gardiner kissed the book, while he wondered
much, and was dying with curiosity to know what was to
follow. This great point secured, the deacon laid aside the
sacred volume, opened a drawer, and produced the two
all-important
charts, to which he had transferred the notes of
Daggett.
Captain Gar'ner, resumed the deacon, spreading the
chart of the antarctic sea on the bed, you must have
known me and my ways long enough to feel some surprise
at finding me, at my time of life, first entering into the
shipping concern.
If I've felt any surprise, deacon, it is that a man of
your taste and judgment should have held aloof so long
from the only employment that I think fit for a man of real
energy and character.
Ay, this is well enough for you to say, as a seaman
yourself; though you will find it hard to persuade most of
those who live on shore into your own ways of thinking.
That is because people ashore think and act as they
have been brought up to do. Now, just look at that chart,
deacon; see how much of it is water, and how little of it
is land. Minister Whittle told us, only the last Sabbath,
that nothing was created without a design, and that a wise
dispensation of Divine Providence was to be seen in all the
works of nature. Now, if the land was intended to take
the lead of the water, would there have been so much more
of the last than of the first, deacon? That was the idea
that came into my mind when I heard the minister's words;
and had not Mary
What of Mary? demanded the deacon, perceiving
that the young man paused.
Only I was in hopes that what you had to say, deacon,
might have some connection with her.
What I have to say is better worth hearing than fifty
Marys. As to my niece, Gar'ner, you are welcome to her,
if she will have you; and why she does not is to me
unaccountable
.
But, you see that chart  look at it well, and
tell me if you find anything new or remarkable about it.
It looks like old times, deacon, and here are many
places that I have visited and know. What have we here?
Islands laid down in pencil, with the latitude and longitude
in figures! Who says there is land, thereaway, Deacon
Pratt, if I may be so free as to ask the question?
I doand capital good land it is, for a sealing craft to
get alongside of. Them islands, Gar'ner, may make your
fortune, as well as mine. No matter how I know they are
thereit is enough that I
do
know it, and that I wish you
to carry the Sea Lion to that very spot, as straight as you
can go; fill her up with elephant's oil, ivory, and skins,
and bring her back again as fast as she can travel.
Islands in that latitude and longitude! said Roswell
Gardiner, examining the chart as closely as if it were of
very fine print indeed  I never heard of any such land
before!
Tis there, notwithstanding; and like all land in
distant
seas that men have not often troubled, plentifully
garnished
with what will pay the mariner well for his visit.
Of that I have little doubt, should there be actually
any land there. It may be a Cape Fly Away that some
fellow has seen in thick weather. The ocean is full of such
islands!
This is none of them. It is bony fidy 'arth, as I know
from the man who trod it. You must take good care,
Gar'ner, and not run the schooner on it  with a small
chuckling laugh, such as a man little accustomed to this
species of indulgence uses, when in high good-humour.
I am not rich enough to buy and fit out Sea Lions for
you to cast 'em away.
That's a high latitude, deacon, to carry a craft into.
Cook, himself, fell short of
that
, somewhat!
Never mind Cook  he was a king's navigator  my
man was an American sealer; and what he has once seen
he knows where to find again. There are the islands
three in number; and there you will find 'em, with animals
on their shores as plenty as clam-shells on the south
beach.
I hope it may be so. If land is there, and you'll risk
the schooner, I'll try to get a look at it. I shall want you
to put it down in black and white, however, that I'm to go
as high as this.
You shall have any authority a man may ask. On that
point there can be no difficulty between me and you. The
risk of the schooner must be mine of course; but I rely on
you to take as good care of her as a man can. Go then,
direct, to that point, and fill up the schooner. But, Gar'ner,
my business doesn't end with this! As soon as the schooner
is full, you will come to the southward, and get her clear
of everything like ice as fast as possible.
That I should be very likely to do, deacon, though you
had said nothing on the subject.
Yes, by all accounts them are stormy seas, and the
sooner a body is shut of them the better. And now, Gar'ner,
I must swear you again. I have another secret to tell you,
and an oath must go with each. Kiss this sacred volume
once more, and swear to me never to reveal to another that
which I am about to reveal to you, unless it may be in a
court of law, and at the command of justice, so help you
God.
What, a second oath, deacon!You are as bad as the
custom-houses, which take you on all tacks, and don't
believe
you when you've done. Surely, I'm sworn in
already
.
Kiss the book, and swear to what I have put to you,
said the deacon, sternly, or never go to sea in a craft of
mine. Never to reveal what I shall now tell you, unless
compelled by justice, so help you God!
Thus cornered, Roswell Gardiner hesitated no longer,
but swore as required, kissing the book gravely and
reverently
.
This was the young man's first command, and he was not going to lose it on account of so small a matter as
swearing to keep his owner's secrets. Having obtained the
pledge, the deacon now produced the second chart, which
was made to take the place of the other on the bed.
There! he exclaimed, in a sort of triumphthat is
the real object of your voyage!
That key! Why, deacon, that is in north latitude
, and you make a crooked road of it, truly, when you
tell me to go as far south as  , in order to reach
it.
It is well to have two strings to a body's bow. When
you hear what you are to bring from that key, you will
understand why I send you south, before you are to come
here to top off your cargo.
It must be with turtle, then, said Roswell Gardiner,
laughing. Nothing grows on these keys but a few stunted
shrubs, and nothing is ever to be found on them but turtle.
Once in a while a fellow may pick up a few turtle, if he
happen to hit the right key.
Gar'ner, rejoined the deacon; still more solemnly
that island, low and insignificant as it is, contains
treasure
.
Pirates made their deposits here a long time ago,
and the knowledge of that fact is now confined to
myself
.
The young man started at the deacon as if he had some
doubts whether the old man were in his right mind. He
knew the besetting weakness of his character well, and had
no difficulty in appreciating the influence of such a belief
as that he had just expressed, on his feelings; but it seemed
so utterly improbable that he, living on Oyster Pond, should
learn a fact of this nature, which was concealed from
others, that, at first, he fancied his owner had been
dreaming
of money until its images had made him mad. Then
he recollected the deceased mariner, the deacon's many
conferences with him, the interest he had always appeared
to take in the man, and the suddenness, as well as the
time, of the purchase of the schooner; and he at once
obtained
a clue to the whole affair.
Daggett has told you this, Deacon Prattsaid
Gardiner
,
in his off-hand way. And he is the man who has
told you of those sealing-islands too?
Admitting it to be so, why not Daggett as well as any
other man?
Certainly, if he knew what he was saying to be true
but the yarn of a sailor is not often to be taken for gospel.
Daggett was near his end, and cannot be classed with
those who talk idly in the pride of their health and strength
men who are ever ready to say  `Tush, God has
forgotten
.'
8*
Why was this told to you, when the man had natural
friends and relatives by the dozen over on the Vineyard?
He had been away from the Vineyard and them
relatives
fifty years; a length of time that weakens a body's
feelings considerably. Take you away from Mary only a
fourth part of that time, and you would forget whether her
eyes are blue or black, and altogether how she looks.
If I should, a most miserable and contemptible dog
should I account myself! No, deacon, twice fifty years
would not make me forget the eyes or the looks of Mary!
Ay, so all youngsters think, and feel, and talk. But
let'em try the world, and they'll soon find out thier own
foolishness. But Daggett made me his confidant because
Providence put me in his way, and because he trusted to
being well enough to go in the schooner, and to turn the
expedition to some account in his own behalf.
Had the man the impudence to confess that he had
been a pirate, and helped to bury treasure on this key?
That is not, by any means, his history. Daggett was
never a pirate himself, but accident placed him in the same
prison and same room as that in which a real pirate was
confined. There the men became friends, and the
condemned
prisoner, for such he was in the end, gave this
secret to Daggett as the last service he could do him.
I hope, deacon, you do not expect much in the way of
profit from this part of the voyage?
I expect the most from it, Gar'ner, as you will too,
when you come to hear the whole story.
The deacon then went into all the particulars of the
revelations
made by the pirate to his fellow-prisoner, much
as they had been given by Daggett to himself. The young
man listened to this account at first with incredulity, then
with interest; and finally with a feeling that induced him
to believe that there might be more truth in the narrative
than he had originally supposed possible. This change
was produced by the earnest manner of the deacon as
much as by the narrative itself; for he had become graphic
under the strong impulses of that which, with him, was a
master passion. So deep had been the impression made
on the mind of the old man by Daggett's account, and so
intense the expectations thereby awakened, that he omitted
nothing, observed the most minute accuracy in all his
details, and conveyed just as distinct impressions to his
listener, as had been conveyed to himself, when the story
was first told to him.
This is a most extr'or'nary account, take it on
whatever
tack you will! exclaimed Roswell Gardiner, as soon
as a pause in the deacon's story enabled him to put in
another
word. The most extr'or'nary tale I ever listened
to! How came so much gold and silver to be abandoned
for so long a time?
Them three officers hid it there, fearing to trust their
own crew with it in their vessel. Their pretence was to
stop for turtle, just as you must do; whilst the hands were
turtling, the captain and his mates walked about the key,
and took occasion to make their deposits in that hole in
the coral rock, as you have heard me say. Oh! it's all too
natural not to be true!
Roswell Gardiner saw that the old man's hopes were too
keenly excited to be easily cooled, and that his latent
covetousness
was thoroughly awakened. Of all the passions
to which poor human nature is the slave, the love of gold
is that which endures the longest, and is often literally
carried with us to the verge of the grave. Indeed, in minds
so constituted originally as to submit to an undue love of
money, the passion appears to increase, as others more
dependent
on youth, and strength, and enterprise, and
ambition
,
gradually become of diminished force, slowly but
surely usurping the entire sway over a being that was once
subject to many masters. Thus had it been with the
deacon
.
Nearly all his passions now centred in this one. He
no longer cared for preferment in politics, though once it
had been the source of a strong desire to represent Suffolk
at Albany; even the meeting, and its honours, was
loosening
its hold on his mind; while his fellow-men, his kindred
included, were regarded by him as little more than so many
competitors, or tools.
A lie may be made to seem very natural, answered
Roswell Gardiner, if it has been put together by one who
understands knotting and splicing in such matters. Did
this Daggett name the amount of the sum that he supposed
the pirates may have left on that key?
He did, returned the deacon, the whole of his narrow
and craving soul seeming to gleam in his two sunken eyes
as he answered. According to the account of the pirate,
there could not have been much less than thirty thousand
dollars, and nearly all of it in good doubloons of the coin
of the kingsdoubloons that will weigh their full sixteens
to the pounday, and to spare!
The Sea Lion's cargo, well chosen and well stowed,
would double that, deacon, if the right animals can only be
found.
May be so  but, just think, Gar'ner  this will be in
good bright coined gold!
But what right can we have to that gold, even admitting
that it is there, and can be found?
Right! exclaimed the deacon, staring. Does not
that which Divine Providence gives man become his own?
By the same rule it might be said Divine Providence
gave it to the pirates. There must be lawful owners to all
this money, if one could only find them.
Ay, if one could only find them. Harkee, Gar'ner;
have you spent a shilling or a quarter lately?
A good many of both, deacon, answered the young
man, again betraying the lightness of his heart with a
laugh. I wish I had more of your saving temper, and I
might get rich. Yes, I spent a quarter only two hours
since, in buying fish for the cabin, of old Baiting Joe.
Well, tell me the impression of that quarter. Had it a
head, or only pillars? What was its date, and in whose
reign was it struck? Maybe it was from the mint at
Philadelphia
if so, had it the old eagle or the new? In a
word, could you swear to that quarter, Gar'ner, or to any
quarter you ever spent in your life?
Perhaps not, deacon. A fellow doesn't sit down to
take likenesses, when he gets a little silver or gold.
Nor is it very probable that any one could say`that
is my doubloon.'
Still there must be a lawful owner to each piece of
that money, if any such money be there, returned Roswell
Gardiner, a little positively. Have you ever talked with
Mary, deacon, on this subject?
I talk of such a matter with a woman! Do you think
I'm mad, Gar'ner? If I wanted to have the secret run
through old Suffolk, as fire runs over the salt meadows in
the spring, I might think of such a thing: but not without.
I have talked with no one but the master of the craft that I
am about to send out in search of this gold, as well as in
search of the sealing-islands I have shown you. Had there
been but
one
object in view, I might not have ventured so
much; but with
two
before my eyes, it would seem like
flying in the face of Divine Providence to neglect so great
an opportunity!
Roswell Gardiner saw that arguments would avail
nothing
against a cupidity so keenly aroused. He abstained,
therefore, from urging any more of the objections that
suggested themselves to his mind, but heard all that the
deacon had to tell him, taking full notes of what he heard.
It would seem that Daggett had been sufficiently clear in
his directions for finding the hidden treasure, provided
always that his confidant the pirate had been as clear with
him, and had not been indulging in a mystification. The
probability of the last had early suggested itself to one of
Deacon Pratt's cautious temperament; but Daggett had
succeeded in removing the impression by his forcible
statements
of his friend's sincerity. There was as little doubt
of the sincerity of the belief of the Martha's Vineyard
mariner
,
as there was of that of the deacon himself.
The day that succeeded this conference, the Sea Lion
hauled off from the wharf, and all communications with her
were now made only by means of boats. The sudden
disappearance
of Watson may have contributed to this change,
men being more under control with a craft at her moorings
than when fast to a wharf. Three days later the schooner
lifted her anchor, and with a light air made sail. She
passed through the narrow but deep channel which
separates
Shelter Island from Oyster Pond, quitting the waters
of Peconic altogether. There was not an air of departure
about her, notwithstanding. The deacon was not much
concerned; and some of Roswell Gardiner's clothes were
still at his washerwoman's, circumstances that were fully
explained, when the schooner was seen to anchor in
Gardiner's
Bay, which is an outer roadstead to all the ports and
havens of that region.
CHAPTER VII.
Walk in the light! so shalt thou know
That fellowship of love,
His spirit only can bestow
Who reigns in light above.
Walk in the light! and sin, abhorr'd,
Shall ne'er defile again;
The blood of Jesus Christ, the Lord,
Shall cleanse from every stain.
Bernard Barton
.
About
an hour after the Sea Lion, of Oyster Pond, had
let go her anchor in Gardiner's Bay, a coasting sloop
approached
her, coming from the westward. There are two
passages by which vessels enter or quit Long Island Sound,
at its eastern termination. The main channel is between
Plum and Fisher's Islands, and, from the rapidity of its
currents, is known by the name of the Race. The other
passage is much less frequented, being out of the direct
line of sailing for craft that keep mid-sound. It lies to the
southward of the Race, between Plum Island and Oyster
Pond Point, and is called by the Anglo-Saxon appellation
of Plum Gut. The coaster just mentioned had come through
this latter passage; and it was the impression of those who
saw her from the schooner, that she was bound up into
Peconic, or the waters of Sag Harbour. Instead of luffing
up into either of the channels that would have carried her
into these places, however, she kept off, crossing Gardiner's
Bay, until she got within hail of the schooner. The wind
being quite light, there was time for the following short
dialogue to take place between the skipper of this coaster
and Roswell Gardiner, before the sloop had passed beyond
the reach of the voice.
Is that the Sea Lion, of Oyster Pond? demanded the
skipper, boldly.
Ay, ay, answered Roswell Gardiner, in the sententious
manner of a seaman.
Is there one Watson, of Martha's Vineyard, shipped in
that craft?
He was aboard here for a week, but left us suddenly.
As he did not sign articles, I cannot say that he run.
He changed his mind, then, returned the other, as
one expresses a slight degree of surprise at hearing that
which was new to him. Watson is apt to whiffle about,
though a prime fellow, if you can once fasten to him, and
get him into blue water. Does your schooner go out
tomorrow
,
Captain Gar'ner?
Not till next day, I think, said Roswell Gardiner,
with the frankness of his nature, utterly free from the
slightest suspicion that he was communicating with one in
the interests of rivals. My mates have not yet joined me,
and I am short of my complement by two good hands. Had
that fellow Watson stuck by me, I would have given him a
look at water that no lead ever sounded.
Ay, ay; he's a whiffler, but a good man on a
sea-elephant
.
Then you think you'll sail day a'ter to-morrow?
If my mates come over from the main. They wrote
me yesterday that they had got the hands, and were then
on the look-out for something to get across in. I've come
out here to be ready for them, and to pick 'em up, that
they needn't go all the way up to the Harbour.
That's a good traverse, and will save a long pull.
Perhaps
they are in
that
boat.
At this allusion to a boat, Roswell Gardiner sprang into
his main rigging, and saw, sure enough, that a boat was
pulling directly towards the schooner, coming from the
main, and distant only a short half mile. A glass was
handed to him, and he was soon heard announcing
cheerfully
to his men, that Mr. Hazard and the second officer
were in the boat, with two seamen, and that he supposed
they should
now
have their complement. All this was
overheard by the skipper of the sloop, who caught each
syllable with the most eager attention.
You'll soon be travelling south, I'm thinking, Captain
Gar'ner? called out this worthy, again, in a sort of
felicitating
way  Them's your chaps, and they'll set you up.
I hope so, with all my heart, for there is nothing more
tiresome than waiting when one is all ready to trip. My
owner is getting to be impatient too, and wants to see some
skins in return for his dollars.
Ay, ay, them's your chaps, and you'll be off the day
a'ter to-morrow, at the latest. Well, a good time to you,
Captain Gar'ner, and a plenty of skinning. It's a long
road to travel, especially when a craft has to go as far south
as your's is bound!
How do you know, friend, whither I am bound? You
have not asked me for my sealing ground, nor is it usual,
in our business, to be hawking it up and down the
country
.
All that is true enough, but I've a notion,
notwithstanding
.
Now, as you'll be off so soon, and as I shall not
see you again, for some time at least, I will give you a
piece of advice. If you fall
in
with a consort, don't fall
out
with her, and make a distant v'y'ge a cruise for an enemy,
but come to tarms, and work in company; lay for lay; and
make fair weather of what can't be helped.
The men on board the sloop laughed at this speech,
while those on board the schooner wondered. To Roswell
Gardiner and his people the allusions were an enigma, and
the former muttered something about the stranger's being
a dunce, as he descended from the rigging, and gave some
orders to prepare to receive the boat.
The chap belongs to the Hole, rejoined the master
of the schooner, and all them Vineyard fellows fancy
themselves better blue-jackets than the rest of mankind:
I suppose it must be because their island lies further out
to sea than anything we have here inside of Montauk.
Thus ended the communications with the stranger. The
sloop glided away before a light south wind, and, favoured
by an ebb tide, soon rounded the spit of sand that shelters
the anchorage; and, hauling up to the eastward, she went
on her way towards Holmes' Hole. The skipper was a
relative of half of those who were interested in fitting out
the rival Sea Lion, and had volunteered to obtain the very
information he took with him, knowing how acceptable it
would be to those at home. Sooth to say, a deep but wary
excitement prevailed on the Vineyard, touching not only
the sealing-islands, but also in respect to the buried
treasure
.
The information actually possessed by the relations
of the deceased mariner was neither very full nor very
clear. It consisted principally of sayings of Daggett,
uttered
during his homeward-bound passage, and transmitted
by the master of the brig to him of the sloop in the course
of conferences that wore away a long summer's afternoon,
as the two vessels lay becalmed within a hundred fathoms
of each other. These sayings, however, had been frequent
and intelligible. All men like to deal in that which makes
them of importance; and the possession of his secrets had
just the effect on Daggett's mind that was necessary to
render him boastful. Under such impulses his tongue had
not been very guarded; and facts leaked out which, when
transmitted to his native island, through the medium of
half a dozen tongues and as many fancies, amounted to
statements sufficient to fire the imaginations of a people
much duller than those of Martha's Vineyard. Accustomed
to converse and think of such expeditions, it is not
surprising
that a few of the most enterprising of those who
first heard the reports should unite and plan the adventure
they now actually had in hand. When the intelligence of
what was going on on Oyster Pond reached them,
everything
like hesitation or doubt disappeared; and from the
moment of the nephew's return in quest of his uncle's
assets, the equipment of the Humses' Hull craft had
been pressed in a way that would have done credit to that
of a government cruiser. Even Henry Eckford, so well
known for having undertaken to cut the trees and put
upon the waters of Ontario two double-bank frigates, if
frigates they could be termed, each of which was to mount
its hundred guns, in the short space of sixty days, scarce
manifested greater energy in carrying out his contract,
than did these rustic islanders in preparing their craft to
compete with that which they were now certain was about
to sail from the place where their kinsman had breathed
his last.
These keen and spirited islanders, however, did not
work quite as much in the dark as our accounts,
unexplained
,
might give the reader reason to suppose. It will
be remembered that there was a till to the chest which
had not been examined by the deacon. This till contained
an old mutilated journal, not of the last, but of one or two
Vol. I.  9
of the earlier voyages of the deceased; though it had
detached
entries that evidently referred to different and
distant
periods of time. By dint of study, and by putting
together sundry entries that at first sight might not be
supposed
to have any connection with each other, the present
possessor of that chest had obtained what he deemed to be
very sufficient clues to his uncle's two great secrets. There
were also in the chest several loose pieces of paper, on
which there were rude attempts to make charts of all the
islands and keys in question, giving their relative positions
as it respected their immediate neighbours, but in no
instance
giving the latitudes and longitudes. In addition to
these significant proofs that the reports brought through
the two masters were not without a foundation, there was
an unfinished letter, written by the deceased, and addressed
as a sort of legacy, to any, or all of Martha's Vineyard,
of the name of Daggett. This address was sufficiently
wide, including, probably, some hundreds of persons; a
clan in fact; but it was also sufficiently significant. The
individual into whose hands it first fell, being of the name,
read it first, as a matter of course, when he carefully folded
it up, and placed it in a pocket-book which he was much
in the habit of carrying in his own pocket. On what
principle
this letter, unfinished and without a signature, with
nothing indeed but its general and comprehensive address
to point out its origin as well as its destination, was thus
appropriated to the purposes of a single individual, we
shall not stop to inquire. Such was the fact, however, and
none connected with the equipment of the Sea Lion, of
Holmes' Hole, knew anything of the existence of that
document, its present possessor excepted. He looked it
over occasionally, and deemed the information it conveyed
of no trifling import, under all the circumstances of the
case.
Both the enterprises of which we have given an opening
account were perfectly characteristic of the state of society
in which they were brought into existence. Deacon Pratt,
if he had any regular calling, was properly a husbandman,
though the love of money had induced him to invest his
cash in nearly every concern around him, which promised
remunerating returns. The principal owners of the Sea
Lion, of Holmes' Hole, were husbandmen also; folk who
literally tilled the earth, cradled their own oats and rye,
and mowed their own meadows. Notwithstanding, neither
of these men, those of the Vineyard any more than he of
Oyster Pond, had hesitated about investing of his means
in a maritime expedition, just as if they were all regular
ship-owners of the largest port in the Union. With such
men, it is only necessary to exhibit an account with a fair
prospect of large profits, and they are ever ready to enter
into the adventure, heart, hand, and pocket. Last season,
it may have been to look for whales on the coast of Japan;
the season before that, to search for islands frequented by
the seals; this season, possibly, to carry a party out to
hunt for camelopards, set nets for young lions, and beat
up the quarters of the rhinoceros on the plains of Africa;
while the next, they may be transporting ice from Long
Pond to Calcutta and Kingston  not to say to London
itself. Of such materials are those descendants of the
Puritans composed; a mixture of good and evil; of the
religion which clings to the past, in recollection rather
than in feeling, mingled with a worldly-mindedness that
amounts nearly to rapacity; all cloaked and rendered
decent
by a conventional respect for duties, and respectable
and useful, by frugality, enterprise, and untiring activity.
Roswell Gardiner had not mistaken the persons of those
in the boat. They proved to be Phil Hazard, his first
officer; Tim Green, the second mate; and the two sealers
whom it had cost so much time and ingenuity to obtain.
Although neither of the mates even suspected the truth,
no sooner had they engaged the right sort of man than he
was tampered with by the agents of the Martha's Vineyard
concern, and spirited away by means of more tempting
proposals, before he had got quite so far as to sign the
articles. One of the motives for sending Watson across to
Oyster Pond had been to induce Captain Gardiner to
believe
he had engaged so skilful a hand, which would
effectually
prevent his attempting to procure another, until, at
the last moment, he might find himself unable to put to
sea for the want of a complement. A whaling or a sealing
voyage requires that the vessel should take out with her the
particular hands necessary to her specific object, though,
of late years, the seamen have got so much in the habit
of `running,' especially in the Pacific, that it is only the
craft that strictly belong to what may be termed the whaling
communities, that bring back with them the people they
carry out, and not always them.
But here had Roswell Gardiner his complement full,
and nearly everything ready to sea. He had only to go up
to the Harbour and obtain his clearance, have a short
interview
with his owner, a longer with Mary, and be off for
the antarctic circle, if indeed the ice would allow him to
get as far south. There were now sixteen souls on board
the Sea Lion, a very sufficient number for the voyage on
which she was about to sail. The disposition or rating of
the crew was as follows, viz.
1. Roswell Gardiner, master.
2. Philip Hazard, chief mate.
3. Timothy Green, second do.
4. David Weeks, carpenter.
5. Nathan Thompson, seaman.
6. Sylvester Havens, do.
7. Marcus Todd, do.
8. Hiram Flint, do.
9. Joshua Short, seaman.
10. Stephen Stimson, do.
11. Barlett Davidson, do.
12. Peter Mount, landsman.
13. Arcularius Mott, do.
14. Robert Smith, do.
15. Cato Livingston, cook.
16. Primus Floyd, boy.
This was considered a good crew, on the whole. Every
man was a native American, and most of them belonged to
old Suffolk. Thompson, and Flint, and Short, and
Stimson
,
four capital fellows in their way, came from the main;
the last, it was said, from as far east as Kennebunk. No
matter; they were all reasonably young, hale, active
fellows
,
with a promise of excellent service about every man
of them. Livingston and Floyd were coloured persons,
who bore the names of the two respectable families in
which they or their progenitors had formerly been slaves.
Weeks was accustomed to the sea, and might have been
rated indifferently as a carpenter or as a mariner. Mount
and Mott, though shipped as landsmen, were a good deal
accustomed to the water also, having passed each two
seasons
in coasters, though neither had ever yet been really
outside,
or seen blue water.
It would not have been easy to give to the Sea Lion
a more efficient crew; yet there was scarce a real
seaman
belonging to hera man who could have been made
a captain of the forecastle on board a frigate or a ship
of the line. Even Gardiner, the best man in his little
craft in nearly every respect, was deficient in many
attainments
that mark the thorough sea-dog. He would have
been remarkable anywhere for personal activity, for
courage
,
readiness, hardihood, and all those qualities which
render a man useful in the business to which he properly
belong; but he could hardly be termed a skilful
leadsman
,
knew little of the finesse of his calling, and was
wanting in that in-and-in breeding which converts habit
into an instinct, and causes the thorough seaman to do the
right thing, blow high or blow low, in the right way, and
at the right moment. In all these respects, however, he
was much the best man on board; and he was so superior
to the rest as fully to command all their respect. Stimson
was probably the next best seaman, after the master.
The day succeeding that on which the Sea Lion
received
the remainder of her people, Roswell Gardiner went
up to the Harbour, where he met Deacon Pratt, by
appointment
.
The object was to clear the schooner out,
which could be done only at that place. Mary
accompanied
her uncle, to transact some of her own little domestic
business; and it was then arranged between the parties,
that the deacon should make his last visit to his vessel in
the return-boat of her master, while Roswell Gardiner
should take Mary back to Oyster Pond, in the whale-boat
that had brought her and her uncle over. As Baiting Joe,
as usual, had acted as ferryman, it was necessary to get
rid of him, the young sailor desiring to be alone with Mary.
This was easily enough effected, by a present of a quarter
of a dollar. The boat having two lugg sails, and the wind
being light and steady, at south-west, there was nothing to
conflict with Roswell Gardiner's wishes.
The young sailor left the wharf at Sag Harbour about
ten minutes after the deacon had preceded him, on his way
to the schooner. As the wind was so light and so fair, he
soon had his sheets in, and the boat gliding along at an
easy rate, which permitted him to bestow nearly all his
attention
on his charming companion. Roswell Gardiner
had sought this occasion, that he might once more open
his heart to Mary, and urge his suit for the last time,
previously
9*
to so long an absence. This he did in a manly,
frank way, that was far from being unpleasant to his gentle
listener, whose inclinations, for a few minutes, blinded her
to the resolutions already made on principle. So urgent
was her suitor, indeed, that she should solemnly plight her
faith to him, ere he sailed, that a soft illusion came over
the mind of one as affectionate as Mary, and she was
half-inclined
to believe her previous determination was
unjustifiable
and obdurate. But the head of one of her high
principles
,
and clear views of duty, could not long be deceived
by her heart, and she regained the self-command which
had hitherto sustained her in all her former trials, in
connection
with this subject.
Perhaps it would have been better, Roswell, she said,
had I taken leave of you at the Harbour, and not incurred
the risk of the pain that I foresee I shall both give and
bear, in our present discourse. I have concealed nothing
from you; possibly I have been more sincere than prudence
would sanction. You know the only obstacle there is to
our union; but that appears to increase in strength, the
more I ask you to reflect on itto try to remove it.
What would you have me do, Mary! Surely, not to
play the hypocrite, and profess to believe that which I
certainly
do not, and which, after all my inquiries, I
cannot
believe.
I am sorry it is so, on every account, returned Mary,
in a low and saddened tone. Sorry, that one of so frank,
ingenuous a mind, should find it impossible to accept the
creed of his fathers, and sorry that it must leave so
impassable
a chasm between us, for ever.
No, Mary; that can never be! Nothing but death
can separate us for so long a time! While we meet, we
shall at least be friends; and friends love to meet and to
see each other often.
It may seem unkind, at a moment like this, Roswell,
but it is in truth the very reverse, if I say we ought not to
meet each other here, if we are bent on following our own
separate ways towards a future world. My God is not your
God; and what can there be of peace in a family, when its
two heads worship different deities? I am afraid that you
do not think sufficiently of the nature of these things.
I did not believe you to be so illiberal, Mary! Had
the deacon said as much, I might not have been surprised;
but, for one like you to tell me that my God is not your
God, is narrow, indeed!
Is it not so, Roswell? And, if so, why should we
attempt
to gloss over the truth by deceptive words? I am a
believer in the Redeemer, as the Son of God; as one of
the Holy Trinity; while you believe in him only as a man
a righteous and just, a sinless man, if you will, but as a
man only. Now, is not the difference in these creeds
immense
?
Is it not, in truth, just the difference between
God and man? I worship my Redeemer; regard him as
the equal of the Fatheras a part of that Divine Being;
while you look on him as merely a man without sinas a
man such as Adam probably was before the fall.
Do we know enough of these matters, Mary, to justify
us in allowing them to interfere with our happiness?
We are told that they are all-essential to our happiness
not in the sense you may mean, Roswell, but in one of
far higher importand we cannot neglect them, without
paying the penalty.
I think you carry these notions too far, dearest Mary,
and that it is possible for man and wife most heartily to
love each other, and to be happy in each other, without
their thinking exactly alike on religion. How many good
and pious women do you see, who are contented and
prosperous
as wives and mothers, and who are members of
meeting, but whose husbands make no profession of any
sort!
That may be true, or not. I lay no claim to a right
to judge of any other's duties, or manner of viewing what
they ought to do. Thousands of girls marry without
feeling
the very obligations that they profess to reverence; and
when, in after life, deeper convictions come, they cannot
cast aside the connections they have previously formed, if
they would; and probably would not, if they could. That
is a different thing from a young woman, who has a deep
sense of what she owes to her Redeemer, becoming
deliberately
,
and with a full sense of what she is doing, the wife
of one who regards her God as merely a manI care not
how you qualify this opinion, by saying a pure and sinless
man; it will be man, still. The difference between God
and man is too immense, to be frittered away by any such
qualifications as that.
But, if I find it
impossible
to believe all you believe,
Mary, surely you would not punish me for having the
sincerity
to tell you the truth, and the whole truth.
No, indeed, Roswell, answered the honest girl, gently,
not to say tenderly. Nothing has given me a better
opinion
of your principles, Roswella higher notion of what
your upright and frank character reany is, than the manly
way in which you have admitted the justice of my
suspicions
of your want of faithof faith, as I consider faith can
alone exist. This fair dealing has made me honour you,
and esteem you, in addition to the more girlish attachment
that I do not wish to conceal from you, at least, I have so
long felt.
Blessed Mary! exclaimed Roswell Gardiner, almost
ready to fall down on his knees and worship the pretty
enthusiast
,
who sat at his side, with a countenance in which
intense interest in his welfare was beaming from two of the
softest and sweetest blue eyes that maiden ever bent on a
youth in modest tenderness, whatever disposition he might
be in to accept her God as his God. How can one so kind
in all other respects, prove so cruel in this one particular!
Because that one particular, as you term it, Roswell,
is all in all to her, answered the girl, with a face that was
now flushed with feeling. I must answer you as Joshua
told the Israelites of old`Choose you, this day, whom
you will serve; whether the gods which your fathers served,
that were on the other side of the flood, or the gods of the
Amorites, in whose land ye dwell:
but as for me and my
house, we will serve the Lord
.'
Do you class me with the idolaters and pagans of
Palestine
?
demanded Gardiner, reproachfully.
You have said it, Roswell. It is not I, but yourself,
who have thus classed you. You worship your reason,
instead of the one true and living God. This is idolatry
of the worst character, since the idol is never seen by the
devotee, and he does not know of its existence.
You consider it then idolatry for one to use those gifts
which he has received from his Maker, and to treat the
most important of all subjects, as a rational being, instead
of receiving a creed blindly, and without thought?
If what you call thought could better the matter; if it
were sufficient to comprehend and master this subject,
there might be force in what you say. But what is this
boasted reason, after all? It is not sufficient to explain a
single mystery of the creation, though there are thousands.
I know there are, nay there
must
be, a variety of opinions
among those who look to their reasons, instead of
accepting
the doctrine of revelation, for the character of Christ;
but I believe all, who are not open infidels, admit that the
atonement of his death was sufficient for the salvation of
men: now, can you explain this part of the theory of our
religion any more than you can explain the divine nature
of the Redeemer? Can you
reason
any more wisely
touching
the fall, than touching the redemption itself? I know
I am unfit to treat of matters of this profound nature,
continued
Mary, modestly, though with great earnestness and
beauty of manner; but, to me, it seems very plain that
the instant circumstances lead us beyond the limits of our
means of comprehension, we are to
believe
in, and not to
reason on, revelation. The whole history of Christianity
teaches this. Its first ministers were uneducated men;
men who were totally ignorant until enlightened by their
faith; and all the lessons it teaches are to raise faith, and
faith in the Redeemer, high above all other attainments,
as the one great acquisition that includes and colours every
other. When such is the fact, the heart does not make a
stumbling-block of every thing that the head cannot
understand
.
I do not know how it is, answered Roswell Gardiner,
influenced, though unconvinced; but when I talk with
you on this subject, Mary, I cannot do justice to my
opinions
,
or to the manner in which I reason on them with
my male friends and acquaintance. I confess it does
appear
to me illogical, unreasonableI scarce know how to
designate what I meanbut, improbable, that God should
suffer himself, or his Son, to be crucified by beings that
he himself created, or that he should feel a necessity for
any such course, in order to redeem beings he had himself
brought into existence.
If there be any argument in the last, Roswell, it is an
argument as much against the crucifixion of a man, as
against the crucifixion of one of the Trinity itself. I
understand
you to believe that such a being as Jesus of
Nazareth
did exist; that he was crucified for our redemption;
and that the atonement was accepted, and acceptable
before
God the Father. Now, is it not just as difficult to
understand how, or why, this should be, as to understand
the common creed of Christians?
Surely, there is a vast difference between the
crucifixion
of a subordinate being, and the crucifixion of one
who made a part of the Godhead itself, Mary! I can
imagine
the first, though I may not pretend to understand its
reasons, or why it was necessary it should be so; but, I
am certain you will not mistake my motive when I say, I
cannot imagine the other.
Make no apologies to me, Roswell; look rather to
that Dread Being whose teachings, through chosen
ministers
,
you disregard. As for what you say, I can fully feel
its truth. I do not pretend to
understand
why such a
sacrifice
should be necessary, but I
believe
it,
feel
it; and
believing and feeling it, I cannot but adore and worship
the Son, who quitted heaven to come on earth, and
suffered
,
that we might possess eternal life. It is all mystery
to me, as is the creation itself, our existence, God himself,
and all else that my mind is too limited to comprehend.
But, Roswell, if I believe a part of the teachings of the
Christian church, I must believe all. The apostles, who
were called by Christ in person, who lived in his very
presence
,
who knew nothing except as the Holy Spirit
prompted
,
worshipped him as the Son of God, as one `who thought
it not robbery to be equal with God;' and shall I, ignorant
and uninspired, pretend to set up my feeble means of
reasoning
,
in opposition to their written instructions!
Yet must each of us stand or fall by the means he
possesses
,
and the use he makes of them.
That is quite true, Roswell; and ask yourself the use
to which you put your own faculties. I do not deny that
we are to exercise our reason, but it is within the bounds
set for its exercise. We may examine the evidence of
Christianity, and determine for ourselves how far it is
supported
by reasonable and sufficient proofs; beyond this we
cannot be expected to go, else might we be required to
comprehend the mystery of our own existence, which just
as much exceeds our understanding as any other. We are
told that man was created in the image of his Creator,
which means that there is an immortal and spiritual part
of him that is entirely different from the material creature.
One perishes, temporarily at leasta limb can be severed
from the body and perish, even while the body survives;
but it is not so with that which has been created in the
image of the deity. That is imperishable, immortal,
spiritual
,
though doomed to dwell awhile in a tenement of
clay. Now, why is it more difficult to believe that pure
divinity may have entered into the person of one man, than
to
believe
, nay to
feel
, that the image of God has entered
into the persons of so many myriads of men? You not
only overlook all this, Roswell, but you commit the, to me
inexplicable, mistake of believing a part of a mystery, while
you hesitate about believing all. Were you to deny the
merits of the alonement altogether, your position would be
much stronger than it is in believing what you do. But,
Roswell, we will not embitter the moment of separation by
talking more on this subject, now. I have other things to
say to you, and but little time to say them in. The promise
you have asked of me to remain single until your return, I
most freely make. It costs me nothing to give you
this
pledge, since there is scarce a possibility of my ever
marrying
another.
Mary repeated these words, or rather this idea in other
words, to Roswell Gardiner's great delight; and again
and again he declared that he could now penetrate the
icy seas with a light heart, confident he should find her,
on his return, disengaged, and, as he hoped, as much
disposed
to regard him with interest as she then was.
Nevertheless
,
Gardiner did not deceive himself as to Mary's
intentions
.
He knew her and her principles too well, to
fancy that her resolution would be very likely to falter.
Notwithstanding their long and intimate knowledge of each
other, at no time had she ever betrayed a weakness that
promised to undermine her high sense of duty; and as time
increased her means of judging of what those duties were,
her submission to them seemed to be stronger and stronger.
Had there been anything stern or repulsive in Mary's
manner
of manifesting the feeling that was uppermost in her
mind, one of Roswell Gardiner's temperament would have
been very apt to shake off her influence; but, so far from
this being the case, she ever met him and parted from him
with a gentle and ingenuous interest in his welfare, and
occasionally with much womanly tenderness. He knew
that she prayed for him daily, as fervently as she prayed for
herself; and even this, he hoped, would serve to keep alive
her interest in him, during his absence. In this respect
our young sailor showed no bad comprehension of human
nature, nothing being more likely to maintain an influence
of this sort, than the conviction that on ourselves depends
the happiness or interests of the person beloved.
CHAPTER VIII.
And I have loved thee, Ocean! and my joy
Of youthful sports was on thy breast to be
Borne, like thy bubbles, on ward; from a boy
I wanton'd with thy breakersthey to me
Were a delight; and if the freshening sea
Made them a terror'twas a pleasing fear;
For I was, as it were, a child of thee,
And trusted to thy billows, far and near,
And laid my hand upon thy maneas I do here.
Byron
.
It
was past the turn of the day when Roswell Gardiner
reached his vessel, after having carefully and with manly
interest in all that belonged to her, seen Mary to her home,
and taken his final leave of her. Of that parting we shall
say but little. It was touching and warm-hearted, and it
was rendered a little solemn by Mary Pratt's putting into
her lover's hand a pocket-bible, with an earnest request
that he would not forget to consult its pages. She added,
at the same time, that she had carefully marked those
passages which she wished him most to study and reflect
on. The book was accepted in the spirit in which it was
offered, and carefully placed in a little case that contained
about a hundred volumes of different works.
As the hour approached for lifting the anchor, the
neivousness
of the deacon became very apparent to the
commander
of his schooner. At each instant the former was
at the latter's elbow, making some querulous suggestion,
or asking a question that betrayed the agitated and
unsettled
state of his mind. It really seemed as if the old man,
at the last moment, had not the heart to part with his
property
,
or to trust it out of his sight. All this annoyed
Roswell Gardiner, disposed as he was, at that instant, to
regard every person and thing that in any manner
pertained
to Mary Pratt, with indulgence and favour.
You will be particular about them islands, Captain
Gar'ner, and not get the schooner ashore, said the deacon,
for the tenth time at least. They tell me the tide runs
like a horse in the high latitudes, and that seamen are
often stranded by them, before they know where they are.
Ay, ay, sir; I'll try and bear it in mind, answered
Gardiner, vexed at being importuned so often to recollect
that which there was so little likelihood of his forgetting;
I am an old cruiser in those seas, deacon, and know all
about the tides. Well, Mr. Hazard, what is the news of
the anchor?
We are short, sir, and only wait for orders to go on,
and get clear of the ground.
Trip, at once, sir; and so farewell to America  or to
this end of it, at least.
Then the keys, they tell me, are dangerous
navigation
,
Gar'ner, and a body needs have all his eyes about
him.
All places have their dangers to your sleepy navigator,
deacon; but the man who keeps his eyes open has little to
fear. Had you given us a chronometer, there would not
have been one-half the risk there will be without one.
This had been a bone of contention between the master
of the Sea Lion and his owner. Chronometers were not,
by any means, in as general use at the period of our tale
as they are to-day; and the deacon abhorred the expense to
Vol. I.  10
which such an article would have put him. Could he have
got one at a fourth of the customary price he might have
been tempted; but it formed no part of his principles of
saving to anticipate and prevent waste by liberality.
No sooner was the schooner released from the ground
than her sails were filled, and she went by the low spit of
sand already mentioned, with the light south-west breeze
still blowing in her favour, and an ebb tide. Everything
appeared propitious, and no vessel probably ever left home
under better omens. The deacon remained on board until
Baiting Joe, who was to act as his boatman, reminded him
of the distance and the probability that the breeze would
go down entirely with the sun. As it was, they had to
contend with wind and tide, and it would require all his
own knowledge of the eddles to get the whale-boat up to
Oyster Pond in anything like reasonable time. Thus
admonished
,
the owner tore himself away from his beloved
craft, giving young Gar'ner as many `last words' as if
he were about to be executed. Roswell had a last word on
his part, however, in the shape of a message to Mary.
Tell Mary, deacon, said the young sailor, in an aside,
that I rely on her promise, and that I shall think of her,
whether it be under the burning sun of the line, or among
the ice of the antarctic.
Yes, yes; that's as it should be, answered the deacon,
heartily. I like your perseverance, Gar'ner, and hope
the gal will come round yet, and I shall have you for a
nephew
.
There's nothing that takes the women's minds like
money. Fill up the schooner with skins and ile, and bring
back that treasure, and you make as sure of Mary for a
wife as if the parson had said the benediction over you.
Such was Deacon Pratt's notion of his niece, as well as
of the female sex. For months he regarded this speech as
a
coup de maitre
, while Roswell Gardiner forgot it in half
an hour; so much better than the uncle did the lover
comprehend
the character of the niece.
The Sea Lion, of Oyster Pond, had now cast off the last
ligament which connected her with the land. She had no
pilot, none being necessary, or usual, in those waters; all
that a vessel had to do being to give Long Island a
sufficient
berth in rounding its eastern extremity. The boat
was soon shut in by Gardiner's Island, and thenceforth
nothing
remained but the ties of feeling to connect those
bold adventurers with their native country. It is true that
Connecticut, and subsequently Rhode Island, was yet
visible
on one hand, and a small portion of New York on the
other; but as darkness came to close the scene, even that
means of communication was soon virtually cut off. The
light on Montauk, for hours, was the sole beacon for these
bold mariners, who rounded it about midnight, fairly
meeting
the long, rolling swell of the broad Atlantic. Then the
craft might be said to be at sea for the first time.
The Sea Lion was found to perform well. She had been
constructed with an eye to comfort, as well as to sailing,
and possessed that just proportion in her hull which carried
her over the surface of the waves like a duck. This quality
is of more importance to a small than to a large vessel, for
the want of momentum renders what is termed burying
a very deadening process to a light craft. In this very
important
particular Roswell was soon satisfied that the
ship-wright
had done his duty.
As the wind still stood at south-west, the schooner was
brought upon an easy bowline, as soon as she had Montauk
light dead to windward. This new course carried her out
to sea, steering south-south-east, a little easterly, under
everything that would draw. The weather appearing
settled
,
and there being no signs of a change, Gardiner now
went below and turned in, leaving the care of the vessel
to the proper officer of the watch, with an order to call
him at sunrise. Fatigue soon asserted its power, and the
young man was shortly in as profound a sleep as if he had
not just left a mistress whom he almost worshipped for an
absence of two years, and to go on a voyage that probably
would expose him to more risks and suffering than any
other enterprise then attempted by sea-faring men. Our
young sailor thought not of the last at all, but he fell asleep
dreaming of Mary.
The master of the Sea Lion of Oyster Pond was called
precisely at the hour he had named. Five minutes sufficed
to bring him on deck, where he found everything as he
had left it, with the exception of the schooner itself. In
the six hours he had been below, his vessel had moved her
position out to sea nearly forty miles. No land was now to
be seen, the American coast being very tame and
unpicturesque
to the eye, as the purest patriot, if he happen to
know anything of other parts of the world, must be
constrained
to admit. A low, monotonous coast, that is scarcely
visible at a distance of five leagues, is certainly not to be
named in the same breath with those glorious shores of the
Mediterranean, for instance, where nature would seem to
have exhausted herself in uniting the magnificent with the
bewitching. On this continent, or on our own portion of
it at least, we must be content with the useful, and lay no
great claims to the beautiful; the rivers and bays giving
us some compensation in their admirable commercial
facilities
,
for the sameness, not to say tameness, of the views.
We mention these things in passing, as a people that does
not understand its relative position in the scale of nations,
is a little apt to fall into errors that do not contribute to its
character or respectability; more especially when they
exhibit a self-love founded altogether on ignorance, and
which has been liberally fed by flattery.
The first thing a seaman does on coming on deck, after
a short absence, is to look to windward, in order to see
how the wind stands, and what are the prospects of the
weather. Then he turns his eyes aloft to ascertain what
canvass is spread, and how it draws. Occasionally, the
order of these observations is changed, the first look being
sometimes bestowed on the sails, and the second on the
clouds. Roswell Gardiner, however, cast his first glance
this morning towards the southward and westward, and
perceived that the breeze promised to be steady. On
looking
aloft, he was well satisfied with the manner in which
everything drew; then he turned to the second mate, who
had the watch, whom he addressed cheerfully, and with a
courtesy that is not always observed among sailors.
A fine morning, sir, said Roswell Gardiner, and a
good-bye to America. We've a long road to travel, Mr.
Green, but we've a fast boat to do it in. Here is an offing
ready made to our hands. Nothing in sight to the westward;
not so much as a coaster, even! It's too early for the
outward-bound
craft of the last ebb, and too late for those that
sailed the tide before. I never saw this bight of the coast
clearer of canvass.
Ay, ay, sir; it does seem empty, like. Here's a chap,
however, to leeward, who appears inclined to try his rate
of sailing with us. Here he is, sir, a very little abaft the
beam; and, as near as I can make him out, he's a
fore-tawsail
schooner, of about our own dimensions; if you'll
just look at him through this glass, Captain Gar'ner, you'll
see he has not only our rig, but our canvass set.
You are right enough, Mr. Green, returned Roswell,
after getting his look. He is a schooner of about our
tonnage, and under precisely our canvass. How long has
the fellow bore as he does now?
He came out from under Blok Island a few hours
since, and we made him by moonlight. The question with
me is, where did that chap come from? A Stunnin'ton
man would have naturally passed to windward of Blok
Island; and a Newport or Providence fellow would not
have fetched so far to windward without making a stretch
or two on purpose. That schooner has bothered me ever
since it was daylight; for I can't place him where he is
by any traverse my poor l'arnin' can work!
She does seem to be out of her way. Possibly it is a
schooner beating up for the Hook, and finding herself too
close in, she is standing to the southward to get an offing
again.
Not she, sir. She came out from behind Blok, and a
craft of her size that wanted to go to the westward, and
which found itself so close in, would have taken the first
of the flood and gone through the Race like a shot. No,
no, Captain Gar'ner; this fellow is bound south as well as
ourselves, and it is quite onaccountable how he should be
just where he isso far to windward, or so far to leeward,
as a body might say. A south-south-east course, from any
place behind Point Judith, would have taken him off near
No Man's Land, and here he is almost in a line with Blok
Island!
Perhaps he is out of New London, or some of the ports
on the main, and being bound to the West Indies he has
been a little careless about weathering the island. It's no
great matter, after all.
10*
It is some such matter, Captain Gar'ner, as walkin'
round a meetin'-'us' when your ar'n'd is in at the door in
front. But there was no such craft in at Stunnin'tun or
New London, as I know from havin' been at both places
within the last eight-and-forty hours.
You begin to make me as curious about this fellow as
you seem to be yourself, sir. And now I think the matter
all over, it is somewhat extr'or'nary he should be just where
he is. It is, however, a very easy thing to get a nearer look
at him, and it's no great matter to us, intending as we do
to make the islands off the Cape de Verde, if we do lose a
little of our weatherly positionkeep the schooner away a
point, and get a small pull on your weather braces  give
her a little sheet too, fore and aft, sir. So, that will do
keep her steady at thatsouth-east and by south. In two
hours we shall just about speak this out-of-the-way joker.
As every command was obeyed, the Sea Lion was soon
running off free, her bowlines hanging loose, and all her
canvass a rap full. The change in her line of sailing
brought the sail to leeward, a little forward of her beam;
but the movement of the vessel that made the freest wind
was consequently the most rapid. In the course of half
an hour the stranger was again a little abaft the beam, and
he was materially nearer than when first seen. No change
was made in the route of the stranger, who now seemed
disposed to stand out to sea, with the wind as it was, on
an easy bowline, without paying any attention to the sail
in sight.
It was noon ere the two schooners came within hail of
each other. Of course, as they drew nearer and nearer,
it was possible for those on board of each to note the
appearance
,
equipments, and other peculiarities of his
neighbour
.
In size, there was no apparent difference between
the vessels, and there was a somewhat remarkable
resemblance
in the details.
That fellow is no West India drogger, said Roswell
Gardiner, when less than a mile from the stranger. He
carries a boat on deck, as we do, and has one on each
quarter, too. Can it be possible that he is bound after
seals, as well as we are ourselves!
I believe you're right, sir, answered Hazard, the
chief-mate, who was now on deck. There's a sealing
look about the gentleman, if I know my own complexion.
It's odd enough, Captain Gar'ner, that two of us should
come together, out here in the offing, and both of us bound
to the other end of the 'arth!
There is nothing so very remarkable in
that
, Mr.
Hazard
,
when we remember that the start must be properly
timed for those who wish to be off Cape Horn in the
summer
season. We shall neither of us get there much before
December, and I suppose the master of yon schooner knows
that as well as I do myself. The position of this craft
puzzles me far more than anything else about her. From
what port can a vessel come, that she should be just here,
with the wind at south-west?
Ay, sir, put in Green, who was moving about the
decks, coiling ropes and clearing things away, that's
what I tell the chief-mate. Where can a craft come from,
to be just here, with this wind, if she don't come from
Stunnin'tun. Even from Stunnin'tun she'd be out of her
way; but no such vessel has been in that port any time
these six weeks. Here, you Stimson, come this way a bit.
Didn't you tell me something of having seen a schooner at
New Bedford, that was about our build and burthen, and
that you understood had been bought for a sealer?
Ay, ay, sir, answered Stimson, as bluff an old
sea-dog
as ever flattened in a jib-sheet, and that's the craft,
as I'm a thinkin', Mr. Green. She had an animal for a
figure-head, and that craft has an animal, as well as I can
judge, at this distance.
You are right enough there, Stephen, cried Roswell
Gardiner, and that animal is a seal. It's the twin-brother
of the sea lion we carry under our own bowsprit. There's
some proof in that, tastes agree sometimes, even if they do
differ generally. What became of the schooner you saw?
I heard, sir, that she was bought up by some Vineyard
men, and was taken across to Hum'ses Hull. They
sometimes
fit out a craft there, as well as on the main. I should
have crossed myself to see what they was at, but I fell in
with Mr. Green, and shipped aboard here.
An adventure by which, I hope, you will not be a loser,
my hearty, put in the captain. And you think that is
the craft which was built at New Bedford, and fitted out
on the Vineyard?
Sartain of it, sir; for I know the figure-head, and all
about her build.
Hand me the trumpet, Mr. Green; we shall soon be
near enough for a hail, and it will be easy to learn the
truth.
Roswell Gardiner waited a few minutes for the two
schooners to close, and was in the very act of applying the
trumpet to his mouth, when the usual salutation was sent
across the water from the stranger. During the
conversation
that now took place, the vessels gradually drew nearer
to each other, until both parties laid aside their trumpets,
and carried on the discourse with the unaided voice.
Schooner, ahoy! was the greeting of the stranger, and
a simple Hilloa! the answer.
What schooner is that, pray?
The Sea Lion, of Oyster Pond, Long Island; bound
to the southward, after seal, as I suppose you know by our
outfit.
When did you leave Oyster Pondand how did you
leave your owner, the good Deacon Pratt?
We sailed yesterday afternoon, on the first of the ebb,
and the deacon left us as we weighed anchor. He was
well, and full of hope for our luck. What schooner is that,
pray?
The Sea Lion, of Hum'ses Hull; bound to the
southward
,
after seals, as you probably knew by
our
outfit. Who
commands that schooner?
Captain Roswell Gar'nerwho commands aboard you,
pray?
Captain Jason Daggett, showing himself more plainly,
by moving out of the line of the main-rigging. I had
the pleasure of seeing you when I was on the P'int,
looking
after my uncle's dunnage, you may remember, Captain
Gar'ner. 'T was but the other day, and you are not likely
to have forgotten my visit.
Not at all, not at all, Captain Daggett; though I had
no idea,
then
, that you intended to make a voyage to the
southward so soon. When did you leave the Hole, sir?
Day before yesterday, a'ternoon. We came out of the
Hull about five o'clock.
How had you the wind, sir?
Sou'-west, and sou'-west and by south. There has
been but little change in that, these three days.
Roswell Gardiner muttered something to himself; but
he did not deem it prudent to utter the thoughts, that were
just then passing through his mind, aloud.
Ay, ay, he answered, after a moment's pause, the
wind has stood there the whole week; but I think we shall
shortly get a change. There is an easterly feeling in the
air.
Waal, let it come. With this offing, we could clear
Hatteras with anything that wasn't worse than a
south-easter
.
There's a southerly set, in here, down the coast,
for two or three hundred miles.
A heavy south-easter would jam us in, here, between
the shoals, in a way I shouldn't greatly relish, sir. I like
always to get to the eastward of the Stream, as soon as I
can, in running off the land.
Very true, Captain Gar'nervery true, sir. It
is
best
to get outside the Stream, if a body
can
. Once there, I
call a craft at sea. Eight-and-forty hours more of this wind
would just about carry us there. Waal, sir, as we're bound
on the same sort of v'y'ge, I'm happy to have fallen in with
you; and I see no reason why we should not be
neighbourly
,
and `gam' it a little, when we've nothing better to
do. I like that schooner of yours so well, that I've made
my own to look as nearly resembling her as I could. You
see our paint is exactly the same.
I have observed that, Captain Daggett; and you might
say the same of the figure-heads.
Ay, ay; when I was over on the P'int, they told me
the name of the carver, in Boston, who cut your seal, and
I sent to him to cut me a twin. If they lay in a
ship-yard
,
side by side, I don't think you could tell one from
the other.
So it seems, sir. Pray haven't you a man aboard there
of the name of Watson?
Ay, ay  he's my second-mate. I know what you
mean, Captain Gar'neryou're right enough, 'tis the same
hand who was aboard you; but wanting a second officer,
I offered him the berth, and he thought that better than
taking a foremast lay in your craft.
This explanation probably satisfied all who heard it,
though the truth was not more than half told. In point of
fact, Watson was engaged as Daggett's second mate
before
he had ever laid eyes on Roswell Gardiner, and had been
sent to watch the progress of the work on Oyster Pond, as
has been previously stated. It was so much in the natural
order of events for a man to accept preferment when
offered
,
however, that even Gardiner himself blamed the
delinquent
for the desertion far less than he had previously
done. In the mean time the conversation proceeded.
You told us nothing of your having that schooner
fitting
,
when you were on the Point, observed Roswell
Gardiner
,
whose thoughts just then happened to advert to this
particular fact.
My mind was pretty much taken up with the affairs
of my poor uncle, I suppose, Captain Gar'ner. Death must
visit each of us, once; nevertheless, it makes us all
melancholy
when he comes among friends.
Now, Roswell Gardiner was not in the least sentimental,
nor had he the smallest turn towards indulging in moral
inferences, from ordinary events; but, this answer seemed
so proper, that it found no objection in his mind. Still,
the young man had his suspicions on the subject of the
equipment of the other schooner, and suspicions that were
now active and keen, and which led him directly to fancy
that Daggett had also some clue to the very objects he was
after himself. Singular as it may seem at first, Deacon
Pratt's interests were favourably affected by this unexpected
meeting with the Sea Lion of Holmes' Hole. From the
first, Roswell Gardiner had been indisposed to give full
credit to the statements of the deceased mariner, ascribing
no small part of his account to artifice, stimulated by a
desire to render himself important. But, now that he found
one of this man's family embarked in an enterprise similar
to his own, his views of its expediency were sensibly
changed. Perfectly familiar with the wary economy with
which every interest was regulated in that part of the world,
he did not believe a company of Martha's Vineyard men
would risk their money in an enterprise that they had not
good reasons for believing would succeed. Although it
exceeded his means to appreciate fully the information
possessed
by the Vineyard folk, and covetousness did not
quicken his faculties on this subject, as they had quickened
those of the deacon, he could see enough to satisfy his
mind that either the sealing-islands, or the booty of the
pirates
,
or both, had a reality, in the judgments of others,
which had induced them also to risk their money in
turning
their knowledge to account. The effect of this
conviction
was very natural. It induced Roswell to regard the
charts, and his instructions, and all connected with his
voyage, as much more serious matters than he had
originally
been inclined to do. Until now, he had thought it
well enough to let the deacon have his fancies, relying on
his own ability to obtain a cargo for the schooner, by
visiting
sealing stations where he had been before; but, now,
he determined to steer at once for Daggett's Islands, as he
and his owner named the land revealed to them, and
ascertain
what could be done there. He thought it probable
the other Sea Lion might wish to keep him company; but
the distance was so great, that a hundred occasions must
occur when it would be in his power to shake off such a
consort, should be deem it necessary.
For several hours the two schooners stood on in
company
,
keeping just without hailing distance apart, and
sailing so nearly alike as to render it hard to say which
craft had the best of it. There was nothing remarkable in
the fact that two vessels, built for the same trade, should
have a close general resemblance to each other; but it was
not common to find them so moulded, stowed, sparred and
handled, that their rate of sailing should be nearly identical.
If there was any difference, it was slightly in favour of the
Sea Lion of the Vineyard, which rather drew ahead of her
consort, if consort the other Sea Lion could be termed, in
the course of the afternoon.
It is scarcely necessary to say that many were the
speculations
that were made on board these rival vessels
competitors
now for the commonest glories of their pursuits, as
well as in the ultimate objects of their respective voyages.
On the part of Roswell Gardiner and his two mates, they
did not fail, in particular, to comment on the singularity
of the circumstance that the Sea Lion, of the Vineyard,
should be so far out of her direct line of sailing.
Although we have had the wind at sow-west (
sow
west always, as pronounced by every seaman, from the
Lord High Admiral of England, when there happens to be
such a functionary, down to the greenest hand on board
the greenest sealer) for these last few days, said Hazard,
anybody can see we shall soon have easterly weather.
There's an easterly feel in the air, and all last night the
water had an easterly glimmer about it. Now, why a man
who came out of the Vineyard Sound, and who had
nothing
to do but just to clear the west eend of his own
island, and then lay his course off yonder to the southward
and eastward, should bear up cluss (Anglic, close) under
Blok, and stretch out to sea, for all the world as if he was
a Stunnin'tun chap, or a New Lunnoner, that had fallen a
little to leeward, is more than I can understand, Captain
Gar'ner! Depend on it, sir, there's a reason for't. Men
don't put schooners into the water, now-a-days, and give
them costly outfits, with three whale-boats, and sealin' gear
in abundance, just for the fun of making fancy traverses,
on or off a coast, like your yacht gentry, who never know
what they would be at, and who never make a v'y'ge worth
speaking on.
I have been turning all this over in my mind, Mr.
Hazard, answered the young master, who was amusing
himself at the moment with strapping a small block, while
he threw many a glance at the vessel that was just as close
under his lee as comported with her sailing. There is a
reason for it, as you say; but, I can find no other than the
fact that she has come so much out of her way, in order
to fall in with
us;
knowing that we were to come round
Montauk at a particular time.
Well, sir, that may have been her play! Men bound
the same way often wish to fall into good company, to make
the journey seem the shorter, by making it so much the
pleasanter.
Those fellows can never suppose the two schooners
will keep in sight of each other from forty-one degrees
north all the way to seventy south, or perhaps further
south still! If we remain near each other a week, 't will
be quite out of the common way.
I don't know that, sir. I was once in a sealer that, do
all she could, couldn't get shut of a curious neighbour.
When seals are scarce, and the master don't know where
to look for 'em, he is usually glad to drop into some vessel's
wake, if it be only to pick up her leavin's.
Outfits are not made on such chances as that. These
Vineyard people know where they are going as well as we
know ourselves; perhaps better.
There is great confidence aboard here, in the master,
Captain Gar'ner. I overheard the watch talking the matter
over early this morning; and there was but one opinion
among
them
, I can tell you, sir.
Which opinion was, Mr. Hazard
That a lay aboard this craft would be worth a lay and
a half aboard any other schooner out of all America!
Sailors go partly on skill and partly on luck. I've known
hands that wouldn't ship with the best masters that ever
sailed a vessel, if they didn't think they was lucky as well
as skilful.
Ay, ay, it's all
luck!
Little do these fellows think of
Providence
or of
deserving
, or
undeserving
. Well, I
hope the schooner will not disappoint themor her master
either. But, whaling and sealing, and trusting to the
chances of the ocean, and our most flattering hopes, may
mislead us after all.
Ay, ay, sir; nevertheless, Captain Gar'ner
has
a name,
and men will trust to it!
Our young master could not but be flattered at this,
which came at a favourable moment to sustain the
resolutions
awakened by the competition with the rival schooner.
Although so obviously competitors, and that in a matter of
trade, the interest which above all others is apt to make
men narrow-minded and hostile to each other, though the
axiom would throw this particular reproach on
doctors
,
there were no visible signs that the two vessels did not
maintain the most amicable relations. As the day advanced
the wind fell, and after many passages of nautical
compliments
,
by means of signals and the trumpet, Roswell
Gardiner fairly lowered a boat into the water, and
Vol. I.  11
went a gamming, as it is termed, on board the other
schooner.
Each of these little vessels was well provided with boats,
and those of the description in common use among whalers.
A whale-boat differs from the ordinary jolly-boat, launch,
or yawlgigs, barges, dinguis, &c. &c., being exclusively
for the service of vessels of warin the following
particulars
:
viz.  It is sharp at both ends, in order that it may
`back off,' as well as `pull on;' it steers with an oar,
instead
of with a rudder, in order that the bows may be
thrown round to avoid danger when not in motion; it is
buoyant, and made to withstand the shock of waves at
both ends; and it is light and shallow, though strong, that
it may be pulled with facility. When it is remembered that
one of these little egg-shells  little as vessels, though of
good size as boats  is often dragged through troubled
waters at the rate of ten or twelve knots, and frequently at
even a swifter movement, one can easily understand how
much depends on its form, buoyancy and strength. Among
seamen, it is commonly thought that a whale-boat is the
safest craft of the sort in which men can trust themselves
in rough water.
Captain Daggett received his guest with marked civility,
though in a quiet, eastern way. The rum and water were
produced, and a friendly glass was taken by one after the
other. The two masters drank to each other's success, and
many a conventional remark was made between them on
the subject of sea-lions, sea-elephants, and the modes of
capturing such animals. Even Watson, semi-deserter as
he was, was shaken cordially by the hand, and his
questionable
conduct overlooked. The ocean has many of the
aspects of eternity, and often disposes mariners to regard
their fellow-creatures with an expansiveness of feeling
suited
to their common situations. Its vastness reminds them
of the time that has neither beginning nor end; its
ceaseless
movement, of the never-tiring impulses of human
passions
;
and its accidents and dangers, of the Providence
which protects all alike, and which alone prevents our
being
abandoned to the dominion of chance.
Roswell Gardiner was a kind-hearted man, moreover,
and was inclined to judge his fellows leniently. Thus it
was that his good evening at parting, to Watson, was
just as frank and sincere as that he bestowed on Captain
Daggett himself.
CHAPTER IX.
Roll on, thon deep and dark blue oceanroll!
Ten thousand fleets sweep over thee in vain;
Man marks the earth with ruinhis control
Stops with the shore;upon the watery plain
The wrecks are all thy deeds, nor doth remain
A shadow of man's ravage, save his own,
When for a moment, like a drop of rain,
He sinks into thy depths with bubbling groan,
Without a grave, unknell'd, uncoffin'd, and unknown.
Byron
.
That
evening the sun set in clouds, though the eastern
horizon was comparatively clear. There was, however, an
unnatura! outline to objects, by which their dimensions
were increased, and in some degree rendered indefinite.
We do not know the reason why the wind at east should
produce these phenomena, nor do we remember ever to
have met with any attempt at a solution; but of the fact,
we are certain, by years of observation. In what is called
`easterly weather,' objects are seen through the medium of
a refraction that is entirely unknown in a clear
north-wester
;
the crests of the seas emit a luminous light that is
far more apparent than at other times; and the face of the
ocean, at midnight, often wears the aspect of a clouded
day. The nerves, too, answer to this power of the eastern
winds. We have a barometer within that can tell when
the wind is east without looking abroad, and one that never
errs. It is true that allusions are often made to these
peculiarities
,
but where are we to look for the explanation? On
the coast of America the sea-breeze comes from the rising
sun, while on that of Europe it blows from the land; but
no difference in these signs of its influence could we ever
discover on account of this marked distinction.
Roswell Gardiner found the scene greatly changed when
he came on deck next morning. The storm, which had
been brewing so long, had come at last, and the wind was
blowing a little gale from south-east. The quarter from
which the air came had compelled the officer of the watch
to haul up on the larboard tack, or with the schooner's
head to the southward and westward; a course that might
do for a few days, provided it did not blow too heavily.
The other tack would not have cleared the shoals, which
stretched away to a considerable distance to the eastward.
Hazard had got in his flying-jib, and had taken the bonnets
off his foresail and jib, to prevent the craft burying. He
had also single-reefed his mainsail and foretopsail. The
Sea Lion, of the Vineyard, imitated each movment, and
was brought down precisely to the same canvass as her
consort, and on the same tack. At that moment the two
vessels were not a cable's length asunder, the Oyster
Ponders being slightly to leeward. Their schooner,
however
,
had a trifling advantage in sailing when it blew fresh
and the water was rough; which advantage was now
making itself apparent, as the two craft struggled ahead
through the troubled element.
I wish we were two hundred miles to the eastward,
observed the young master to his first officer, as soon as
his eye had taken in the whole view. I am afraid we
shall get jammed in on Cape Hatteras. That place is
always in the way with the wind at south-east and a vessel
going to the southward. We are likely to have a dirty time
of it, Mr. Hazard.
Ay, ay, sir, dirty enough, was the careless answer.
I've known them that would go back and anchor in Fort
Pond Bay, or even in Gardiner's, until this south-easter
had blown itself out.
I couldn't think of that! We are a hundred miles
south-east of Montauk, and if I run the craft into any
place, it shall be into Charleston, or some of the islands
along that coast. Besides, we can always ware off the
land, and place ourselves a day's run further to the
southward
,
and we can then give the shoals a wide berth on the
other tack. If we were in the bight of the coast between
Long Island and Jersey, 't would be another matter; but,
out here, where we are, I should be ashamed to look the
deacon in the face if I didn't hold on.
I only made the remark, Captain Gar'ner, by way of
saying something. As for getting to the southward, close
in with our own coast, I don't know that it will be of much
use to a craft that wishes to stand so far to the eastward,
since the trades must be met well to windward, or they had
better not be met at all. For my part, I would as soon
take my chance of making a passage to the Cape de Verds
or their neighbourhood, by lifting my anchor from
Gardidiner's
Bay, three days hence, as by meeting the next shift
of wind down south, off Charleston or Tybee.
We should be only five hundred miles to windward, in
the latter case, did the wind come from the south-west,
again, as at this season of the year it is very likely to do.
But, it is of no consequence; men bound where we have
got to go, ought not to run into port every time the wind
comes out foul. You know as well as I do, Mr. Hazard,
that away down south, yonder, a fellow thinks a gale of
wind is a relief, provided it brings clear water with it. I
would rather run a week among islands, than a single day
among icebergs. One knows where to find land, for that
never moves; but your mountains that float about, are here
to-day, and there to-morrow.
Quite true, sir, returned Hazard, and men that take
their lays in sealers, are not to expect anything but squalls.
I'm ready to hold on as long as our neighbour yonder; he
seems to be trimming down to it, as if in raal earnest to
get ahead.
This was true enough. The Sea Lion of the Vineyard
was doing her best, all this time; and though unable to
keep her station on her consort's weather bow, where she
had been most of the morning, she was dropped so very
slowly as to render the change nearly imperceptible. Now,
it was, that the officers and crews of these two craft watched
their behaviour, as it is technically termed, with the
closest vigilance and deepest interest. Those in the Oyster
Pond vessel regarded the movements of their consort, much
as a belle in a ball-room observes the effect produced by
the sister belles around her; or a rival physician notes the
progress of an operation, that is to add new laurels, or to
11*
cause old ones to wither. Now, the lurch was commented
on; then, the pitch was thought to be too heavy; and
Green was soon of opinion that their competitor was not
as easy on her spars as their own schooner. In short,
every comparison that experience, jealousy or skill could
suggest, was freely made; and somewhat as a matter of
course, in favour of their own vessel. That which was
done on board the Sea Lion of Oyster Pond, was very freely
emulated by those on board her namesake of the Vineyard.
They made
their
comparisons, and formed
their
conclusions
,
with the same deference to self-esteem, and the same
submission to hope, as had been apparent among their
competitors. It would seem to be a law of nature that
men should thus flatter themselves, and perceive the mote
in the eye of their neighbour, while the beam in their own
escapes.
Had there been an impartial judge present, he might
have differed from both sets of critics. Such a person
would have seen that one of these schooners excelled in
this quality, while the other had an equal advantage in
another
.
In this way, by running through the list of
properties
that are desirable in a ship, he would, most probably,
have come to the conclusion that there was not much to
choose between the two vessels; but, that each had been
constructed with an intelligent regard to the particular
service in which she was about to be employed, and both
were handled by men who knew perfectly well how to take
care of craft of that description.
The wind gradually increased in strength, and sail was
shortened in the schooners, until each was finally brought
down to a close-reefed foresail. This would have been
heaving the vessels to, had they not been kept a little off,
in order to force them through the water. To lie-to, in
perfection, some after-sail might have been required; but
neither master saw a necessity, as yet, of remaining
stationary
.
It was thought better to wade along some two
knots, than to be pitching and lurching with nothing but a
drift, or leeward set. In this, both masters were probably
right, and found their vessels farther to windward in the
end, than if they had endeavoured to hold their own, by
lying-to. The great difficulty they had to contend with,
in keeping, a little off, was the danger of seas coming on
board; but, as yet, the ocean was not sufficiently aroused
to make this very hazardous, and both schooners, having
no real cargoes, were light and buoyant, and floated dry.
Had they encountered the sea there was, with full freights
in their holds, it might have been imprudent to expose
them even to this remote chance of having their decks
swept. Water comes aboard of small vessels, almost
without
an exception, in head winds and seas; though the
contrivances
of modern naval architecture have provided
defences
that make merchant vessels, now, infinitely more
comfortable, in this respect, than they were at the period
of which we are writing.
At the end of three days, Roswell Gardiner supposed
himself to be about the latitude of Cape Henry, and some
thirty or forty leagues from the land. It was much easier
to compute the last, than the first of these material facts.
Of course, he had no observations. The sun had not been
visible since the storm commenced, and nearly half the
time, during the last day, the two vessels were shut in from
one another, by mists and a small rain. It blew more in
squalls than it had done, and the relative positions of the
schooners were more or less affected by the circumstance.
Sometimes, one would be to windward, and ahead; then,
the other would obtain a similar advantage. Once or twice
they seemed about to separate, the distance between them
getting to be so considerable, as, apparently, to render it
impossible to keep in company; then the craft would
change places, by a slow process, passing quite near to
each other again. No one could tell, at the moment,
precisely
why these variations occurred; though the reasons,
generally, were well understood by all on board them.
Squalls, careless steering, currents, eddies, and all the
accidents
of the ocean, contribute to create these vacillating
movements, which will often cause two vessels of equal
speed, and under the same canvass, to seem to be of very
different qualities. In the nights, the changes were
greatest
,
often placing the schooners leagues asunder, and
seemingly
separating them altogether. But, Roswell Gardiner
became satisfied that Captain Daggett stuck by him
intentionally
;
for on all such occasions if
his
schooner happened
to be out of the way, he managed to close again, ere the
danger of separating became too great to be overcome.
Our mariners judged of their distance from the land, by
means of the lead. If the American coast is wanting in the
sublime and picturesque, and every traveller must admit
its defects in both, it has the essential advantage of
graduated
soundings. So regular is the shoaling of the water,
and so studiously have the fathoms been laid down, that a
cautious navigator can always feel his way in to the coast,
and never need place his vessel on the beach, as is so often
done, without at least knowing that he was about to do so.
Men become adventurous by often-repeated success; and
the struggles of competition, the go-ahead-ism of the
national
character, and the trouble it gives to sound in deep
water, all contribute to cast away the reckless and dashing
navigator, on this as well as on other coasts, and this to
his own great surprise; but, whenever such a thing
does
happen, unless in cases of stress of weather, the reader
may rest assured it is because those who have had charge
of the stranded vessel have neglected to sound. The
milestones
on a highway do not more accurately note the
distances
,
than does the lead on nearly the whole of the
American
coast. Thus Roswell Gardiner judged himself to be
about thirty-two or three marine leagues from the land, on
the evening of the third day of that gale of wind. He
placed the schooner in the latitude of Cape Henry on less
certain data, though that was the latitude in which he
supposed
her to be, by dead reckoning.
I wish I knew where Daggett makes himself out, said
the young master, just as the day closed on a most stormy
and dirty-looking night. I don't half like the appearance
of the weather; but, I do not wish to ware off the land,
with that fellow ahead and nearer to the danger, if there
be any, than we are ourselves.
Here, Roswell Gardiner manifested a weakness that lies
at the bottom of half our blunders. He did not like to be
outdone by a competitor, even in his mistakes. If the Sea
Lion of Holmes' Hole could hold on, on that tack, why
might not the Sea Lion of Oyster Pond do the same? It
is by this process of human vanity that men sustain each
other in wrong, and folly obtains the sanction of numbers,
if not that of reason. In this practice we see one of the
causes of the masses becoming misled, and this seldom
happens without their becoming oppressive.
Roswell Gardiner, however, did not neglect the lead.
The schooner had merely to luff close to the wind, and
they were in a proper state to sound. This they did twice,
during that night, and with a very sensible diminution in
the depth of the water. It was evident that the schooner
was getting pretty close in on the coast, the wind coming
out nearly at south, in squalls. Her commander held on,
for he thought there were indications of a change, and he
still did not like to ware so long as his rival of the
Vineyard
kept on the larboard tack. In this way, each
encouraging
the other in recklessness, did these two craft
run nearly into the lion's jaw, as it might be; for, when
the day re-appeared, the wind veered round to the
eastward
,
a little northerly, bringing the craft directly on a
leeshore
,
blowing at the time so heavily as to render a foresail
reefed down to a mere rag, more canvass than the little
vessels could well bear. As the day returned, and the
drizzle cleared off a little, land was seen to leeward,
stretching
slightly to seaward, both ahead and astern! On
consulting
his charts, and after getting a pretty good look at
the coast from aloft, Roswell Gardiner became satisfied
that he was off Currituck, which placed him near six
degrees
to the southward of his port of departure, and about
four to the westward. Our young man now deeply felt
that a foolish rivalry had led him into an error, and he
regretted
that he had not wore the previous evening, when
he might have had an offing that would have enabled him
to stand in either direction, clearing the land. As things
were, he was not by any means certain of the course he
ought to pursue.
Little did Gardiner imagine that the reason why
Daggett
had thus stood on, was solely the wish to keep him
company; for, that person, in consequence of Gardiner's
running so close in towards the coast, had taken up the
notion that the Sea Lion of Oyster Pond meant to pass
through the West Indies, visiting the key, which was
thought to contain treasure, and of which he had some
accounts
that had aroused all his thirst for gold, without
giving
him the clue necessary to obtain it. Thus it was that
a mistaken watchfulness on one side, and a mistaken pride
on the other, had brought these two vessels into as
dangerous
a position as could have been obtained for them by a
direct attempt to place them in extreme jeopardy.
About ten, the gale was at its height, the wind still
hanging at east, a little northerly: In the course of the
morning, the officers on board both schooners, profiting by
lulls and clear moments, had got so many views of the land
from aloft, as to be fully aware of their respective
situations
.
All thoughts of competition and watchfulness had
now vanished. Each vessel was managed with a reference
solely to her safety; and, as might have been foreseen
when true seamen handled both, they had recourse to the
same expedients to save themselves. The mainsails of
both crafts were set, balance-reefed, and the hulls were
pressed up against the wind and sea, while they were
driven ahead with increased momentum.
That main-mast springs like a whale-bone whip-handle,
sir, said Hazard, when this new experiment had been
tried some ten minutes or more. She jumps from one
sea to another, like a frog in a hurry to hop into a puddle!
She must stand it, or go ashore, answered Gardiner,
coolly, though in secret he was deeply concerned. Did
Deacon Pratt forgive me, should we lose the schooner, I
never could forgive myself!
Should we lose the schooner, Captain Gar'ner, few of
us would escape drowning, to feel remorse or joy. Look
at that coast, sir  it is clear now, and a body can see a
good bit of itnever did I put eyes upon a less promising
land-fall, for strangers to make.
Roswell Gardiner did look, as desired, and he fully
agreed with Hazard in opinion. Ahead, and astern, the
land trended to seaward, placing the schooners in a curve
of the coast, or what seamen term a bight, rendering it
quite impossible for the vessels to lay out past either of the
head-lands in sight. The whole coast was low, and endless
lines of breakers were visible along it, flashing up with
luminous crests that left no doubt of their character, or of
the dangers that they so plainly denoted. At times,
columns
of water shot up into the air like enormous jets,
and the spray was carried inland for miles. Then it was
that gloom gathered around the brows of the seamen, who
fully comprehended the nature of the danger that was so
plainly indicated. The green hands were the least
concerned
,
knowing nothing and fearing nothing, as the
older seamen are apt to express their sense of this
indifference
on the part of the boys and landsmen.
According to the calculations of those on board the Sea
Lion, of Oyster Pond, they had about two miles of drift
before they should be in the breakers. They were on the
best tack, to all appearances, and that was the old one, or
the same leg that had carried them into the bight. To
ware now, indeed, would be a very hazardous step, since
every inch of room was of importance. Gardiner's secret
hope was that they might find the inlet that led into
Currituck
,
which was then open, though we believe it has since
been closed, in whole or in part, by the sands. This often
happens on the American coast, very tolerable passages
existing this year for vessels of an easy draught, that shall
be absolutely shut up, and be converted into visible beach,
a few years later. The waters within will then gain head,
and break out, cutting themselves a channel, that remains
open until a succession of gales drives in the sands upon
them from the outside once more.
Gardiner well knew he was on the most dangerous part
of the whole American coast, in one sense, at least. The
capacious sounds that spread themselves within the long
beaches of sand were almost as difficult of navigation as
any shoals to the northward; yet would he gladly have
been in one in preference to clawing off breakers on their
outside. As between the two schooners, the Vineyard-men
had rather the best of it, being near a cable's length to
windward, and so much further removed from destruction.
The difference, however, was of no great account in the
event of the gale continuing, escape being utterly
impossible
for either in that case. So critical was the situation
of both craft becoming, indeed, that neither could now
afford to yield a single fathom of the ground she held.
All eyes were soon looking for the inlet, it having been
determined to keep the Sea Lion, of Oyster Pond, away
for it, should it appear to leeward, under circumstances
that would allow of her reaching it. The line of breakers
was now very distinctly visible, and each minute did it not
only appear to be, but it was in fact nearer and nearer.
Anchors were cleared away, and ranges of cable
overhauled
,
anchoring being an expedient that a seaman felt
bound to resort to, previously to going ashore, though it
would be with very little hope of ground-tackles holding.
The schooner had been described by Hazard as `
jumping'
into the sea. This expression is not a bad one, as
applied to small vessels in short seas, and it was
particularly
apt on this occasion. Although constructed with great
care forward as to buoyancy, this vessel made plunges into
the waves she met that nearly buried her; and, once or
twice, the shocks were so great, that those on board her
could with difficulty persuade themselves they had not
struck the bottom. The lead, nevertheless, still gave water
sufficient, though it was shoaling fast, and with a most
ominous regularity. Such was the actual state of things
when the schooner made one of her mad plunges, and was
met by a force that seemed to check her forward
movement
as effectually as if she had hit a rock. The
mainmast
was a good spar in some respects, but it wanted wood.
An inch or two more in diameter might have saved it; but
the deacon had been induced to buy it to save his money,
though remonstrated with at the time. This spar now
snapped in two, a few feet from the deck, and falling to
leeward, it dragged after it the head of the foremast, leaving
the Sea Lion, of Oyster Pond, actually in a worse situation,
just at that moment, than if she had no spars at all.
Roswell Gardiner now appeared in a new character.
Hitherto he had been silent, but observant; issuing his
orders in a way not to excite the men, and with an air of
unconcern
that really had the effect to mislead most of them
on the subject of his estimate of the danger they were in.
Concealment, however, was no longer possible, and our
young master came out as active as circumstances required,
foremost in every exertion, and issuing his orders amid the
gale trumpet-tongued. His manner, so full of animation,
resolution and exertion, probably prevented despair from
getting the ascendancy at that important moment. He was
nobly sustained by both his mates; and three or four of the
older seamen now showed themselves men to be relied on
to the last.
The first step was to anchor. Fortunately, the foresight
of Gardiner had everything ready for this indispensable
precaution. Without anchoring, ten minutes would
probably
have carried the schooner directly down upon the
breakers, leaving no hope for the life of any on board her,
and breaking her up into chips. Both bowers were let go
at once, and long ranges of cable given. The schooner was
snubbed without parting anything, and was immediately
brought head to sea. This relieved her at once, and there
was a moment that her people fancied she might ride out
the gale where she was, could they only get clear of the
wreck. Axes, hatchets, and knives were freely used, and
Roswell Gardiner saw the mass of spars and rigging float
clear of him with a delight he did not desire to conceal.
As it drove to leeward, he actually cheered. A lead was
instantly dropped alongside, in order to ascertain whether
the anchors held. This infallible test, however, gave the
melancholy certainty that the schooner was still drifting
her length in rather less than two minutes.
The only hope now was that the flukes of the anchors
might catch in better holding ground than they had yet
met with. The bottom was hard sand, however, which
never gives a craft the chance that it gets from mud. By
Roswell Gardiner's calculations, an hour, at the most,
would carry them into the breakers; possibly less time.
The Sea Lion, of Holmes' Hole, was to windward a cable's
length when this accident happened to her consort, and
about half a mile to the southward. Just at that instant
the breakers trended seaward, ahead of that schooner,
rendering
it indispensable for her to ware. This was done,
bringing her head to the southward, and she now came
struggling directly on towards her consort. The operation
of waring had caused her to lose ground enough to bring
her to leeward of the anchored craft, and nearer to the
danger.
Roswell Gardiner stood on his own quarter-deck,
anxiously
watching the drift of the other schooner, as she drew
near in her laboured way, struggling ahead through
billows
that were almost as white as the breakers that menaced
Vol. I.  12
them with destruction to leeward. The anchored vessel,
though drifting, had so slow a movement that it served to
mark the steady and rapid set of its consort towards its
certain fate. At first, it seemed to Gardiner that Daggett
would pass just ahead of him, and he trembled for his
cables, which occasionally appeared above water, stretched
like bars of iron, for the distance of thirty or forty fathoms.
But, the leeward set of the vessel under way was too fast
to give her any chance of bringing this new danger on her
consort. When a cable's length distant, the Sea Lion, of
the Vineyard,
did
seem as if she might weather her
consort
;
but, ere that short space was passed over, it was found
that she fell off so fast, by means of her drift, as to carry
her fairly clear of her stern. The two masters, holding with
one hand to some permanent object by which to steady
themselves, and each pressing his tarpaulin firmly down on
his head with the other, had a minute's conversation when
the schooners were nearest together.
Do your anchors hold? demanded Daggett, who was
the first to speak, and who put his question as if he thought
his own fate depended on the answer.
I'm sorry to say they do not. We drift our length in
about two minutes.
That will put off the evil moment an hour or two.
Look what a wake
we
are making!
Sure enough, that wake was frightful! No sooner was
the head of the Sea Lion, of the Vineyard, fairly up with
the stern of the Sea Lion, of Oyster Pond, than Gardiner
perceived that she went off diagonally, moving quite as fast
to leeward as she went ahead. This was so very obvious
that a line drawn from the quarter of Roswell's craft, in a
quartering direction, would almost have kept the other
schooner in its range from the moment that her bow hove
heavily past.
God bless you!God bless you! cried Roswell
Gardiner
,
waving his hand in adieu, firmly persuaded that he
and the Vineyard master were never to meet again in this
world. The survivors must let the fate of the lost be
known. At the pinch, I shall out boats, if I can.
The other made no answer. It would have been useless,
indeed, to attempt it; since no human voice had power to
force itself up against such a gale, the distance that had
now to be overcome.
That schooner will be in the breakers in half an hour,
said Hazard, who stood by the side of young Gardiner.
Why don't he anchor! No power short of Divine
Providence
can save her.
And Divine Providence will do itthanks to Almighty
God for his goodness! exclaimed Roswell Gardiner. Did
you perceive that, Mr. Hazard?
The `
that
' of our young mariner was, in truth, a most
momentous omen. The wind had lulled so suddenly that
the rags of sails which the other schooner carried actually
flapped. At first our seamen thought she had been
becalmed
by the swell; but the change about themselves was
too obvious to admit of any mistake. It blew terribly, again,
for a minute; then there was another lull. Gardiner sprang
to the lead-line to see the effect on his own vessel. She no
longer dragged her anchor!
God is with us! exclaimed the young master
blessed
for ever be his holy name.
And that of his only and
true
Son, responded a voice
from one at his elbow.
Notwithstanding the emergency, and the excitement
produced by this sudden change, Roswell Gardiner turned
to see from whom this admonition had come. The oldest
seaman on board, who was Stimson, a Kennebunk man,
and who had been placed there to watch the schooner's
drift, had uttered these unusual words. The fervour with
which he spoke produced more impression on the young
master than the words themselves; the former being very
unusual among sea-faring men, though the language was
not so much so. Subsequently, Gardiner remembered that
little incident, which was not without its results.
I do believe, sir, cried Hazard, that the gale is
broken. It often happens, on our own coast, that the southe
easters chop round suddenly, and come out nor'-westers.
I hope this will not be too late to save the Vineyard chap,
though he slips down upon them breakers at a most fearful
rate.
There goes his foresail, againand here is another
lull! rejoined Gardiner. I tell you, Mr. Hazard, we
shall have a shift of windnothing short of which could
save either of us from these breakers.
Which comes from the marcy of God Almighty, through
the intercession of his only Son! added Stimson, with
the same fervour of manner, though he spoke in a very low
tone of voice.
Roswell Gardiner was again surprised, and for another
moment he forgot the gale and its dangers. Gale it was
no longer, however, for the lull was now decided, and the
two cables of the schooner were distended only when the
roll of the seas came in upon her. This wash of the waves
still menaced the other schooner, driving her down towards
the breakers, though less rapidly than before.
Why don't the fellow anchor! exclaimed Gardiner,
in his anxiety, all care for himself being now over.
Unless
he anchor, he will yet go into the white water, and be
lost!
So little does he think of that, that he is turning out
his reefs, answered Hazard. See! there is a hand aloft
loosening his topsailand there goes up a whole mainsail,
already!
Sure enough, Daggett appeared more disposed to trust
to his canvass, than to his ground-tackle. In a very brief
space of time he had his craft under whole sail, and was
struggling, in the puffs, to claw off the land. Presently,
the wind ceased altogether, the canvass flapping so as to be
audible to Gardiner and his companions, at the distance
of half a mile. Then, the cloth was distended in the
opposite
direction, and the wind came off the land. The
schooner's head was instantly brought to meet the seas,
and the lead dropped at her side showed that she was
moving
in the right direction. These sudden changes,
sometimes
destructive, and sometimes providential as acts of
mercy, always bring strong counter-currents of air in their
train.
Now we shall have it! said Hazarda true
nor'-wester
,
and butt-end foremost!
This opinion very accurately described that which
followed
.
In ten minutes it was blowing heavily, in a
direction
nearly opposite to that which had been the previous
current of the wind. As a matter of course, the Sea Lion
of the Vineyard drew off the land, wallowing through the
meeting billows that still came rolling in from the broad
Atlantic; while the Sea Lion of Oyster Pond tended to
the new currents of air, and rode, as it might be, suspended
between the two opposing forces, with little or no strain
on her cables. Gardiner expected to see his consort stand
out to sea, and gain an offing; but, instead of this, Captain
Daggett brought his schooner quite near to the disabled
vessel, and anchored. This act of neighbourly kindness
was too unequivocal to require explanation. It was the
intention of the Vineyard men to lie by their consort until
she was relieved from all apprehensions of danger. The
`butt-end' of the `nor'-wester' was too large to admit of
intercourse until next morning, when that which had been
a small gale had dwindled to a good steady breeze, and
the seas had gone down, leaving comparatively smooth
water all along the coast. The line of white water which
marked the breakers was there, and quite visible; but it
no longer excited apprehension. The jury-masts on board
the disabled craft were got up, and what was very
convenient
,
just at that moment, the wreck came floating out on
the ebb, so near to her as to enable the boats to secure all
the sails and most of the rigging. The main-boom, too,
an excellent spar, was towed alongside and saved.
CHAPTER X.
The shadow from thy brow shall melt,
The sorrow from thy strain;
But where thy earthly smile hath dwelt,
Our hearts shall thirst in vain.
Mrs. Hemans
.
As soon as it would do to put his boats in the water, or
at daylight next morning, Captain Daggett came alongside
of his consort. He was received with a seaman's welcome,
and his offers of services were accepted, just as frankly, as
under reversed circumstances, they would have been made.
12*
In all this there was a strange and characteristic admixture
of neighbourly and Christian kindness, blended with a keen
regard of the main chance. If the former duties are rarely
neglected by the descendants of the Puritans, it may be
said, with equal truth, that the latter are never lost sight
of. Speculation, and profit, are regarded as so many
integral
portions of the duty of man; and, as our kinsmen of
Old England have set up an idol to worship, in the form
of aristocracy, so do our kinsmen of New England pay
homage to the golden calf. In point of fact, Daggett had
a double motive in now offering his services to Gardiner;
the one being the discharge of his moral obligations, and
the other a desire to remain near the Sea Lion of Oyster
Pond, lest she should visit the key, of which he had some
very interesting memorandums, without having enough to
find the place unless led there by those who were better
informed on the subject of its precise locality than he was
himself.
The boats of Daggett assisted in getting the wreck
alongside, and in securing the sails and rigging. Then,
his people aided in fitting jury-masts; and, by noon, both
vessels got under way, and stood along the coast, to the
southward and westward. Hatteras was no longer terrible,
for the wind still stood at north-west, and they kept in view
of those very breakers which, only the day before, they
would have given the value of both vessels to be certain of
never seeing again. That night they passed the formidable
cape, a spit of sand projecting far to seaward, and which
is on a low beach, and not on any main land at all. Once
around this angle in the coast, they had a lee, hauling up
to the south-west. With the wind abeam, they stood on
the rest of the day, picking up a pilot. The next night
they doubled Cape Look Out, a very good landmark for
those going north to keep in view, as a reminder of the
stormy and sunken Hatteras, and arrived off Beaufort
harbour
just as the sun was rising, the succeeding morning.
By this time the north-wester was done, and both schooners
entered Beaufort, with a light southerly breeze, there being
just water enough to receive them. This was the only
place on all that coast into which it would have answered
their purposes to go; and it was, perhaps, the very port of
all others that was best suited to supply the present wants
of Roswell Gardiner. Pine timber, and spars of all sorts,
abounded in that region; and the Banker, who acted as
pilot, told our young master that he could get the very
sticks he needed, in one hour's time after entering the
haven
.
This term of Banker applies to a scattering
population
of wreckers and fishermen, who dwell on the long,
low, narrow beaches which extend along the whole of this
part of the coast, reaching from Cape Fear to near Cape
Henry, a distance of some hundred and fifty miles. Within
lie the capacious sounds already mentioned, including
Albemarle
and Pimlico, and which form the watery portals
to the sea-shores of all North Carolina. Well is the last
headland of that region, but one which the schooners did
not double, named Cape Fear. It is the commencement,
on that side, of the dangerous part of the coast, and puts
the mariner on his guard by its very appellation,
admonishing
him to be cautious and prudent.
Off the entrance of Beaufort, a very perfect and
beautiful
haven, if it had a greater depth of water, the schooners
hove-to, in waiting for the tide to rise a little; and
Roswell
Gardiner took that occasion to go on board the sister
craft, and express to Daggett a sense of the obligations he
felt for the services the other had rendered.
Of course, you will not think of going in, Captain
Daggett, continued our hero, in dwelling on the subject,
after having put yourself, already, to so much
unnecessary
trouble. If I find the spars the Banker talks of, I
shall be out again in eight-and-forty hours, and we may
meet, some months hence, off Cape Horn.
I'll tell you what it is, Gar'ner, returned the
Vineyard
mariner, pushing the rum towards his brother master,
I'm a plain sort of a fellow, and don't make much talk
when I do a thing, but I like good-fellowship. We came
near going, both of usnearer than I ever was before, and
escape wrackin'; but escape we didand when men have
gone through such trials in company, I don't like the
notion
of casting off till I see you all a-tanto ag'in, and with
as many legs and arms as I carry myself. That's just my
feelin', Gar'ner, and I won't say whether it's a right feelin'
or nothelp yourself.
It's a right feeling, as between you and me, Captain
Daggett, as I can answer for. My heart tells me you are
right, and I thank you from it, for these marks of
friendship
.
But, you must not forget there are such persons as
owners, in this world. I shall have trouble enough on my
hands, with my owner, and I do not wish you to have
trouble with yours. Here is a nice little breeze to take
you out to sea again; and by passing to the southward of
Bermuda, you can make a short cut, and hit the trades far
enough to windward to answer all your purposes.
Thankee, thankee, Gar'ner  I know the road, and
can find the places I'm going to, though no great
navigator
.
Now, I never took a lunar in my life, and can't do
anything with a chronometer; but as for finding the way
between Martha's Vineyard and Cape Horn, I'll turn my
back on no shipmaster living.
I'm afraid, Captain Daggett, that we have both of us
turned our backs on our true course, when we suffered
ourselves to get jammed away down here, on Hatteras.
Why, I never saw the place before, and never wish to see
it again! It's as much out of the track of a whaler, or
sealer, as Jupiter is out of the track of Mars, or Venus.
Oh, there go your lunars, about which I know nothing,
and care nothing. I tell you, Gar'ner, a man with a good
judgment, can just as well jog about the 'arth, without any
acquaintance with lunars, as he can with. Then, your
sealer hasn't half as much need of your academy-sort of
navigation, as another man. More than half of our calling
is luck; and all the best sealing stations I ever heard of,
have been blundered on by some chap who has lost his way.
I despise lunars, if the truth must be said; yet I like to go
straight to my port of destination. Take a little sugar
with your rum-and-waterwe Vineyard folks like
sweetening
.
For which purpose, or that of going straight to your
port, Captain Daggett, you've come down here, on your
way to the Pacific; or, about five hundred miles out of
your way!
I came here for company, Gar'ner. We hadn't much
choice, you must allow, for we couldn't have weathered
the shoals on the other tack. I see no great harm in our
positions, if you hadn't got dismasted. That's a two or
three hundred dollar job, and may make your owner
grumble
a little, but it's no killing matter. I'll stick by you,
and you can tell the deacon as much in the letter you'll
write him, when we get in.
It seems like doing injustice to
your
owners, as well
as to my own, keeping you here, Captain Daggett,
returned
Roswell, innocently, for he had not the smallest
suspicion of the true motive of all this apparent
good-fellowship
,
and I really wish you would now quit me.
I couldn't think of it, Gar'ner. 'T would make an
awful talk on the Vineyard, was I to do anything of the
sort. `Stick by your consort,' is an eleventh
commandment
,
in our island.
Which is the reason why there are so many old maids
there, I suppose, Daggett, cried Roswell Gardiner,
laughing
.
Well, I thank you for your kindness, and will
endeavour
to remember it when you may have occasion for
some return. But, the tide must be making, and we ought
to lose no time, unnecessarily. Here's a lucky voyage to
us both, Captain Daggett, and a happy return to
sweet-hearts
and wives.
Daggett tossed off his glass to this toast, and the two then
went on deck. Roswell Gardiner thought that a kinder
ship's company never sailed together than this of the Sea
Lion of Holmes' Hole; for, notwithstanding the interest
of every man on board depended on the returns of their
own voyage, each and all appeared willing to stick by him
and his craft so long as there was a possibility of being of
any service.
Whalers and sealers do not ship their crews for wages in
money, as is done with most vessels. So much depends on
the exertions of the people in these voyages, that it is the
practice to give every man a direct interest in the result.
Consequently, all on board engage for a compensation to
be derived from a division of the return cargo. The terms
on which a party engages are called his lay; and he gets
so many parts of a hundred, according to station,
experience
and qualifications. The owner is paid for his risk
and expenses in the same way, the vessel and outfits usually
taking about two-thirds of the whole returns, while the
officers and crew get the other. These conditions vary a
little, as the proceeds of whaling and sealing rise or fall in
the market, and also in reference to the cost of equipments.
It follows that Captain Daggett and his crew were actually
putting their hands into their own pockets, when they lost
time in remaining with the crippled craft. This Gardiner
knew, and it caused him to appreciate their kindness at a
rate so much higher than he might otherwise have done.
At first sight, it might seem that all this unusual
kindness
was superfluous, and of no avail. This, however, was
not really the case, since the crew of the second schooner
was of much real service in forwarding the equipment of
the disabled vessel. Beaufort has an excellent harbour for
vessels of a light draught of water like our two sealers; but
the town is insignificant, and extra labourers, especially
those of an intelligence suited to such work, very difficult
to be had. At the bottom, therefore, Roswell Gardiner
found his friendly assistants of much real advantage, the
two crews pushing the work before them with as much
rapidity as suited even a seaman's impatience. Aided by
the crew of his consort, Gardiner got on fast with his
repairs
,
and on the afternoon of the second day after he had
entered Beaufort, he was ready to sail once more; his
schooner probably in a better state for service than the day
she left Oyster Pond.
The lightning-line did not exist at the period of which
we are writing. It is our good fortune to be an intimate
acquaintance of the distinguished citizen who has bestowed
this great gift on his own countryone that will transmit
his name to posterity, side by side with that of Fulton. In
his case, as in that of the last-named inventor, attempts
have been made to rob him equally of the honours and the
profits of his very ingenious invention. As respects the
last, we hold that it is every hour becoming less and less
possible for any American to maintain his rights against
numbers. There is no question that the government of this
great Republic was intended to be one of well-considered
and upright principles, in which certain questions are to be
referred periodically to majorities, as the wisest and most
natural, as well as the most just mode of disposing of them.
Such a government, well administered, and with an
accurate
observance of its governing principles, would probably
be the best that human infirmity will allow men to
administer
;
but when the capital mistake is made of supposing that
mere numbers are to control all things, regardless of those
great fundamental laws that the state has adopted for its
own restraint, it may be questioned if so loose, and
capricious
,
and selfish a system, is not in great danger of
becoming
the very worst scheme of polity that cupidity ever
set in motion. The tendencynot the
spirit
of the
institutions
,
the two things being the very antipodes of each
other, though common minds are so apt to confound them
the
tendency
of the institutions of this country, in flagrant
opposition to their
spirit
or
intentions
, which were devised
expressly to restrain the disposition of men to innovate, is
out of all question to foster this great abuse, and to place
numbers above principles, even when the principles were
solemnly adopted expressly to bring numbers under the
control of a sound fundamental law. This influence of
numbers, this dire mistake of the very nature of liberty,
by placing men and their passions above those great laws
of right which come direct from God himself, is increasing
in force, and threatens consequences which may set at
naught all the well-devised schemes of the last generation
for the security of the state, and the happiness of that very
people, who can never know either security or even peace,
until they learn to submit themselves, without a thought of
resistance, to those great rules of right which in truth form
the
spirit
of their institutions, and which are only too often
in opposition to their own impulses and motives.
We pretend to no knowledge on the subject of the dates
of discoveries in the arts and sciences, but well do we
remember
the earnestness and single-minded devotion to a
laudable purpose, with which our worthy friend first
communicated
to us his ideas on the subject of using the
electric spark by way of a telegraph. It was in Paris, and
during the winter of 1831-2, and the succeeding spring, a
time when we were daily together; and we have a
satisfaction
in recording this date, that others may prove better
claims if they can. Had Morse set his great invention on
foot thirty years earlier, Roswell Gardiner might have
communicated
with his owner, and got a reply, ere he again
sailed, considerable as was the distance between them.
As things then were, he was fain to be content with writing
a letter, which was put into the deacon's hand about a
week after it was written, by his niece, on his own return
from a short journey to Southold, whither he had been to
settle and discharge a tardy claim against his schooner.
Here is a letter for you, uncle, said Mary Pratt,
struggling to command her feelings, though she blushed
with the consciousness of her own interest in the missive.
It came from the Harbour, by some mistake; Baiting
Joe bringing it across just after you left home.
A letter with a post mark  `Beaufort, N. C.'  Who
in natur' can this letter be from?What a postage, too, to
charge on a letter! Fifty cents!
That is a proof, sir, that Beaufort must be a long way
off. Besides, the letter is double. I think the hand-writing
is Roswell's.
Had the niece fired a six-pounder under her uncle's ears,
he would scarcely have been more startled. He even
turned
pale, and instead of breaking the wafer as he had been
about to do, he actually shrunk from performing the act,
like one afraid to proceed.
What can this mean? said the deacon, taking a
moment
to recover his voice. Gar'ner's hand-writing! So
it is, I declare. If that imprudent young man has lost my
schooner, I'll never forgive him in this world, whatever a
body may be
forced
to do in the next!
It is not necessary to believe anything as bad as that,
uncle. Letters are often written at sea, and sent in by
vessels that are met. I dare say Roswell has done just this.
Not henot hethe careless fellow! He has lost that
schooner, and all my property is in the hands of wrackers,
who are worse than so many rats in a larder. `Beaufort,
N. C.' Yes, that must be one of the Bahamas, and N. C.
stands for New Providence  Ah's me! Ah's me!
But N. C. does
not
stand for New Providence  it
would be N. P. in that case, uncle.
N. C. or N. P., they sound so dreadfully alike, that I
don't know what to think! Take the letter and open it.
Oh! how big it isthere must be a protest, or some other
costly thing inclosed.
Mary did take the letter, and she opened it, though with
trembling hands. The inclosure soon appeared, and the
first glance of her eye told her it was a letter addressed to
herself.
What is it, Mary?What is it, my child? Do not be
afraid to tell me, said the deacon, in a low faltering voice.
I hope I know how to meet misfortunes with Christian
fortitude. Has it one of them awful-looking seals that
Notary Publics use when they want money?
Mary blushed rosy-red, and she appeared very charming
at that moment, though as resolute as ever to give her hand
only to a youth whose `God should be her God.'
It is a letter to me, sirnothing else, I do assure you,
uncle. Roswell often writes to me, as you know; he has
sent one of his letters inclosed in this to you.
Yes, yesI'm glad it's no worse. Well, where was
his letter written? Does he mention the latitude and
longitude
?
It will be some comfort to learn that he was well to
the southward and eastward.
Mary's colour disappeared, and a paleness came over her
face, as she ran through the few first lines of the letter.
Then she summoned all her resolution, and succeeded in
telling her uncle the facts.
`A misfortune has befallen poor Roswell, she said, her
voice trembling with emotion, though it does not seem to
be half as bad as it might have been. The letter is written
at Beaufort, in North Carolina, where the schooner has put
in to get new masts, having lost those with which she
sailed
in a gale of wind off Cape Hatteras.
Hatteras! interrupted the deacon, groaningWhat
in natur' had my vessel to do down there?
I am sure I don't know, sirbut I had better read you
the contents of Roswell's letter, and then you will hear the
whole story.
Mary now proceeded to read aloud. Gardiner gave a
frank, explicit account of all that had happened since he
parted with his owner, concealing nothing, and not
attempting
even to extenuate his fault. Of the Sea Lion of Holmes'
Hole he wrote at large, giving it as his opinion that Captain
Daggett really possessed some cluewhat he did not know
to the existence of the sealing islands, though he rather
Vol. I.  13
thought that he was not very accurately informed of their
precise position. As respected the key, Roswell was silent,
for it did not at all occur to him that Daggett knew
anything
of that part of his own mission. In consequence of
this opinion, not the least suspicion of the motive of the
Vineyard-man, in sticking by him, presented itself to
Gardiner's
mind; and nothing on the subject was
communicated
in the letter. On the contrary, our young master
was quite eloquent in expressing his gratitude to Daggett
and his crew, for the assistance they had volunteered, and
without which he could not have been ready to go to sea
again in less than a week. As it was, the letter was partly
written as the schooner re-passed the bar, and was sent
ashore by the pilot to be mailed. This fact was stated in
full, in a postscript.
Volunteered! groaned the deacon, aloud. As if a
man ever volunteers to work without his pay!
Roswell tells us that Captain Daggett did, uncle,
answered
Mary, and that it is understood between them he
is to make no charge for his going into Beaufort, or for
anything he did while there. Vessels often help each other
in this kind way, I should hope, for the sake of Christian
charity, sir.
Not without salvage, not without salvage! Charity
is a good thing, and it is our duty to exercise it on all
occasions; but salvage comes into charity all the same as into any other interest. This schooner will ruin me, I
fear, and leave me in my old age to be supported by the
town!
That can hardly happen, uncle, since you owe nothing
for her, and have your farms, and all your other property
unencumbered. It is not easy to see how the schooner can
ruin you.
Yes, I am undonereturned the deacon, beating the
floor with his foot, in nervous agitationas much undone
as ever Roswell Gar'ner's father was, and he might have
been the richest man between Oyster Pond and Riverhead,
had he kept out of the way of speculation. I remember
him much better off than I am myself, and he died but
little more than a beggar. Yes, yes; I see how it is; this
schooner has undone me!
But Roswell sends an account of all that he has paid,
and draws a bill on you for its payment. The entire amount
is but one hundred and sixteen dollars and seventy-two
cents.
That's not for salvage. The next thing will be a
demand
for salvage in behalf of the owners and crew of the
Sea Lion of Humses' Hull! I know how it will be, child;
I know how it will be! Gar'ner has undone me, and I
shall go down into my grave a beggar, as his father has
done already.
If such be the fact, uncle, no one but I would be the
sufferer, and I will strive not to grieve over your losses.
But, here is a paper that Roswell has inclosed in his letter
to me, by mistake, no doubt. See, sir; it is an
acknowledgment
,
signed by Captain Daggett and all his crew,
admitting
that they went into Beaufort with Roswell out of
good feeling, and allowing that they have no claims to
salvage. Here it is, sir; you can read it for yourself.
The deacon did not only read ithe almost devoured
the paper, which, as Mary suggested, had been inclosed in
her letter by mistake. The relief produced by this
document
so far composed the uncle, that he not only read
Gardiner's letter himself, with a very close attention to its
contents, but he actually forgave the cost of the repairs
incurred
at Beaufort. While he was in the height of his joy
at this change in the aspect of things, the niece stole into
her own room in order to read the missive she had received,
by herself.
The tears that Mary Pratt profusely shed over Roswell's
letter, were both sweet and bitter. The manifestations of
his affection for her, which were manly and frank, brought
tears of tenderness from her eyes; while the recollection
of the width of the chasm that separated them, had the
effect to embitter these proofs of love. Most females would
have lost the sense of duty which sustained our heroine in
this severe trial, and, in accepting the man of their heart,
would have trusted to time, and her own influence, and the
mercy of Divine Providence, to bring about the change she
desired; but Mary Pratt could not thus blind herself to her
own high obligations. The tie of husband and wife she
rightly regarded as the most serious of all the obligations
we can assume, and she could not
would
not plight her
vows to any man whose `God was not her God.'
Still there was much of sweet consolation in this
little-expected
letter from Roswell. He wrote, as he always did,
simply and naturally, and attempted no concealments. This
was just as true of his acts, as the master of the schooner,
as it was in his character of a suitor. To Mary he told the
whole story of his weakness, acknowledging that a silly
spirit of pride which would not permit him to seem to
abandon a trial of the qualities of the two schooners, had
induced him to stand on to the westward longer than he
should otherwise have done, and the currents had come to
assist in increasing the danger. As for Daggett, he
supposed
him to have been similarly influenced; though he
did not withhold his expressions of gratitude for the
generous
manner in which that seaman had stuck to him to the
last.
For weary months did Mary Pratt derive sweet
consolation
from her treasure of a letter. It was, perhaps, no
more than human nature, or woman's nature at least, that,
in time, she got most to regard those passages which best
answered to the longings of her own heart; and that she
came at last to read the missive, forgetful in a degree, that
it was written by one who had deliberately, and as a matter
of faith, adopted the idea that the Redeemer was not, in
what may be called the catholic sense of the term, the Son
of God. The papers gave an account of the arrival of the
`Twin Sea Lions,' as the article styled them, in the port
of Beaufort, to repair damages; and of their having soon
sailed again, in company. This paragraph she cut out of
the journal in which it met her eye, and enclosing it in
Roswell's last letter, there was not a day in the succeeding
year in which both were not in her hand, and read for the
hundredth time, or more. These proofs of tenderness,
however, are not to be taken as evidence of any lessening
of principle, or as signs of a disposition to let her judgment
and duty submit to her affection. So far from this, her
resolution grew with reflection, and her mind became more
settled in a purpose that she deemed sacred, the longer she
reflected on the subject. But, her prayers in behalf of her
absent lover grew more frequent, and much more fervent.
In the mean time, the Twin Lions sailed. On leaving
Beaufort, they ran off the coast with a smart breeze from
south-west, making a leading wind of it. There had been
some variance of opinion between Daggett and Gardiner,
touching the course they ought to steer. The last was for
hauling up higher, and passing to the southward of
Bermuda
;
while the first contended for standing nearly due
east, and going to the northward of those islands.
Gardiner
felt impatient to repair his blunder, and make the
shortest cut he could; whereas Daggett reasoned more
coolly, and took the winds into the account, keeping in
view the main results of the voyage. Perhaps the last
wished to keep his consort away from all the keys, until
he was compelled to alter his course in a way that would
leave no doubt of his intentions. Of one thing the last
was now certain; he knew by a long trial that the Sea
Lion of Oyster Pond could not very easily run away from
the Sea Lion of Holmes' Hole, and he was fully resolved
that she should not escape from him in the night, or in
squalls. As for Roswell Gardiner, not having the smallest
idea of looking for his key, until he came north, after
visiting
the antarctic circle, he had no notion whatever of the
reason why the other stuck to him so closely; and, least
of all, why he wished to keep him clear of the West Indies,
until ready to make a descent on his El Dorado.
Beaufort lies about two degrees to the northward of the
four hundred rocks, islets, and small islands, which are
known as the Bermudas; an advanced naval station, that
belongs to a rival commercial power, and which is occupied
by that power solely as a check on this republic in the
event of war. Had the views of real statesmen prevailed
in America, instead of those of mere politicians, the whole
energy of this republic would have been long since directed
to the object of substituting our own flag for that of
England
,
in these islands. As things are, there they exist; a
station for hostile fleets, a receptacle for prizes, and a dpot
for the munitions of war, as if expressly designed by nature
to hold the whole American coast in command. While
little men with great names are wrangling about
south-western
acquisitions, and north-eastern boundaries, that
are of no real moment to the growth and power of the
republic
,
13*
these islands, that ought never to be out of the
mind of the American statesman, have not yet entered into
the account at all; a certain proof how little the minds
that do, or ought to, influence events, are really up to the
work they have been delegated to perform. Military
expeditions
have twice been sent from this country to Canada,
when both the Canadas are not of one-half the importance
to the true security and independence of the country(no
nation is independent until it holds the control of all its
greater interests in its own hands)  as the Bermudas.
When England asked the cession of territory undoubtedly
American, because it overshadowed Quebec, she should
have been met with this plain propositionGive us the
Bermudas, and we will exchange with you. You hold
those islands as a check on our power, and we will hold
the angle of Maine for a check on yours, unless you will
consent to make a fair and mutual transfer. We will not
attack you for the possession of the Bermudas, for we deem
a just principle even more important than such an
accession
;
but when you ask us to cede, we hold out our hands
to take an equivalent in return. The policy of this nation
is not to be influenced by saw-logs, but by these manifest,
important, and ulterior interests. If you wish Maine, give
us Bermuda in exchange, or go with your wishes
ungratified
.
Happily, among us, events are stronger than men;
and the day is not distant when the mere force of
circumstances
will compel the small-fry of diplomacy to see what
the real interests and dignity of the republic demand, in
reference to this great feature of its policy.
Roswell Gardiner and Daggett had several discussions
touching the manner in which they ought to pass those
islands. There were about four degrees to spare between
the trades and the Bermudas; and the former was of
opinion
that they might pass through this opening, and make
a straighter wake, than by going farther north. These
consultations took place from quarter-deck to quarter-deck,
as the two schooners ran off free, steering directly for the
islands, as a sort of compromise between the two opinions.
The distance from the main to the Bermudas is computed
at about six hundred miles, which gave sufficient leisure
for the discussion of the subject in all its bearings. The
conversations were amicable, and the weather continuing
mild, and the wind standing, they were renewed each
afternoon
,
when the vessels closed, as if expressly to admit of
the dialogue. In all this time, five days altogether, it was
farther ascertained that the difference in sailing between
the Twin Lions, as the sailors now began to call the two
schooners, was barely perceptible. If anything, it was
slightly in favour of the Vineyard craft, though there yet
remained many of the vicissitudes of the seas, in which to
make the trial. While this uncertainty as to the course
prevailed, the low land appeared directly ahead, when
Daggett consented to pass it to the southward, keeping the
cluster in sight, however, as they went steadily on towards
the southward and eastward.
CHAPTER XI.
With glossy skin, and dripping mane,
And reeling limbs, and reeking flank,
The wild steed's sinewy nerves still strain
Up the repelling bank.
Mazeppa
.
Roswell Gardiner
felt as if he could breathe more
freely when they had run the Summers Group fairly out of
sight, and the last hummock had sunk into the waves of
the west. He was now fairly quit of America, and hoped
to see no more of it, until he made the well-known rock
that points the way into that most magnificent of all the
havens of the earth, the bay of Rio de Janeiro. Travellers
dispute whether the palm ought to be given to this port, or
to those of Naples and Constantinople. Each, certainly,
has its particular claims to surpassing beauty, which ought
to be kept in view in coming to a decision. Seen from its
outside, with its minarets, and Golden Horn, and
Bosphorus
,
Constantinople is, probably, the most glorious spot on
earth. Ascend its mountains, and overlook the gulfs of
Salerno and Gaeta, as well as its own waters, the
Campagna
Felici
and the memorials of the past, all seen in the
witchery of an Italian atmosphere, and the mind becomes
perfectly satisfied that nothing equal is to be found
elsewhere
;
but enter the bay of Rio, and take the whole of
the noble panorama in at a glance, and even the experienced
traveller is staggered with the stupendous as well as
bewitching
character of the loveliness that meets his eye.
Witchery is a charm that peculiarly belongs to Italy, as all
must feel who have ever been brought within its influence;
but it is a witchery that is more or less shared by all regions
of low latitudes.
Our two Sea Lions met with no adventures worthy of
record, until they got well to the southward of the equator.
They had been unusually successful in getting through the
calm latitudes; and forty-six days from Montauk, they spoke
a Sag Harbour whaler, homeward bound, that had come
out from Rio only the preceding week, where she had been
to dispose of her oil. By this ship, letters were sent home;
and as Gardiner could now tell the deacon that he should
touch at Rio even before the time first anticipated, he
believed
that he should set the old man's heart at peace. A
little occurrence that took place the very day they parted
with the whaler, added to the pleasure this opportunity of
communicating with the owner had afforded. As the
schooners were moving on in company, about a cable's
length asunder, Hazard saw a sudden and extraordinary
movement on board the Vineyard Lion, as the men now
named that vessel, to distinguish her from her consort.
Look out for a spout! shouted the mate to Stimson,
who happened to be on the foretopsail-yard at work, when
this unexpected interruption to the quiet of the passage
occurred. There is a man overboard from the other
schooner, or they see a spout.
A spout! a spout! shouted Stimson, in return; and
a spalm (sperm, or spermaceti, was meant) whale, in the
bargain! Here he is, sir, two p'ints on our weather beam.
This was enough. If any one has had the misfortune to
be in a coach drawn by four hourses, when a sudden fright
starts them off at speed, he can form a pretty accurate
notion of the movement that now took place on board of
Deacon Pratt's craft. Every one seemed to spring into
activity, as if a single will directed a common set of
muscles
.
Those who were below literally tumbled up, as
seamen express it, and those who were aloft slid down to
the deck like flashes of lightning. Captain Gardiner sprang
out of his cabin, seemingly at a single bound; at another,
he was in the whale-boat that Hazard was in the very act
of lowering into the water, as the schooner rounded-to.
Perceiving himself anticipated here, the mate turned to the
boat on the other quarter, and was in her, and in the water,
almost as soon as his commanding officer.
Although neither of the schooners was thoroughly fitted
for a whaler, each had lines, lances, harpoons, &c., in
readiness
in their quarter-boats, prepared for any turn of luck
like this which now offered. The process of paddling up
to whales, which is now so common in the American ships,
was then very little or not at all resorted to. It is said that
the animals have got to be so shy, in consequence of being
so much pursued, that the old mode of approaching them
will not suffice, and that it now requires much more care
and far more art to take one of these creatures, than it did
thirty years since. On this part of the subject, we merely
repeat what we hear, though we think we can see an
advantage
in the use of the paddle that is altogether
independent
of that of the greater quiet of that mode of forcing a
boat ahead. He that paddles looks
ahead
, and the approach
is more easily regulated, when the whole of the boat's crew
are apprised, by means of their own senses, of the actual
state of things, than when they attain their ideas of them
through the orders of an officer. The last must govern in
all cases, but the men are prepared for them, when they
can see what is going on, and will be more likely to act
with promptitude and intelligence, and will be less liable
to make mistakes.
The four boats, two from each schooner, dropped into
the water nearly about the same time. Daggett was at the
steering-oar of one, as was Roswell at that of another.
Hazard, and Macy, the chief mate of the Vineyard craft,
were at the steering-oars of the two remaining boats. All
pulled in the direction of the spot on the ocean where the
spouts had been seen. It was the opinion of those who had
been aloft, that there were several
fish;
and it was certain
that they were of the most valuable species, or the
spermaceti
,
one barrel of the oil of which was worth about as
much as the oil of three of the ordinary sort, or that of the
right
whale, supposing them all to yield the same quantity
in number of barrels. The nature or species of the fish
was easily enough determined by the spouts; the right
whale throwing up two high arched jets of water, while the
spermaceti throws but a single, low, bushy one.
It was not long ere the boats of the two captains came
abreast of each other, and within speaking distance. A
stern rivalry was now apparent in every countenance, the
men pulling might and main, and without even a smile
among them all. Every face was grave, earnest, and
determined
;
every arm strung to its utmost powers of
exertion
.
The men rowed beautifully, being accustomed to
the use of their long oars in rough water, and in ten
minutes
they were all fully a mile dead to windward of the two
schooners.
Few things give a more exalted idea of the courage and
ingenuity of the human race than to see adventurers set
forth, in a mere shell, on the troubled waters of the open
ocean, to contend with and capture an animal of the size
of the whale. The simple circumstance that the last is in
its own element, while its assailants are compelled to
approach
it in such light and fragile conveyances, that, to the
unpractised eye, it is sufficiently difficult to manage them
amid the rolling waters, without seeking so powerful an
enemy to contend with. But, little of all this did the crews
of our four boats now think. They had before them the
objects, or
one
of the objects, rather, of their adventure,
and so long as that was the case, no other view but that of
prevailing could rise before their eyes.
How is it, Gar'ner? called out the Vineyard master;
shall it be shares? or does each schooner whale on her
own hook?
This was asked in a friendly way, and apparently with
great indifference as to the nature of the reply, but with
profound art. It was Daggett's wish to establish a sort of
partnership, which, taken in connection with the good
feeling
created by the affair at Beaufort, would be very apt to
lead on to further and more important association. Luckily
for Gardiner, an idea crossed his mind, just as he was about
to reply, which induced the wisest answer. It was the
thought, that competition would be more likely to cause
exertion than a partnership, and that the success of all
would better repay them for their toils and risks, should
each vessel act exclusively for itself. This is the principle
that renders the present state of society more healthful and
advantageous than that which the friends of the different
systems of associating, that are now so much in vogue,
wish to substitute in its place. Individuality is an
all-important
feeling in the organization of human beings into
communities; and the political economist who does not
use it as his most powerful auxiliary in advancing
civilization
,
will soon see it turn round in its tracks, and become
a dead weight; indulging its self-love, by living with the
minimum of exertion, instead of pushing his private
advantage
,
with the maximum.
I think each vessel had better work for herself and her
owners, answered Roswell Gardiner.
As the schooners were in the trades, there was a regular
sea running, and one that was neither very high nor much
broken. Still, the boats were lifted on it like egg-shells
or bubbles, the immense power of the ocean raising the
largest ships, groaning under their vast weight of ordnance,
as if they were feathers. In a few minutes, Gardiner and
Daggett became a little more separated, each looking
eagerly
for the spouts, which had not been seen by either
since quitting his vessel. All this time the two mates came
steadily on, until the whole of the little fleet of boats was,
by this time, not less than a marine league distant from the
schooners. The vessels themselves were working up to
windward, to keep as near to the boats as possible, making
short tacks under reduced canvass; a shipkeeper, the cook,
steward, and one or two other hands, being all who were
left on board them.
We shall suppose that most of our readers are sufficiently
acquainted with the general character of that class of
animals
to which the whale belongs, to know that all of the
genus breathe the atmospheric air, which is as necessary
for life to them as it is to man himself. The only
difference
in this respect is, that the whale can go longer
without
renewing his respiration than all purely land-animals,
though he must come up to breathe at intervals, or die. It
is the exhaling of the old stock of air, when he brings the
blow-holes, as seamen call the outlets of his respiratory
organs, to the surface, that forces the water upward, and
forms the spouts, which usually indicate to the whalers
the position of their game. The spouts vary in
appearance
,
as has been mentioned, owing to the number and
situation of the orifices by which the exhausted air escapes.
No sooner is the vitiated air exhaled, than the lungs receive
a new supply; and the animal either remains near the
surface
,
rolling about and sporting amid the waves, or descends
again, a short distance, in quest of its food. This food,
also, varies materially in the different species. The
right-whale
is supposed to live on what may be termed marine
insects, or the mollusc of the ocean, which it is thought
he obtains by running in the parts of the sea where they
most abound; arresting them by the hairy fibres which
grow on the lamin of bone that, in a measure, compose
his jaws, having no teeth. The spermaceti, however, is
furnished with regular grinders, which he knows very well
how to use, and with which he often crushes the boats of
those who come against him. Thus, the whalers have but
one danger to guard against, in assaulting the common
animal, viz., his flukes, or tail; while the spermaceti, in
addition to the last means of defence, possesses those of his
teeth or jaws. As this latter animal is quite one-third head,
he has no very great dissemblance to the alligator in this
particular.
By means of this brief description of the physical
formation
and habits of the animals of which our adventurers
were in pursuit, the general reader will be the better able
to understand that which it is our duty now to record.
After rowing the distance named, the boats became a little
separated, in their search for the fish. That spouts had
been seen, there was no doubt; though, since quitting the
schooners, no one in the boats had got a further view of
the fish,if fish, animals with respiratory organs can be
termed. A good look-out for spouts had been kept by each
man at the steering-oars, but entirely without success. Had
not Roswell and Daggett, previously to leaving their
respective
vessels, seen the signs of whales with their own
eyes, it is probable that they would now have both been
disposed to return, calling in their mates. But, being
certain
that the creatures they sought were not far distant,
they continued slowly to separate, each straining his eyes
in quest of his game, as his boat rose on the summit of the
rolling and tossing waves. Water in motion was all around
them; and the schooners working slowly up against the
trades, were all that rewarded their vigilant and anxious
looks. Twenty times did each fancy that he saw the dark
back, or head, of the object he sought; but as often did it
prove to be no more than a lipper of water, rolling up into
a hummock ere it broke, or melted away again into the
general mass of the unquiet ocean. When it is remembered
that the surface of the sea is tossed into a thousand
fantastic
outlines, as its waves roll along, it can readily be
imagined
how such mistakes could arise.
At length Gardiner discerned that which his practised
eye well knew. It was the flukes, or extremity of the tail
of an enormous whale, distant from him less than a quarter
of a mile, and in such a position as to place the animal at
about the same breadth of water from Daggett. It would
seem that both of these vigilant officers perceived their
enemy at the same instant, for each boat started for it, as
if it had been instinct with life. The pike or the shark
could not have darted towards its prey with greater
promptitude
,
and scarcely with greater velocity, than these two
boats. Very soon the whole herd was seen, swimming
along against the wind, an enormous bull-whale leading,
while half a dozen calves kept close to the sides of their
dams, or sported among themselves, much as the offspring
of land animals delight in their youth and strength.
Presently
a mother rolled lazily over on her side, permitting
its calf to suck. Others followed this example; and then
the leader of the herd ceased his passage to windward, but
began to circle the spot, as if in complaisance to those
considerate
nurses who thus waited on the wants of their
young. At this interesting moment, the boats came
glancing
in among the herd.
Had the competition and spirit of rivalry been at a lower
Vol. I.  14
point among our adventurers than it actually was, greater
caution might have been observed. It is just as dangerous
to assault a whale that has its young to defend, as to assault
most other animals. We know that the most delicate women
become heroines in such straits; and nature seems to have
given to the whole sex, whether endowed with reason or
only with an instinct, the same disposition to die in defence
of the helpless creatures that so much depend on their care.
But, no one there now thought of the risk he ran, it being
the Vineyard against Oyster Pond, one Sea Lion against
the other, and, in many instances, pocket against pocket.
Roswell, as if disdaining all meaner game, pulled quite
through the herd, and laid the bows of his boat directly on
the side of the old bull  a hundred-barrel whale, at the
very least. No sooner did the enormous creature feel the
harpoon, than, throwing its flukes upward, it descended
into the depths of the ocean, with a velocity that caused
smoke to arise from the chuck through which the line
passed. Ordinarily, the movement of a whale is not much
faster than an active man can walk; and, when it runs on
the surface, its speed seldom exceeds that of a swift vessel
under full sail; but, when suddenly startled, with the
harpoon
in its blubber, the animal is capable of making a
prodigious
exertion. When struck, it usually `sounds,' as it
is termed, or runs downward, sometimes to the depth of a
mile; and it is said that instances have been known in
which the fish inflicted great injury on itself, by dashing
its head against rocks.
In the case before us, after running out three or four
hundred fathoms of line, the `bull' to which Gardiner had
`fastened,' came up to the surface, `blowed,' and began to
move slowly towards the herd again. No sooner was the
harpoon thrown, than a change took place in the
disposition
of the crew of the boat, which it may be well to
explain
.
The harpoon is a barbed javelin, fastened to a staff
to give it momentum. The line is attached to this weapon,
the proper use of which is to `fasten' to the fish, though it
sometimes happens that the animal is killed at the first
blow This is when the harpoon has been hurled by a very
skilful and vigorous harpooner. Usually, this weapon
penetrates
some distance into the blubber in which a whale is
encased, and when it is drawn back by the plunge of the
fish, the barbed parts get embedded in the tough
integuments
of the hide, together with the blubber, and hold.
The iron of the harpoon being very soft, the shank bends
under the strain of the line, leaving the staff close to the
animal's body. Owing to this arrangement, the harpoon
offers less resistance to the water, as the whale passes swiftly
through it. No sooner did the boat-steerer, or harpooner,
cast his `irons,' as whalers term the harpoon, than he
changed places with Roswell, who left the steering-oar, and
proceeded forward to wield the lance, the weapon with
which the victory is finally consummated. The men now
`peaked' their oars, as it is termed; or they placed the
handles in cleets made to receive them, leaving the blades
elevated in the air, so as to be quite clear of the water.
This was done to get rid of the oars, in readiness for other
duty, while the instruments were left in the tholes, to be
resorted to in emergencies. This gives a whale-boat a
peculiar
appearance, with its five long oars raised in the air,
at angles approaching forty-five degrees. In the mean time,
as the bull approached the herd, or school,
[1]
[1]
We suppose this word to be a corruption of the Dutch
schule
,
which, we take it, means the same thing.
as the whalers
term it, the boats' crew began to haul in line, the
boat-steerer
coiling it away carefully, in a tub placed in the
stern-sheets purposely to receive it. Any one can
understand
how important it was that this part of the duty should
be well performed, since bights of line running out of a
boat, dragged by a whale, would prove so many snares to
the men's legs, unless previously disposed of in a place
proper to let it escape without this risk. For this reason
it is, that the end of a line is never permitted to run out at
the bow of a boat at all. It might do some injury in its
passage, and an axe is always applied near the bows, when
it is found necessary to cut from a whale.
It was so unusual a thing to see a fish turn towards the
spot where he was struck, that Roswell did not know what
to make of this manuvre in his bull. At first he supposed
the animal meant to make fight, and set upon him with its
tremendous jaws; but it seemed that caprice or alarm
directed the movement; for, after coming within a hundred
yards of the boat, the creature turned and commenced
sculling away to windward, with wide and nervous sweeps
of its formidable flukes. It is by this process that all the
fish of this genus force their way through the water, their
tails being admirably adapted to the purpose. As the men
had showed the utmost activity in hauling in upon the line,
by the time the whale went off to windward again they had
got the boat up within about four hundred feet of him.
Now commenced a tow, dead to windward, it being
known that a fish, when struck, seldom runs at first in any
other direction. The rate at which the whale moved was
not at the height of his speed, though it exceeded six knots.
Occasionally, this rate was lessened, and in several
instances
his speed was reduced to less than half of that just
mentioned. Whenever one of these lulls occurred, the men
would haul upon the line, gradually getting nearer and
nearer to the fish, until they were within fifty feet of his
tremendous flukes. Here, a turn was taken with the line,
and an opportunity to use the lance was waited for.
Whalers say that a forty-barrel bull of the spermaceti
sort is much the most dangerous to deal with of all the
animals of this species. The larger bulls are infinitely the
most powerful, and drive these half-grown creatures away
in herds by themselves, that are called `pads,' a
circumstance
that probably renders the young bull discontented
and fierce. The last is not only more active than the larger
animal, but is much more disposed to make fight,
commonly
giving his captors the greatest trouble. This may
be one of the reasons why Roswell Gardiner now found
himself towing at a reasonable rate, so close upon the flukes
of a hundred-barrel whale. Still, there was that in the
movements of this animal, that induced our hero to be
exceedingly
wary. He was now two leagues from the schooners,
and half that distance from the other boats, neither of which
had as yet fastened to a fish. This latter circumstance was
imputed to the difficulty the different officers had in making
their selections, cows, of the spermaceti breed, when they
give suck, being commonly light, and yielding,
comparatively
,
very small quantities of head-matter and oil. In
selecting
the bull, Roswell had shown his judgment, the male
animal commonly returning to its conquerors twice the
profit that is derived from the female.
The whale to which Roswell was fast continued sculling
away to windward for quite two hours, causing the men to
entirely lose sight of the other boats, and bringing the
top-sails
of the schooners themselves down to the water's edge.
Fortunately, it was not yet noon, and there were no
immediate
apprehensions from the darkness; nor did the bull
appear to be much alarmed, though the boat was towing so
close in his rear. At first, or before the irons were thrown,
the utmost care had been taken not to make a noise; but
the instant the crew were `fast,' whispers were changed
into loud calls, and orders were passed in shouts, rather
than in verbal commands. The wildest excitement
prevailed
among the men, strangely blended with a cool
dexterity
;
but it was very apparent that a high sporting fever
was raging among them. Gardiner himself was much the
coolest man in his own boat, as became his station and
very responsible duties.
Stimson, the oldest and the best seaman in the schooner,
he who had admonished his young commander on the
subject
of the gratitude due to the Deity, acted as the master's
boat-steerer, having first performed the duty of harpooner.
It was to him that Gardiner now addressed the remarks he
made, after having been fastened to his whale fully two
hours.
This fellow is likely to give us a long drag, said the
master, as he stood balancing himself on the clumsy cleets
in the bows of the boat, using his lance as an adept in
saltation poises his pole on the wire, the water curling
fairly above the gunwale forward, with the rapid movement
of the boat; I would haul up alongside, and give him
the lance, did I not distrust them flukes. I believe he
knows we are here.
That he does  that does he, Captain Gar'ner. It's
always best to be moderate and wait your time, sir. There's
a jerk about that chap's flukes that I don't like myself, and
it's best to see what he would be at, before we haul up any
nearer. Don't you see, sir, that every minute or two he
strikes down, instead of sculling off handsomely and with a
wide sweep, as becomes a whale?
14*
That is just the motion I distrust, Stephen, and I shall
wait a bit to see what he would be at. I hope those
ship-keepers
will be busy, and work the schooners well up to
windward before it gets to be dark. Our man is asleep
half his time, and is apt to let the vessel fall off a point or
two.
Mr. Hazard gave him caution to keep a bright look
out, sir, and I think he'll be apt tolook out, sir!Look
out!
This warning was well-timed; for, just at that instant
the whale ceased sculling, and lifting its enormous tail high
in the air, it struck five or six blows on the surface of the
water, that made a noise which might have been heard half
a league, besides filling the atmosphere immediately around
him with spray. As the tail first appeared in the air, line
was permitted to run out of the boat, increasing the
distance
between its bows and the flukes to quite a hundred
feet. Nothing could better show the hardy characters of
the whalers than the picture then presented by Roswell
Gardiner and his companions. In the midst of the Atlantic,
leagues from their vessel, and no other boat in sight, there
they sat patiently waiting the moment when the giant of
the deep should abate in his speed, or in his antics, to
enable
them to approach and complete their capture. Most
of the men sat with their arms crossed, and bodies
half-turned
,
regarding the scene, while the two officers, the
master and boat-steerer, if the latter could properly be thus
designated, watched each evolution with a keenness of
vigilance that let nothing like a sign or a symptom escape
them.
Such was the state of things, the whale still threshing
the sea with his flukes, when a cry among his men induced
Roswell for a moment to look aside. There came Daggett
fast to a small bull, which was running directly in the
wind's eye with great speed, dragging the boat after him,
which was towing astern at a distance of something like
two hundred fathoms. At first, Roswell thought he should
be compelled to cut from his whale, so directly towards his
own boat did the other animal direct his course. But,
intimidated
,
most probably, by the tremendous blows with
which the larger bull continued to belabour the ocean, the
smaller animal sheered away in time to avoid a collision,
though he now began to circle the spot where his dreaded
monarch lay. This change of course gave rise to a new
source of apprehension. If the smaller bull should
continue
to encircle the larger, there was great reason to
believe
that the line of Daggett might get entangled with the
boat of Gardiner, and produce a collision that might prove
fatal to all there. In order to be ready to meet this danger,
Roswell ordered his crew to be on the look-out, and to
have their knives in a state for immediate use. It was not
known what might have been the consequence of this
circular
movement as respects the two boats; for, before they
could come together, Daggett's line actually passed into
the mouth of Gardiner's whale, and drawing up tight into
the angle of his jaws, set the monster in motion with a
momentum and power that caused the iron to draw from
the smaller whale, which by this time had more than half
encircled the animal. So rapid was the rate of running
now, that Roswell was obliged to let out line, his whale
sounding to a prodigious depth. Daggett did the same,
unwilling to cut as long as he could hold on to his line.
At the expiration of five minutes the large bull came up
again for breath, with both lines still fast to him; the one
in the regular way, or attached to the harpoon, and the
other jammed in the jaws of the animal by means of the
harpoon and staff, which formed a sort of toggle at the
angle of his enormous mouth. In consequence of feeling
this unusual tenant, the fish compressed its jaws together,
thus rendering the fastening so much the more secure. As
both boats had let run line freely while the whale was
sounding, they now found themselves near a quarter of a
mile astern of him, towing along, side by side, and not fifty
feet asunder. If the spirit of rivalry had been aroused
among the crew of these two boats before, it was now
excited
to a degree that menaced acts of hostility.
You know, of course, Captain Daggett, that this is my
whale, said Gardiner. I was fast to him regularly, and
was only waiting for him to become a little quiet to lance
him, when your whale crossed his course, fouled your line,
and has got you fast in an unaccountable way, but not
according
to whaling law.
I don't know that. I fastened to a whale, Captain
Gar'ner, and am fast to a whale now. It must be
proved
that I have no right to the crittur' before I give him up.
Gardiner understood the sort of man with whom he had
to deal too well to waste words in idle remonstrances.
Resolved
to maintain his just rights at every hazard, he ordered
his men to haul in upon the line, the movement of the whale
becoming so slow as to admit of this measure. Daggett's
crew did the same, and a warm contest existed between
the two boats, as to which should now first close with the
fish and kill it. This was not a moment for prudence and
caution. It was haul in  haul in, boys, in both boats,
without any regard to the danger of approaching the whale.
A very few minutes sufficed to bring the parties quite in a
line with the flukes, Gardiner's boat coming up on the
larboard
or left-hand side of the animal, where its iron was
fast, and Daggett's on the opposite, its line leading out of
the jaws of the fish in that direction. The two masters
stood erect on their respective clumsy cleets, each poising
his lance, waiting only to get near enough to strike. The
men were now at the oars, and without pausing for any
thing, both crews sprung to their ashen instruments, and
drove the boats headlong upon the fish. Daggett, perhaps,
was the coolest and most calculating at that moment, but
Roswell was the most nervous, and the boldest. The boat
of the last actually hit the side of the whale, as its young
commander drove his lance through the blubber, into the
vitals of the fish. At the same instant Daggett threw his
lance with consummate skill, and went to the quick. It
was now stern all! for life, each boat backing off from
the danger as fast as hands could urge. The sea was in a
foam, the fish going into his flurry almost as soon as
struck, and both crews were delighted to see the red of the
blood mingling its deep hues with the white of the troubled
water. Once or twice the animal spouted, but it was a fluid
dyed in his gore. In ten minutes it turned up and was
dead.
CHAPTER XII.
God save you, sir!
And you, sir! you are welcome.
Travel you far on, or are you at the furthest?
Sir, at the furthest for a week or two.
Shakspeare
.
Gardiner
and Daggett met, face to face, on the carcase
of the whale. Each struck his lance into the blubber,
steadying
himself by its handle; and each eyed the other in a
way that betokened feelings awakened to a keen desire to
defend his rights. It is a fault of American character,a
fruit of the institutions, beyond a doubt,that renders men
unusually indisposed to give up. This stubbornness of
temperament, that so many mistake for a love of liberty
and independence, is productive of much good, when the
parties happen to be right, and of quite as much evil, when
they happen to be wrong. It is ever the wisest, as, indeed,
it is the noblest course, to defer to that which is just, with
a perfect reliance on its being the course pointed out by
the finger of infallible wisdom and truth. He who does
this, need feel no concern for his dignity, or for his
success
;
being certain that it is intended that right shall
prevail
in the end, as prevail it will and does. But both our
shipmasters were too much excited to feel the force of these
truths; and there they stood, sternly regarding each other,
as if it were their purpose to commence a new struggle for
the possession of the leviathan of the deep.
Captain Daggett, said Roswell, sharply, you are too
old a whaler not to know whaling law. My irons were first
in this fish; I never have been loose from it, since it was
first struck, and my lance killed it. Under such
circumstances
,
sir, I am surprised that any man, who knows the
usages among whalers, should have stuck by the creature
as you have done.
It's in my natur', Gar'ner, was the answer. I stuck
by you when you was dismasted under Hatteras, and I stick
by everything that I undertake. This is what I call
Vineyard
natur'; and I'm not about to discredit my native
country.
This is idle talk, returned Roswell, casting a severe
glance at the men in the Vineyard boat, among whom a
common smile arose, as if they highly approved of the reply
of their own officer. You very well know that Vineyard
law cannot settle such a question, but American law.
Were you man enough to take this whale from me, as I
trust you are not, on our return home you could be and
would be made to pay smartly for the act. Uncle Sam has
a long arm, with which he sometimes reaches round the
whole earth. Before you proceed any further in this
matter
,
it may be well to remember that.
Daggett reflected; and it is probable that, as he cooled
off from the excitement created by his late exertions, he
fully recognised the justice of the other's remarks, and the
injustice of his own claims. Still, it seemed to him
un-American
,
un-Vineyard, if the reader please, to give up;
and he clung to his error with as much pertinacity as if he
had been right.
If you are fast, I am fast, too. I'm not so certain of
your law. When a man puts an iron into a whale,
commonly
it is his fish, if he can get him, and kill him. But
there is a law above all whalers' law, and that is the law
of Divine Providence. Providence has fastened us to this
crittur', as if on purpose to give us a right in it; and I'm
by no means so sure States' law won't uphold that doctrine.
Then, I lost my own whale by means of this, and am
entitled
to some compensation for such a loss.
You lost your own whale because he led round the
head of mine, and not only drew his own iron, but came
nigh causing me to cut. If any one is entitled to damage
for such an act, it is I, who have been put to extra trouble
in getting my fish.
I do believe it was my lance that did the job for the
fellow! I darted, and you struck; in that way I got the
start of you, and may claim to have made the crittur' spout
the first blood. But, hearkee, Gar'nerthere's my hand
we've been friends so far, and I want to hold out friends.
I will make you a proposal, therefore. Join stocks from
this moment, and whale, and seal, and do all things else in
common. When we make a final stowage for the return
passage, we can make a final division, and each man take
his share of the common adventure.
To do Roswell justice, he saw through the artifice of this
proposition, the instant it was uttered. It had the effect,
notwithstanding, a good deal to mollify his feelings, since
it induced him to believe that Daggett was manuvring to
get at his great secret, rather than to assail his rights.
You are part owner of your schooner, Captain
Daggett
,
our hero answered, while I have no other interest
in mine than my lay, as her master. You may have
authority
to make such a bargain, but I have none. It is my
duty to fill the craft as fast and as full as I can, and carry
her back safely to Deacon Pratt; but, I dare say, your
Vineyard people will let you cruise about the earth at your
pleasure, trusting to Providence for a profit. I cannot
accept your offer.
This is answering like a man, Gar'ner, and I like you
all the better for it. Forty or fifty barrels of ile shan't
break friendship between us. I helped you into port at
Beaufort, and gave up the salvage; and now I'll help tow
your whale alongside, and see you fairly through this
business
,
too. Perhaps I shall have all the better luck for
being a little generous.
There was prudence, as well as art, in this decision of
Daggett's. Notwithstanding his ingenious pretensions to
a claim in the whale, he knew perfectly well that no law
would sustain it, and that, in addition to the chances of
being beaten on the spot, which were at least equal, he
would certainly be beaten in the courts at home, should he
really attempt to carry out his declared design. Then, he
really deferred to the expectation that his future good
fortune
might be influenced by his present forbearance.
Superstition
forms a material part of a sailor's nature, if,
indeed
,
it do not that of every man engaged in hazardous and
uncertain adventures. How far his hopes were justified in
this last respect, will appear in the contents of a
communication
that Deacon Pratt received from the master of his
schooner, and to which we will now refer, as the clearest
and briefest mode of continuing the narrative.
The Sea Lion left Oyster Pond late in September. It
was the third day of March, in the succeeding year, that
Mary was standing at a window, gazing with melancholy
interest at that point in the adjacent waters where last she
had seen, nearly six months before, the vessel of Roswell
disappear behind the woods of the island that bears his
family name. There had been a long easterly gale, but the
weather had changed; the south wind blew softly, and all
the indications of an early spring were visible. For the
first time in three months, she had raised the sash of that
window; and the air that entered was bland, and savoured
of the approaching season.
I dare say, unclethe deacon was writing near a very
low wood-fire, which was scarcely more than embers  I
dare say, uncle, said the sweet voice of Mary, which was a
little tremulous with feeling, that the ocean is calm enough
to-day. It is very silly in us to tremble, when there is a
storm, for those who must now be so many, many thousand
miles away. What is the distance between the Antarctic
Seas and Oyster Pond, I wonder?
You ought to be able to calculate that yourself, gal, or
what is the use to pay for your schooling?
I should not know how to set about it, uncle, returned
the gentle Mary, though I should be very glad to know.
How many miles are there in a degree of latitude,
child? You know that, I believe.
More than sixty-nine, sir.
Well, in what latitude is Oyster Pond?
I have heard Roswell say that we were a little higher,
as he calls it, than forty-one.
Well, 41 times 69figuring as he spokemake
2829; say we are 3000 miles from the equator, the nearest
way we can get there. Then, the antarctic circle
commences
in 23 30 south, which, deducted from 90 degrees,
leave just 66 30 between the equator and the nearest spot
within the sea you have mentioned. Now, 66 30 give
about 4589 statute miles more, in a straight line, allowing
only 69 to a degree. The two sums, added together, make
7589 miles, or rather more. But the road is not straight,
by any means, as shipmasters tell me; and I suppose
Gar'ner
must have gone, at the very least, 8000 miles to reach
his latitude, to say nothing of a considerable distance of
longitude to travel over, to the southward of Cape Horn.
It is a terrible distance to have a friend from us!
ejaculated Mary, though in a low, dejected tone.
It is a terrible distance for a man to trust his property
away from him, gal; and I do not sleep a-nights for
thinking
of it, when I remember where my own schooner may
be all this time!
Ah, here is Baiting Joe, and with a letter in his hand,
uncle, I do declare!
It might be a secret hope that impelled Mary, for away
she bounded, like a young fawn, running to meet the old
fisherman at the door. No sooner did her eyes fall on the
superscription, than the large package was pressed to her
heart, and she seemed, for an instant, lost in thanksgiving.
That no one might unnecessarily be a witness of what
passed between her uncle and herself, Joe was directed to
the kitchen, where a good meal, a glass of rum and water,
and the quarter of a dollar that Mary gave him as she
showed the way, satisfied him with the results of his trouble.
Here it is, uncle, cried the nearly breathless girl,
reentering
the `keeping-room,' and unconsciously holding the
letter still pressed to her heart,A lettera letter from
Roswell, in his own precious hand.
A flood of tears gave some relief to feelings that had so
long been pent, and eased a heart that had been compressed
nearly to breaking. At any other time, and at this
unequivocal
evidence of the hold the young man had on the
affections
of his niece, Deacon Pratt would have remonstrated
with her on the folly of refusing to become Roswell
Gar'ner's
wife; but the sight of the letter drove all other
thoughts from his head, concentrating his whole being in
the fate of the schooner.
Look, and see if it has the Antarctic post-mark on it,
Mary, said the deacon, in a tremulous voice.
This request was not made so much in ignorance as in
trepidation. The deacon very well knew that the islands
the Sea Lion was to visit were uninhabited, and were
destitute
Vol. I.  15
of post-offices; but his ideas were confused, and
apprehension
rendered him silly.
Uncle! exclaimed the niece, wiping the tears from a
face that was now rosy with blushes at her own weakness,
surely, Roswell can find no post-office where he is!
But the letter must have some post-mark, child. Baiting
Joe has not brought it himself into the country.
It is post-marked `New York,' sir, and nothing else
Yes, here is `Forwarded by Cane, Spriggs, and Button,
Rio de Janeiro.' It must have been put into a post-office
there.
Rio!Here is more salvage, galmore salvage
coming
to afflict me!
But you had no salvage to pay, uncle, on the other
occasion
;
perhaps there will be none to pay on this. Had I
not better open the letter at once, and see what has
happened
?
Yes, open it, child, answered the deacon, in a voice
so feeble as to be scarcely audibleopen it at once, as
you say, and let me know my fate. Anything is better than
this torment!
Mary did not wait for a second permission, but instantly
broke the seal. It might have been the result of education,
or there may be such a thing as female instinct in these
matters; but, certain it is, that the girl turned towards the
window, as she tore the paper asunder, and slipped the
letter that bore her own name into a fold of her dress, so
dexterously, that one far more keen-sighted than her uncle
would not have detected the act. No sooner was her own
letter thus secured, than the niece offered the principal
epistle to her uncle.
Read it yourself, Mary, said the last, in his querulous
tones. My eyes are so dim, that I could not see to read it.
Rio di Janeiro, Province of Brazil, South America,
Nov. 14th, 1819, commenced the niece.
Rio di Janeiro! interrupted the uncle. Why that
is round Cape Horn, isn't it, Mary?
Certainly not, sir. Brazil is on the east side of the
Andes, and Rio di Janeiro is its capital. The king of Por
tugal lives there now, and has lived there as long as I can
remember.
Yes, yes; I had forgotten. The Brazil Banks, where
our whalers go, are in the Atlantic. But what can have
taken Gar'ner into Rio, unless it be to spend more money!
By reading the letter, sir, we shall soon know. I see
there is something about spermaceti oil here.
He? And spalm ile, do you say! exclaimed the
deacon
,
brightening up at once  Read on, Mary, my good
galread the letter as fast as you canread it at a trot.
Deacon Israel Pratt  Dear sir, continued Mary, in
obedience to this command, the two schooners sailed from
Beaufort, North Carolina, as stated already per mail, in a
letter written at that port, and which has doubtless come
to hand. We had fine weather and a tolerable run of it,
until we reached the calm latitudes, where we were
detained
by the usual changes for about a week. On the
18th Oct. the pleasant cry of `there she spouts' was heard
aboard here, and we found ourselves in the neighbourhood
of whales. Both schooners lowered their boats, and I was
soon fast to a fine bull, who gave us a long tow before the
lance was put into him, and he was made to spout blood.
Captain Daggett set up some claims to this fish, in
consequence
of his line's getting foul of the creature's jaws, but
he changed his mind in good season, and clapped on to
help tow the whale down to the vessel. His irons drew from
a young bull, and a good deal of dissatisfaction existed
among the other crew, until, fortunately, the school of
young bulls came round quite near us, when Captain
Daggett
and his people succeeded in securing no less than
three of the fish, and Mr. Hazard got a very fine one
for us.
I am happy to say that we had very pleasant weather
to cut in, and secured every gallon of the oil of both our
whales, as did Captain Daggett all of his. Our largest bull
made one hundred and nineteen barrels, of which
forty-three
barrels was head-matter. I never saw better case
and junk in a whale in my life. The smallest bull turned
out well too, making fifty-eight barrels, of which
twenty-one
was head. Daggett got one hundred and thirty-three
barrels from his three fish, a very fair proportion of head,
though not as large as our own. Having this oil on board,
we came in here after a pleasant run; and I have shipped,
as per invoice enclosed, one hundred and seventy-seven
barrels
of spermaceti oil, viz., sixty-four barrels of head, and rest
in body-oil, to your order, care of Fish & Grinnell, New
York, by the brig Jason, Captain Williams, who will sail
for home about the 20th proximo, and to whom I trust this
letter
Stop, Mary, my dearthis news is overpoweringit is
almost too good to be true, interrupted the deacon, nearly
as much unmanned by this intelligence of his good fortune
as he had previously been by his apprehensions. Yes, it
does seem too good to be true; read it again, child; yes,
read every syllable of it again!
Mary complied, delighted enough to hear all she could
of Roswell's success.
Why, uncle, said the deeply-interested girl, all this
oil is spermaceti! It is worth a great deal more than so
much of that which comes of the right whale.
More! Ay, nearly as three for one. Hunt me up the
last Spectator, girl  hunt me up the last Spectator, and
let me see at once at what they quote spalm.
Mary soon found the journal, and handed it to her
uncle.
Yes, here it is, and quoted $1.12 per gallon, as I live!
That's nine shillings a gallon, Maryjust calculate on that
bit of paperthirty times one hundred and seventy-seven,
Mary; how much is that, child?
I make it 5310, uncle  yes, that is right. But what
are the 30 times for, sir?
Gallons, gal, gallons. Each barrel has 30 gallons in it,
if not more. There ought to be 32 by rights, but this is a
cheating age. Now, multiply 5310 by 9, and see what that
comes to.
Just 47,790, sir, as near as I can get it.
Yes, that's the shillings. Now, divide 47,790 by 8, my
dear. Be actyve, Mary, be actyve.
It leaves 5973, with a remainder of 6, sir. I believe
I'm right.
I dare say you are, child; yes, I dare say you are. This
is the dollars. A body may call them $6000, as the barrels
will a little overrun the 30 gallons. My share of this will
be two-thirds, and that will nett the handsome sum of, say
$4000!
The deacon rubbed his hands with delight, and having
found his voice again, his niece was astonished at hearing
him utter what he had to say, with a sort of glee that
sounded in her ears as very unnatural, coming from him.
So it was, however, and she dutifully endeavoured not to
think of it.
Four thousand dollars, Mary, will quite cover the first
cost of the schooner; that is without including outfit and
spare-rigging, of which her master took about twice as much
as was necessary. He's a capital fellow, is that young
Gar'ner, and will make an excellent husband, as I've always
told you, child. A little wasteful, perhaps, but an excellent
youth at the bottom. I dare say he lost his spars off Cape
Hatteras in trying to outsail that Daggett; but I overlook
all that now. He's a capital youth to work upon a whale
or a sea-elephant! There isn't his equal, as I'll engage,
in all Ameriky, if you'll only let him know where to find
the creatur's. I knew his character before I engaged him;
for no man but a real skinner shall ever command a craft
of mine.
Roswell
is
a good fellow, answered Mary, with
emphasis
,
the tears filling her eyes as she listened to these
eulogiums of her uncle on the youth she loved with all of a
woman's tenderness, at the very moment she scrupled to
place her happiness on one whose `God was not her God.'
No one knows him better than I, uncle, and no one
respects
him more. But, had I not better read the rest of his
letter?there is a good deal more of it.
Go on, child, go on  but, read the part over again
where he speaks of the quantity of the ile he has shipped
to Fish & Grinnell.
Mary did as requested, when she proceeded to read aloud
the rest of the communication.
I have been much at a loss how to act in regard to
Captain Daggett, said Roswell, in his letter. He stood
by me so manfully and generously off Cape Hatteras, that I
did not like to part company in the night, or in a squall,
which would have seemed ungrateful, as well as wearing a
sort of runaway look. I am afraid he has some knowledge
15*
of the existence of our islands, though I doubt whether he
has their latitude and longitude exactly. Something there
is of this nature on board the other schooner, her people
often dropping hints to my officers and men, when they
have been gamming. I have sometimes fancied Daggett
sticks so close to us, that he may get the advantage of our
reckoning to help him to what he wants to find. He is no
great navigator anywhere, running more by signs and
currents
,
in my judgment, than by the use of his instruments.
Still, he could find his way to any part of the world.
Stop there, Mary; stop a little, and let me have time
to consider. Isn't it awful, child?
The niece changed colour, and seemed really frightened,
so catching was the deacon's distress, though she scarce
knew what was the matter.
What is awful, uncle? at length she asked, anxious
to know the worst.
This covetousness in them Vineyarders! I consider
it both awful and wicked. I must get the Rev. Mr. Whittle
to preach against the sin of covetousness; it does gain so
much ground in Ameriky! The whole church should lift
its voice against it, or it will shortly lift its voice against
the church. To think of them Daggetts' fitting out a
schooner to follow my craft about the 'arth in this
unheard-of
manner; just as if she was a pilot-boat, and young
Gar'ner a pilot! I do hope the fellows will make a wrack
of it, among the ice of the antarctic seas! That would be
a fit punishment for their impudence and covetousness.
I suppose, sir, they think that they have the same right
to sail on the ocean that others have. Seals and whales are
the gifts of God, and one person has no more right to them
than another.
You forget, Mary, that one man may have a secret that
another doesn't know. In that case he ought not to go
prying about like an old woman in a village
neighbourhood
.
Read on, child, read on, and let me know the worst
at once.
I shall sail to-morrow, having finished all my business
here, and hope to be off Cape Horn in twenty days, if not
sooner. In what manner I am to get rid of Daggett, I do
not yet know. He outsails me a little on all tacks, unless
it be in very heavy weather, when I have a trifling
advantage
over him. It will be in my power to quit him any
dark night; but if I let him go ahead, and he should really
have any right notions about the position of the islands, he
might get there first, and make havoc among the seals.
Awful, awful! interrupted the deacon, again; that
would be the worst of all! I won't allow it; I forbid it
it shall not be.
Alas! uncle, poor Roswell is too far from us, now, to
hear these words. No doubt the matter is long since
decided
,
and he has acted according to the best of his
judgment
.
It is terrible to have one's property so far away!
Government
ought to have steam-boats, or packets of some
sort, running between New York and Cape Horn, to carry
orders back and forth.But we shall never have things
right, Mary, so long as the democrats are uppermost.
By this remark, which savours very strongly of a species
of censure that is much in fashion in the coteries of that
Great Emporium, which it is the taste and pleasure of its
people to term a
commercial
emporium, especially among
elderly ladies, the reader will at once perceive that the
deacon was a federalist, which was somewhat of a novelty
in Suffolk, thirty years since. Had he lived down to our
own times, the old man would probably have made all the
gyrations in politics that have distinguished the school to
which he would have belonged, and, without his own
knowledge
,
most probably, would have been as near an example
of perpetual motion as the world will ever see, through his
devotion to what are now called Whig Principles. We
are no great politician, but time has given us the means of
comparing; and we often smile when we hear the disciples
of Hamilton, and of Adams, and of all that high-toned
school, declaiming against the use of the veto, and talking
of the one man power, and of Congress' leading the
government
!
The deacon was very apt to throw the
opprobrium
of even a bad season on the administration, and the
reader has seen what he thought of the subject of running
packets between New York and Cape Horn.
There ought to be a large navy, Mary, a monstrous
navy, so that the vessels might be kept carrying letters
about, and serving the public. But we shall never have
things right, until Rufus King, or some man like him, gets
in. If Gar'ner lets that Daggett get the start of him, he
never need come home again. The islands are as much
mine as if I had bought them; and I'm not sure an action
wouldn't lie for seals taken on them without my consent.
Yes, yes; we want a monstrous navy, to convoy sealers,
and carry letters about, and keep some folks at home, while
it lets other folks go about their lawful business.
Of what islands are you speaking, uncle? Surely the
sealing islands, where Roswell has gone, are public and
uninhabited, and no one has a better right there than
another
!
The deacon perceived that he had gone too far, in his
tribulation, and began to have a faint notion that he was
making a fool of himself. He asked his niece, in a very
faint voice, therefore, to hand him the letter, the remainder
of which he would endeavour to read himself. Although
every word that Roswell Gardiner wrote was very precious
to Mary, the gentle girl had a still unopened epistle to
herself
to peruse, and glad enough was she to make the
exchange
.
Handing the deacon his letter, therefore, she
withdrew at once to her private room, in order to read her
own.
`Dearest Mary, said Roswell Gardiner, in this epistle,
your uncle will tell you what has brought us into this
port, and all things connected with the schooner. I have
sent home more than $4000 worth of oil, and I hope my
owner will forgive the accident off Currituck, on account
of this run of good luck. In my opinion, we shall yet
make a voyage, and that part of my fortune will be secure.
Would that I could feel as sure of finding you more
disposed
to be kind to me, on my return! I read in your
Bible every day, Mary, and I often pray to God to enlighten
my mind, if my views have been wrong. As yet, I cannot
flatter myself with any change, for my old opinions appear
rather to be more firmly rooted than they were before I
sailed. Here poor Mary heaved a heavy sigh, and wiped
the tears from her eyes. She was pained to a degree she
could hardly believe possible, though she did full credit to
Roswell's frankness. Like all devout persons, her faith in
the efficacy of sacred writ was strong: and she so much
the more lamented her suitor's continued blindness, because
it remained after light had shone upon it. Still, Mary,
the letter added, as I have every human inducement to
endeavour to be right, I shall not throw aside the book, by
any means. In that I fully believe; our difference being
in what the volume teaches. Pray for me, sweetest girl
but I know you do, and will continue to do, as long as I
am absent.
Yes, indeed, Roswell, murmured Maryas long as
you and I live!
Next to this one great concern of my life, comes that
which this man Daggett gives me,the letter went on to
say. I hardly know what to do under all the
circumstances
.
Keep in his company much longer I cannot,
without violating my duty to the deacon. Yet, it is not
easy, in any sense, to get rid of him. He has stood by me
so manfully on all occasions, and seems so much disposed
to make good-fellowship of the voyage, that, did it depend
on myself only, I should at once make a bargain with him
to seal in company, and to divide the spoils. But this is
now impossible, and I must quit him in some way or other.
He outsails me in most weathers, and it is a thing easier
said than done. What will make it more difficult is the
growing shortness of the nights. The days lengthen fast
now, and as we go south they will become so much longer,
that, by the time when it will be indispensable to separate,
it will be nearly all day. The thing must be done,
however
,
and I trust to luck to be able to do it as it ought to
be effected.
And now, dearest, dearest Mary_____ But why should
we lift the veil from the feelings of this young man, who
concluded his letter by pouring out his whole heart in a
few sincere and manly sentences. Mary wept over them
most of that day, perusing and reperusing them, until her
eyes would scarce perform their proper office.
A few days later the deacon was made a very happy man
by the receipt of a letter from Fish & Grinnell, notifying
him of the arrival of his oil, accompanied by a most
gratifying
account of the state of the market, and asking for
instructions. The oil was disposed of, and the deacon
pocketed his portion of the proceeds as soon as possible;
eagerly looking for a new and profitable investment for the
avails. Great was the reputation Roswell Gardiner made
by this capture of the two spermaceti whales, and by
sending
the proceeds to so good a market. In commerce, as in
war, success is all in all, though in both success is nearly
as often the result of unforeseen circumstances as of
calculations
and wisdom. It is true there are a sort of trade,
and a sort of war, in which prudence and care may effect
a great deal, yet are both often outstripped by the random
exertions and adventures of those who calculate almost as
wildly as they act. Audacity, as the French term it, is a
great quality in war, and often achieves more than the most
calculated wisdom  nay, it becomes wisdom in that sort
of struggle; and we are far from being sure that audacity
is not sometimes as potent in trade. At all events, it was
esteemed a bold, as well as a prosperous exploit, for a little
schooner like the Sea Lion of Oyster Pond, to take a
hundred-barrel
whale, and to send home its ile, as the
deacon
always pronounced the word, in common with most
others in old Suffolk.
Long and anxious months, with one exception, succeeded
this bright spot of sunshine in Mary Pratt's solicitude in
behalf of the absent Roswell. She knew there was but
little chance of hearing from him again until he returned
north. The exception was a short letter that the deacon
received, dated two weeks later than that written from Rio,
in latitude forty-one, or just as far south of the equator as
Oyster Pond was north of it, and nearly fourteen hundred
miles to the southward of Rio. This letter was written in
great haste, to send home by a Pacific trader who was
accidentally
met nearer the coast than was usual for such
vessels to be. It stated that all was well; that the schooner
of Daggett was still in company; and that Gardiner
intended
to get shut of her, as the deacon expressed it, on
the very first occasion.
After the receipt of this letter, the third written by
Roswell
Gardiner since he left home, a long and blank interval
of silence succeeded. Then it was that months passed
away in an anxious and dark uncertainty. Spring followed
winter, summer succeeded to spring, and autumn came to
reap the fruits of all the previous seasons, without bringing
any further tidings from the adventurers. Then winter
made its second appearance since the Sea Lion had sailed,
filling the minds of the mariners' friends with sad
forebodings
as they listened to the moanings of the gales that
accompanied that bleak and stormy quarter of the year.
Deep and painful were the anticipations of the deacon, in
whom failing health, and a near approach to the last of
earth, came to increase the gloom. As for Mary, youth
and health sustained her; but her very soul was heavy, as
she pondered on so long and uncertain an absence.
CHAPTER XIII.
Safely in harbour
Is the king's ship; in the deep nook, where once
Thou calledst me up at midnight to fetch dew
From the still vex'd Bermoothes, there she's hid.
Tempest
.
The
letter of Roswell Gardiner last received, bore the
date of December 10th, 1819, or just a fortnight after he
had sailed from Rio de Janeiro. We shall next present the
schooner of Deacon Pratt to the reader on the 18th of that
month, or three weeks and one day after she had sailed
from the capital of Brazil. Early in the morning of the
day last mentioned, the Sea Lion of Oyster Pond was
visible
,
standing to the northward, with the wind light but
freshening from the westward, and in smooth water. Land
was not only in sight, but was quite near, less than a league
distant. Towards this land the head of the schooner had
been laid, and she was approaching it at the rate of some
four or five knots. The land was broken, high, of a most
sterile aspect where it was actually to be seen, and nearly
all covered with a light but melting snow, though the
season
was advanced to the middle of the first month in
summer
.
The weather was not very cold, however, and there
was a feeling about it that promised it would become still
milder. The aspect of the neighbouring land, so barren,
rugged and inhospitable, chilled the feelings, and gave to
the scene a sombre hue which the weather itself might not
have imparted. Directly ahead of the schooner rose a sort
of pyramid of broken rocks, which, occupying a small
island, stood isolated in a measure, and some distance in
advance of other and equally ragged ranges of mountains,
which belonged also to islands detached from the main
land thousands of years before, under some violent
convulsions
of nature.
It was quite apparent that all on board the schooner
regarded
that ragged pyramid with lively interest. Most of
the crew was collected on the forecastle, including the
officers, and all eyes were fastened on the ragged pyramid
which they were diagonally approaching. The principal
spokesman was Stimson, the oldest mariner on board, and
one who had oftener visited those seas than any other of
the crew.
You know the spot, do you, Stephen? demanded
Roswell Gardiner, with interest.
Yes, sir, there's no mistake. That's the Horn. Eleven
times have I doubled it, and this is the third time that I've
been so close in as to get a fair sight of it. Once I went
inside, as I've told you, sir.
I have doubled it six times myself, said Gardiner,
but never saw it before. Most navigators give it a wide
berth. 'Tis said to be the stormiest spot on the known
earth!
That's a mistake, you may depend on't, sir. The
sow-westers blow great guns here-abouts, it is true enough;
and when they do, sich a sea comes tumbling in on that
rock as man never seed anywhere else, perhaps; but, on
the whull, I'd rather be close in here, than two hundred
miles further to the southward. With the wind at
sow-west
,
and heavy, a better slant might be made from the
southern position; but here I know where I am, and I'd
go in and anchor, and wait for the gale to blow itself
out.
Talking of seas, Captain Gar'ner, observed Hazard,
don't you think, sir, we begin to feel the swell of the
Pacific. Smooth as the surface of the water is, here is a
ground-swell rolling in that must be twelve or fifteen feet
in height.
There's no doubt of that. We have felt the swell of the
Pacific these two hours; no man can mistake
that
. The
Atlantic has no such waves. This is an ocean in reality,
and this is its stormiest part. The wind freshens and hauls,
and I'm afraid we are about to be caught close in here,
with a regular sow-west gale.
Let it come, sir, let it come, put in Stimson, again;
if it does, we've only to run in and anchor. I can stand
pilot, and I promise to carry the schooner where twenty
sow-westers will do her no harm. What I've seen done
once, I know can be done again. The time will come when
the Horn will be a reg'lar harbour.
Roswell left the forecastle, and walked aft, pondering on
what had just been said. His situation was delicate, and
demanded decision, as well as prudence. The manner in
which Daggett had stuck by him, ever since the two vessels
took their departure from Block Island, is known to the
reader. The Sea Lions had sailed from Rio in company,
and they had actually made Staten Land together, the day
preceding that on which we now bring the Oyster Pond
craft once more upon the scene, and had closed so near as
to admit of a conversation between the two masters. It
would seem that Daggett was exceedingly averse to passing
through the Straits of le Maire. An uncle of his had been
wrecked there, and had reported the passage as the most
dangerous one he had ever encountered. It has its
difficulties
,
no doubt, in certain states of the wind and tide;
but Roswell had received good accounts of the place from
Stimson, who had been through several times. The wind
was rather scant to go through, and the weather threatened
to be thick. As Daggett urged his reasons for keeping off
and passing outside of Staten Land, a circuit of
considerable
extent, besides bringing a vessel far to leeward with the
prevalent winds of that region, which usually blow from
northwest round to southwest, Roswell was reflecting on
the opportunity the circumstances afforded of giving his
consort the slip. After discussing the matter for some
time, he desired Daggett to lead on, and he would follow.
Vol. I.  16
This was done, though neither schooner was kept off until
Roswell got a good view of Cape St. Diego, on Tierra del
Fuego, thereby enabling him to judge of the positions of
the principal land-marks. Without committing himself
by any promise, therefore, he told Daggett to lead on, and
for some time he followed, the course being one that did
not take him much out of the way. The weather was
misty, and at times the wind blew in squalls. The last
increased as the schooners drew nearer to Staten Land.
Daggett, being about half a mile ahead, felt the full power
of one particular squall that came out of the ravines with
greater force than common, and he kept away to increase
his distance from the land. At the same time, the mist
shut in the vessels from each other. It was also past
sunset
,
and a dark and dreary night was approaching. This
latter fact had been one of Daggett's arguments for going
outside. Profiting by all these circumstances, Roswell
tacked, and stood over towards Tierra del Fuego. He
knew from the smoothness of the water that an ebb-tide
was running, and trusted to its force to carry him through
the Straits. He saw no more of the Sea Lion of the
Vineyard
.
She continued shut in by the mist until night closed
around both vessels. When he got about mid-channel,
Roswell tacked again. By this time the current had sucked
him fairly into the passage, and no sooner did he go about
than his movement to the southward was very rapid. The
squalls gave some trouble, but, on the whole, he did very
well. Next morning he was off Cape Horn, as described.
By this expression, it is generally understood that a vessel is
somewhere near the longitude of that world-renowned cape,
but not necessarily in sight of it. Few navigators actually
see the extremity of the American continent, though they
double the cape, it being usually deemed the safest to pass
well to the southward. Such was Daggett's position; who,
in consequence of having gone outside of Staten Land, was
now necessarily a long distance to leeward, and who could
not hope to beat up abreast of the Hermits, even did the
wind and sea favour him, in less than twenty-four hours.
A great advantage was obtained by coming through the
Straits of Le Maire, and Roswell felt very certain that he
should not see his late consort again that day, even did he
heave-to for him. But our hero had no idea of doing
anything
of the sort. Having shaken off his leech, he had no
wish to suffer it to fasten to him again. It was solely with
the intention of making sure of this object that he thought
of making a harbour.
In order that the reader may better understand those
incidents
of our narrative which we are about to relate, it
may be well to say a word of the geographical features of
the region to which he has been transported, in fiction, if
not in fact. At the southern extremity of the American
continent
is a cluster of islands, which are dark, sterile, rocky,
and most of the year covered with snow. Evergreens
relieve
the aspect of sterility, in places that are a little
sheltered
,
and there is a meagre vegetation in spots that serve
to sustain animal life. The first strait which separates
this cluster of islands from the main, is that of Magellan,
through which vessels occasionally pass, in preference to
going farther south. Then comes Tierra del Fuego, which
is much the largest of all the islands. To the southward
of Tierra del Fuego lies a cluster of many small islands,
which bear different names; though the group farthest
south of all, and which it is usual to consider as the southern
termination of our noble continent, but which is not on a
continent at all, is known by the appropriate appellation
of the Hermits. If solitude, and desolation, and want, and
a contemplation of some of the sublimest features of this
earth, can render a spot fit for a hermitage, these islands
are very judiciously named. The one that is farthest south
contains the cape itself, which is marked by the ragged
pyramid of rock already mentioned; placed there by
nature
;
a never-tiring sentinel of the war of the elements.
Behind this cluster of the Hermits it was that Stimson
advised
his officer to take refuge against the approaching
gale, of which the signs were now becoming obvious and
certain. Roswell's motive, however, for listening to such
advice, was less to find a shelter for his schooner than to
get rid of Daggett. For the gale he cared but little, since
he was a long way from the ice, and could stretch off the
land to the southward into a waste of waters that seems
interminable
.
There are islands to the southward of Cape
Horn, and a good many of them too, though none very
near. It is now known, also, by means of the toils and
courage of various seamen, including those of the
persevering
and laborious Wilkes, the most industrious and the
least rewarded of all the navigators who have ever worked
for the human race in this dangerous and exhausting
occupation
,
that a continent is there also; but, at the period of
which we are writing, the existence of the Shetlands and
Palmer's Land was the extent of the later discoveries in
that part of the ocean. After pacing the quarter-deck a few
minutes, when he quitted the forecastle as mentioned,
Roswell
Gardiner again went forward among the men.
You are quite sure that this high peak is the Horn,
Stimson? he observed, inquiringly.
Sartain of it, sir. There's no mistaking sich a place,
which, once seen, is never forgotten.
It agrees with the charts and our reckoning, and I may
say it agrees with our eyes also. Here is the Pacific Ocean,
plain enough, Mr. Hazard.
So I think, sir. We are at the end of Ameriky, if it
has
an end anywhere. This heavy long swell is an old
acquaintance
,
though I never was in close enough to see the
land, hereabouts, before.
It is fortunate we have one trusty hand on board who
can stand pilot. Stimson, I intend to go in and anchor,
and I shall trust to you to carry me into a snug berth.
I'll do it, Captain Gar'ner, if the weather will permit
it, returned the seaman, with an unpretending sort of
confidence that spoke well for his ability.
Preparations were now commenced in earnest, to come
to. It was time that some steady course should be adopted,
as the wind was getting up, and the schooner was rapidly
approaching the land. In half an hour the Sea Lion was
bending to a little gale, with her canvass reduced to
close-reefed
mainsail and foresail, and the bonnet off her jib.
The sea was fast getting up, though it came in long, and
mountain-like. Roswell dreaded the mist. Could he pass
through the narrow channels that Stimson had described to
him, with a clear sky, one half of his causes of anxiety
would be removed. But the wind was not a clear one, and
he felt that no time was to be lost.
It required great nerve to approach a coast like that of
Cape Horn in such weather. As the schooner got nearer
to the real cape, the sight of the seas tumbling in and
breaking on its ragged rock, and the hollow roaring sound
they made, actually became terrifie. To add to the awe
inspired in the breast of even the most callous-minded man
on board, came a doubt whether the schooner could
weather
a certain point of rock, the western extremity of the
island, after she had got so far into a bight as to render
waring questionable, if not impossible. Every one now
looked grave and anxious. Should the schooner go ashore
in such a place, a single minute would suffice to break her
to pieces, and not a soul could expect to be saved.
Roswell
was exceedingly anxious, though he remained cool.
The tides and eddies about these rocks, and in so high
a latitude, sweep a vessel like chips, he said to his chief
mate. We have been set in here by an eddy, and a
terrible
place it is.
All depends on our gears holding on, sir, was the
answer
,
with a little on Providence. Just watch the point
ahead, Captain Gar'ner; though we are not actually to
leeward of it, see with what a drift we have drawn upon it!
The manner in which these seas roll in from the sow-west
is terrific! No craft can go to windward against them.
This remark of Hazard's was very just. The seas that
came down upon the cape resembled a rolling prairie in
their outline. A single wave would extend a quarter of a
mile from trough to trough, and as it passed beneath the
schooner, lifting her high in the air, it really seemed as if
the glancing water would sweep her away in its force. But
human art had found the means to counteract even this
imposing display of the power of nature. The little schooner
rode over the billows like a duck, and when she sank
between
two of them, it was merely to rise again on a new
summit, and breast the gale gallantly. It was the current
that menaced the greatest danger; for that, unseen except
in its fruits, was clearly setting the little craft to leeward,
and bodily towards the rocks. By this time our adventurers
were so near the land that they almost gave up hope itself.
Cape Hatteras and its much-talked-of dangers, seemed a
place of refuge compared to that in which our navigators
now found themselves. Could the deepest bellowings of
16*
ten thousand bulls be united in a common roar, the noise
would not have equalled that of the hollow sound which
issued from a sea as it went into some cavern of the rocks.
Then, the spray filled the air like driving rain, and there
were minutes when the cape, though so frightfully near,
was hid from view by the vapour.
At this precise moment, the Sea Lion was less than a
quarter of a mile to windward of the point she was
struggling to weather, and towards which she was
driving
under a treble impetus; that of the wind, acting
on her sails, and pressing her ahead at the rate of fully
five knots, for the craft was kept a rap full; that of the
eddy, or current, and that of the rolling waters. No
man spoke, for each person felt that the crisis was one
in which silence was a sort of homage to the Deity.
Some prayed privately, and all gazed on the low rocky
point that it was indispensable to pass, to avoid destruction.
There was one favourable circumstance; the water was
known to be deep, quite close to the iron-bound coast, and
it was seldom that any danger existed, that it was not
visible
to the eye. This, Roswell knew from Stimson's
accounts
,
as well as from those of other mariners, and he saw
that the fact was of the last importance to him. Should
he be able to weather the point ahead, that which
terminated
at the mouth of the passage that led within the
Hermits
,
it was now certain it could be done only by going
fearfully near the rocks.
Roswell Gardiner took his station between the
knight-heads
,
beckoning to Stimson to come near him. At the
same time, Hazard himself went to the helm.
Do you remember this place? asked the young
master
of the old seaman.
This is the spot, sir; and if we can round the rocky
point ahead, I will take you to a safe anchorage. Our drift
is awful, or we are in an eddy tide here, sir!
It is the eddy, answered Roswell, calmly, though
our drift is not trifling. This is getting frightfully near to
that point!
Hold on, sirit's our only chance;hold on, and we
may rub and go.
If we
rub
, we are lost; that is certain enough. Should
we get by
this
first point, there is another, a short distance
beyond it, which must certainly fetch us up, I fear. See
it opens more, as we draw ahead.
Stimson saw the new danger, and fully appreciated it.
He did not speak, however; for, to own the truth, he now
abandoned all hope, and, being a piously inclined person,
he was privately addressing himself to God. Every man
on board was fully aware of the character of this new
dander
,
and all seemed to forget that of the nearest point of
rock, towards which they were now wading with portentous
speed. That point
might
be passed; there was a little hope
there; but as to the point a quarter of a mile beyond, with
the leeward set of the schooner, the most ignorant hand on
board saw how unlikely it was that they should get by it.
An imposing silence prevailed in the schooner, as she
came abreast of the first rock. It was about fifty fathoms
under the lee bow, and, as to
that
spot, all depended on the
distance outward that the dangers thrust themselves. This
it was impossible to see amid the chaos of waters produced
by the collision between the waves and the land. Roswell
fastened his eyes on objects ahead, to note the rate of his
leeward set, and, with a seaman's quickness, he noted the
first change.
She feels the under-tow, Stephen, he said, in a voice
so compressed as to seem to come out of the depths of his
chest, and is breasted up to windward!
What means that sudden luff, sir? Mr. Hazard must
keep a good full, or we shall have no chance.
Gardiner looked aft, and saw that the mate was bearing
the helm well up, as if he met with much resistance. The
truth then flashed upon him, and he shouted out
All's well, boys! God be praised, we have caught the
ebb-tide, under our lee-bow!
These few words explained the reason of the change.
Instead of setting to leeward, the schooner was now
meeting
a powerful tide of some four or five knots, which hawsed
her up to wind ward with irresistible force. As if conscious
of the danger she was in, the tight little craft receded from
the rocks as she shot ahead, and rounded that second point,
which, a minute before, had appeared to be placed there
purposely to destroy her. It was handsomely doubled, at
the safe distance of a hundred fathoms. Roswell believed
he might now beat his schooner off the land far enough to
double the cape altogether, could he but keep her in that
current. It doubtless expended itself, however, a short
distance
in the offing, as its waters diffused themselves on the
breast of the ocean; and it was this diffusion of the element
that produced the eddy which had proved so nearly fatal.
In ten minutes after striking the tide, the schooner
opened the passage fairly, and was kept away to enter it.
Notwithstanding it blew so heavily, the rate of sailing, by
the land, did not exceed five knots. This was owing to the
great strength of the tide, which sometimes rises and falls
thirty feet, in high latitudes and narrow waters. Stimson
now showed he was a man to be relied on. Conning the
craft intelligently, he took her in behind the island on
which the cape stands, luffed her up into a tiny cove, and
made a cast of the lead. There were fifty fathoms of water,
with a bottom of mud. With the certainty that there was
enough of the element to keep him clear of the ground at
low water, and that his anchors would hold, Roswell made
a flying moor, and veered out enough cable to render his
vessel secure.
Here, then, was the Sea Lion of Oyster Pond, that craft
which the reader had seen lying at Deacon Pratt's wharf,
only three short months before, safely anchored in a nook
of the rocks behind Cape Horn. No navigator but a sealer
would have dreamed of carrying his vessel into such a place,
but it is a part of their calling to poke about in channels
and passages where no one else has ever been. It was in
this way that Stimson had learned to know where to find
his present anchorage. The berth of the schooner was
perfectly snug, and entirely land-locked. The tremendous
swell that was rolling in on the outside, caused the waters
to rise and fall a little within the passage, but there was no
strain upon the cables in consequence. Neither did the
rapid tides affect the craft, which lay in an eddy that merely
kept her steady. The gale came howling over the Hermits,
but was so much broken by the rocks as to do little more
than whistle through the cordage and spars aloft.
Three days, and as many nights, did the gale from the
south-west continue. The fourth day there was a change,
the wind coming from the eastward. Roswell would now
have gone out, had it not been for the apprehension of
falling
in with Daggett again. Having at length gotten rid
of that pertinacious companion, it would have been an act
of great weakness to throw himself blindly in his way once
more. It was possible that Daggett might not suppose he
had been left intentionally, in which case, he would be very
apt to look for his lost consort in the vicinity of the cape.
As for the gale, it might, or it might not, have blown him
to leeward. A good deal would depend on the currents,
and his distance to the southward. Near the land,
Gardidiner
believed the currents favoured a vessel doubling it,
going west; and if Daggett was also aware of this fact, it
might induce him to keep as near the spot as possible.
Time was very precious to our sealers, the season being
so short in the high latitudes. Still, they were a little in
advance of their calculations, having got off the Horn
fully ten days sooner than they had hoped to be there.
Nearly the whole summer was before them, and there was
the possibility of their even being too soon for the loosening
of the ice further south. The wind was the strongest
inducement
to go out, for the point to which our adventurers
were bound lay a considerable distance to the westward,
and fair breezes were not to be neglected. Under all the
circumstances, however, it was decided to remain within
the passage one day longer, and this so much the more,
because Hazard had discovered some signs of sea-elephants
frequenting an island at no great distance. The boats were
lowered accordingly, and the mate went in one direction,
while the master pulled up to the rocks, and landed on the
Hermit, or the island which should bear that name,
par
excellence
, being that in which the group terminates.
Taking Stimson with him, to carry a glass, and armed
with an old lance as a pike-pole, to aid his efforts, Roswell
Gardiner now commenced the ascent of the pyramid already
mentioned. It was ragged, and offered a thousand obstacles,
but none that vigour and resolution could not overcome.
After a few minutes of violent exertion, and by helping
each other in difficult places, both Roswell and Stimson
succeeded in placing themselves on the summit of the
elevation
,
which was an irregular peak. The height was
considerable, and gave an extended view of the adjacent
islands, as well as of the gloomy and menacing ocean to
the southward. The earth, probably, does not contain a
more remarkable sentinel than this pyramid on which our
hero had now taken his station. There it stood, actually
the Ultima Thule of this vast continent, or, what was much
the same, so closely united to it as to seem a part of our
own moiety of the globe, looking out on the broad expanse
of waters. The eye saw, to the right, the Pacific; in front
was the Southern, or Antarctic Ocean; and to the left was
the great Atlantic. For several minutes, both Roswell and
Stephen sat mute, gazing on this grand spectacle. By
turning their faces north, they beheld the high lands of
Terra del Fuego, of which many of the highest peaks were
covered with snow. The pyramid on which they were,
however, was no longer white with the congealed rain, but
stood, stern and imposing, in its native brown. The
outlines
of all the rocks, and the shores of the different islands,
had an appearance of volcanic origin, though the rocks
themselves told a somewhat different story. The last was
principally of trap formation. Cape pigeons, gulls petrels,
and albatross were wheeling about in the air, while the
rollers that still came in on this noble sea-wall were really
terrific. Distant thunder wants the hollow, bellowing sound
that these waves made when brought in contact with the
shores. Roswell fancied that it was like a groan of the
mighty Pacific, at finding its progress suddenly checked.
The spray continued to fly, and, much of the time, the air
below his elevated seat was filled with vapour.
As soon as our young master had taken in the grander
features of this magnificent view, his eyes sought the Sea
Lion of Martha's Vineyard. There she was, sure enough,
at a distance of only a couple of leagues, and apparently
standing directly for the Cape. Could it be possible that
Daggett suspected his manuvre, and was coming in search
of him, at the precise spot in which he had taken shelter?
As respects the vessel, there was no question as to her
character
.
From the elevation at which he was placed,
Roswell
,
aided by the glass, had no difficulty in making her
out, and in recognising her rig, form, and character.
Stimson
also examined her, and knew her to be the schooner.
On that vast and desolate sea, she resembled a speck, but
the art of man had enabled those she held to guide her
safely through the tempest, and bring her up to her goal,
in a time that really seemed miraculous for the
circumstances
.
If we had thought of it, Captain Gar'ner, said Stephen,
we might have brought up an ensign, and set it on these
rocks, by way of letting the Vineyarders know where we
are to be found. But we can always go out and meet them,
should this wind stand.
Which is just what I have no intention of doing,
Stephen
.
I came in here, on purpose to get rid of that
schooner
.
You surprise me, sir! A consort is no bad thing,
when a craft is a-sealin' in a high latitude. The ice makes
such ticklish times, that, for me, I'm always glad to know
there is such a chance for taking a fellow off, should there
happen to be a wrack.
All that is very true, but there are reasons which may
tell against it. I have heard of some islands where seals
abound, and a consort is not quite so necessary to take
them, as when one is wrecked.
That alters the case, Captain Gar'ner. Nobody is
obliged to tell of his sealing station. I was aboard one of
the very first craft that found out that the South Shetlands
was a famous place for seals, and no one among us thought
it necessary to tell it to all the world. Some men are weak
enough to put sich discoveries in the newspapers; but, for
my part, I think it quite enough to put them in the log.
That schooner must have the current with her, she
comes down so fast. She'll be abreast of the Horn in half
an hour longer, Stephen. We will wait, and see what she
would be at.
Gardiner's prediction was true. In half an hour, the
Sea Lion of Holmes' Hole glided past the rocky pyramid
of the Horn, distant from it less than a mile. Had it been
the object of her commander to pass into the Pacific, he
might have done so with great apparent ease. Even with
a south-west wind, that which blows fully half the time in
those seas, it would have been in his power to lay past the
islands, and soon get before it. A north-east course, with
a little offing, will clear the islands, and when a vessel gets
as far north as the main land, it would take her off the
coast.
But Daggett had no intention of doing anything of the
sort. He was looking for his consort, which he had hoped
to find somewhere near the cape. Disappointed in this
expectation, after standing far enough west to make certain
nothing was in sight in that quarter, he hauled up on an
easy bowline, and stood to the southward. Roswell was
right glad to see this, inasmuch as it denoted ignorance of
the position of the islands he sought. They lay much
farther
to the westward; and no sooner was he sure of the
course steered by the other schooner, than he hastened
down to the boat, in order to get his own vessel under way,
to profit by the breeze.
Two hours later, the Sea Lion of Oyster Pond glanced
through the passage which led into the ocean, on an
ebb-tide
.
By that time, the other vessel had disappeared in the
southern board; and Gardiner came out upon the open
waters again, boldly, and certain of his course. All sail
was set, and the little craft slipped away from the land with
the ease of an aquatic bird, that is plying its web-feet.
Studding-sails were set, and the pyramid of the Horn soon
began to lower in the distance, as the schooner receded.
When night closed over the rolling waters, it was no longer
visible, the vessel having fairly entered the Antarctic Ocean,
if anything north of the circle can properly so be termed.
CHAPTER XIV.
All gone! 'tis ours the goodly land
Look roundthe heritage behold;
Go forthupon the mountain stand;
Then, if you can, be cold.
Sprague
.
It
was an enterprising and manly thing for a little vessel
like the Sea Lion to steer with an undeviating course into
the mysterious depths of the antarctic circle  mysterious,
far more in that day, than at the present hour. But the
American sealer rarely hesitates. He has very little science,
few charts, and those oftener old than new, knows little of
what is going on among the savans of the earth, though his
ear is ever open to the lore of men like himself, and he has
his mind stored with pictures of islands and continents that
would seem to have been formed for no other purpose than
to meet the wants of the race of animals it is his business
to pursue and to capture. Cape Horn and its vicinity have
so long been frequented by this class of men, that they are
at home among their islands, rocks, currents and sterility;
but, to the southward of the Horn itself, all seemed a waste.
At the time of which we are writing, much less was known
of the antarctic regions than is known to-day; and even now
our knowledge is limited to a few dreary outlines, in which
barrenness and ice compete for the mastery. Wilkes, and
his competitors, have told us that a vast frozen continent
exists in that quarter of the globe; but even their daring
and perseverance have not been able to determine more
than the general fact.
We should be giving an exaggerated and false idea of
Roswell Gardiner's character, did we say that he steered
into that great void of the southern ocean in a total
indifference
to his destination and objects. Very much the
reverse
was his state of mind, as he saw the high land of the
Vol. I.  17
cape sink, as it might be foot by foot, into the ocean, and
then lost sight of it altogether. Although the weather was
fine for the region, it was dark and menacing. Such,
indeed
,
is usually the case in that portion of this globe, which
appears to be the favourite region of the storms. Although
the wind was no more than a good breeze, and the ocean
was but little disturbed, there were those symptoms in the
atmosphere and in the long ground-swells that came rolling
in from the southwest, that taught the mariner the cold
lessons of caution. We believe that heavier gales of wind
at sea are encountered in the warm than in the cold months;
but there is something so genial in the air of the ocean
during summer, and something so chilling and repulsive in
the rival season, that most of us fancy that the currents of
air correspond in strength with the fall of the mercury.
Roswell knew better than this, it is true; but he also fully
understood where he was, and what he was about. As a
sealer, he had several times penetrated as far south as the
ne plus ultra of Cook; but it had ever before been in
subordinate situations. This was the first time in which
he had the responsibility of command thrown on himself,
and it was no more than natural that he should feel the
weight of this new burthen. So long as the Sea Lion of
the Vineyard was in sight, she had presented a centre of
interest and concern. To get rid of her had been his first
care, and almost absorbing object; but, now that she
seemed
to be finally thrown out of his wake, there remained the
momentous and closely approaching difficulties of the main
adventure directly before his eyes. Roswell, therefore, was
thoughtful and grave, his countenance offering no bad
reflection
of the sober features of the atmosphere and the
ocean.
Although the season was that of summer, and the
weather
was such as is deemed propitious in the
neighbourhood
of Cape Horn, a feeling of uncertainty prevailed over
every other sensation. To the southward a cold mistiness
veiled the view, and every mile the schooner advanced
appeared
like penetrating deeper and deeper into regions that
nature had hitherto withheld from the investigation of the
mariner. Ice, and its dangers, were known to exist a few
degrees farther in that direction; but islands also had been
discovered, and turned to good account by the enterprise
of the sealers.
It was truly a great thing for the Sea Lion of Oyster
Pond to have thrown off her namesake of the Vineyard. It
is true both vessels were still in the same sea, with a
possibility
of again meeting; but, Roswell Gardiner was steering
onward towards a haven designated in degrees and minutes,
while the other craft was most probably left to wander in
uncertainty in that remote and stormy ocean. Our hero
thought there was now very little likelihood of his again
falling in with his late consort, and this so much the more,
because the islands he sought were not laid down in the
vicinity of any other known land, and were consequently
out of the usual track of the sealers. This last
circumstance
was fully appreciated by our young navigator, and
gave him confidence of possessing its treasures to himself,
could he only find the place where nature had hid them.
When the sun went down in that vast waste of water
which lies to the southward of this continent, the little Sea
Lion had fairly lost sight of land, and was riding over the
long southwestern ground-swell like a gull that holds its
way steadily towards its nest. For many hours her course
had not varied half a point, being as near as possible to
south-southwest, which kept her a little off the wind. No
sooner, however, did night come to shut in the view, than
Roswell Gardiner went aft to the man at the helm, and
ordered
him to steer to the southward, as near as the breeze
would conveniently allow. This was a material change in
the direction of the vessel, and, should the present breeze
stand, would probably place her, by the return of light, a
good distance to the eastward of the point she would
otherwise
have reached. Hitherto, it had been Roswell's aim to
drop his consort; but, now it was dark, and so much time
had already passed and been improved since the other
schooner was last seen, he believed he might venture to
steer in the precise direction he desired to go. The season
is so short in those seas, that every hour is precious, and
no more variation from a real object could be permitted
than circumstances imperiously required. It was now
generally understood that the craft was making the best of
her way towards her destined sealing-ground.
Independently of the discoveries of the regular explorers,
a great deal of information has been obtained from the
sealers themselves within the present century, touching the
antarctic seas. It is thought that many a headland, and
various islands, that have contributed their shares in
procuring
the
accolades
for different European navigators,
were known to the adventurers from Stonington and other
by-ports of this country, long before science ever laid its
eyes upon them, or monarchs their swords on the shoulders
of their secondary discoverers.
That divers islands existed in this quarter of the ocean
was a fact recognised in geography long before the Sea
Lion was thought of; probably before her young master
was actually born; but the knowledge generally possessed
on the subject was meagre and unsatisfactory. In
particular
cases, nevertheless, this remark would not apply, there
being at that moment on board our little schooner several
mariners who had often visited the South Shetlands, New
Georgia, Palmer's Land, and other known places in those
seas. Not one of them all, however, had ever heard of
any island directly south of the present position of the
schooner.
No material change occurred during the night, or in the
course of the succeeding day, the little Sea Lion
industriously
holding her way toward the south pole; making
very regularly her six knots each hour. By the time she
was thirty-six hours from the Horn, Gardiner believed
himself
to be fully three degrees to the southward of it, and
consequently some distance within the parallel of sixty
degrees
south. Palmer's Land, with its neighbouring islands,
would have been near, had not the original course carried
the schooner so far to the westward. As it was, no one
could say what lay before them.
The third day out, the wind hauled, and it blew heavily
from the north-east. This gave the adventurers a great run.
The blink of ice was shortly seen, and soon after ice itself,
drifting about in bergs. The floating hills were grand
objects
to the eye, rolling and wallowing in the seas; but
they were much worn and melted by the wash of the ocean,
and comparatively of greatly diminished size. It was now
absolutely necessary to lose most of the hours of darkness,
it being much too dangerous to run in the night. The great
barrier of ice was known to be close at hand; and Cook's
Ne Plus Ultra, at that time the great boundary of
antarctic
navigation, was near the parallel of latitude to which
the schooner had reached. The weather, however,
continued
very favourable, and after the blow from the
north-east
,
the wind came from the south, chill, and attended
with flurries of snow, but sufficiently steady and not so
fresh as to compel our adventurers to carry very short sail.
The smoothness of the water would of itself have announced
the vicinity of ice: not only did Gardiner's calculations
tell him as much as this, but his eyes confirmed their
results
.
In the course of the fifth day out, on several
occasions
when the weather cleared a little, glimpses were had
of the ice in long mountainous walls, resembling many of
the ridges of the Alps, though moving heavily under the
heaving and setting of the restless waters. Dense fogs,
from time to time, clouded the whole view, and the schooner
was compelled, more than once that day, to heave-to, in
order to avoid running on the sunken masses of ice, or
fields, of which many of vast size now began to make their
appearance.
Notwithstanding the dangers that surrounded our
adventurers
,
they were none of them so insensible to the sublime
powers of nature as to withhold their admiration from the
many glorious objects which that lone and wild scene
presented
.
The ice-bergs were of all the hues of the rainbow,
as the sunlight gilded their summits or sides, or they were
left shaded by the interposition of dark and murky clouds.
There were instances when certain of the huge frozen
masses even appeared to be quite black, in particular
positions
and under peculiar lights; while others, at the same
instant, were gorgeous in their gleams of emerald and
gold!
The aquatic birds, also, had now become numerous
again. Penguins were swimming about, filling the air with
their discordant cries, while there was literally no end of
the cape-pigeons and petrels. Albatrosses, too, helped to
make up the picture of animated nature, while whales were
often heard blowing in the adjacent waters. Gardiner saw
many signs of the proximity of land, and began to hope he
17*
should yet actually discover the islands laid down on his
chart, as their position had been given by Daggett.
In that high latitude a degree of longitude is necessarily
much shorter than when nearer to the middle of our orb.
On the equator, a degree of longitude measures, as is
known to most boarding-school young ladies, just sixty
geographical, or sixty-nine and a half English statute miles.
But, as is not known to most boarding-school young ladies,
or is understood by very few of them indeed, even when
known, in the sixty-second degree of latitude, a degree of
longitude measures but little more than thirty-two of those
very miles. The solution of this seeming contradiction is
so very simple that it may assist a certain class of our
readers if we explain it, by telling them that it arises solely
from the fact that these degrees of longitude, which are
placed sixty geographical miles asunder at the centre or
middle of the earth, converge towards the poles, where
they all meet in a point. According to the best
observations
Roswell Gardiner could obtain, he was just one of
these short degrees of longitude, or two-and-thirty miles,
to the westward of the parallel where he wished to be,
when the wind came from the southward. The change
was favourable, as it emboldened him to run nearer than
he otherwise might have felt disposed to do, to the great
barrier of ice which now formed a sort of weather-shore.
Fortunately, the loose bergs and sunken masses had drifted
off so far to the northward, that once within them the
schooner had pretty plain sailing; and Roswell, to lose
none of the precious time of the season, ventured to run,
though under very short canvass, the whole of the short
night that succeeded. It is a great assistance to the
navigation
of those seas that, during the summer months, there
is scarcely any night at all, giving the adventurer sufficient
light by which to thread his way among the difficulties of
his pathless journey.
When the sun reappeared, on the morning of the sixth
day after he had left the Horn, Roswell Gardiner believed
himself to be far enough west for his purposes. It now
remained to get a whole degree further to the south, which
was a vast distance in those seas and in that direction, and
would carry him a long way to the southward of the `Ne
Plus Ultra.' If there was any truth in Daggett, however,
that mariner had been there; and the instructions of the
owner rendered it incumbent on our young man to attempt
to follow him. More than once, that morning, did our
hero regret he had not entered into terms with the
Vineyard
men, that the effort might have been made in
company
.
There was something so portentous in a lone
vessel's
venturing within the ice, in so remote a region, that,
to say the truth, Roswell hesitated. But pride of
profession
,
ambition, love of Mary, dread of the deacon, native
resolution, and the hardihood produced by experience in
dangers often encountered and escaped, nerved him to the
undertaking. It must be attempted, or the voyage would
be lost; and our young mariner now set about his task
with a stern determination to achieve it.
By this time the schooner had luffed up within a cable's
length of the ice, along the margin of which she was
running
under easy sail. Gardiner believed himself to be quite
as far to the westward as was necessary, and his present
object was to find an opening, by means of which he could
enter among the floating chaos that was spread, far and
wide, to windward. As the breeze was driving the
drifting
masses to the northward, they became loosened and
more separated, every moment; and glad enough was
Gardiner
to discover, at length, a clear spot that seemed to
favour his views. Without an instant's delay, the sheets
were flattened in, a pull was taken on the braces, and away
went the little Sea Lion into a passage that had a
hundred-fold
more real causes of terror than the Scylla and
Charybdis
of old.
One effect of the vicinity of ice, in extensive fields, is to
produce comparatively still water. It must blow a gale,
and that over a considerable extent of open sea, to produce
much commotion among the fields and bergs, though that
heaving and setting, which has been likened to the
respiration
of some monster, and which seamen call the
ground-swell
,
is never entirely wanting among the waters of an
ocean. On the present occasion, our adventurers were
favoured in this respect, their craft gliding forward
unimpeded
by anything like opposing billows. At the end of
four hours, the schooner, tacking and waring when
necessary
,
had worked her way to the southward and westward,
according to her master's reckoning, some five-and-twenty
miles. It was then noon, and the atmosphere being
unusually
clear, though never without fog, Gardiner went aloft,
to take a look for himself at the condition of things around
him.
To the northward, and along the very passage by which
the vessel had sailed, the ice was closing, and it was far
easier to go on than to return. To the eastward, and
towards the south-east in particular, however, did Roswell
Gardiner turn his longing eyes. Somewhere in that
quarter
of the ocean, and distant now less than ten leagues, did
he expect to find the islands of which he was in quest, if,
indeed, they had any existence at all. In that direction
there were many passages open among the ice, the latter
being generally higher than in the particular place to which
the vessel had reached. Once or twice, Roswell mistook
the summits of some of these bergs for real mountains,
when, owing to the manner in which the light fell upon
them, or rather did not fall upon them directly, they
appeared
dark and earthy. Each time, however, the sun's
rays soon came to undeceive him; and that which had so
lately been black and frowning was, as by the touch of
magic, suddenly illuminated, and became bright and
gorgeous
,
throwing out its emerald hues, or perhaps a virgin
white, that filled the beholder with delight, even amid the
terrors and dangers by which, in very truth, he was
surrounded
.
The glorious Alps themselves, those wonders of
the earth, could scarcely compete in scenery with the views
that nature lavished, in that remote sea, on a seeming
void. But the might and honour of God were there, as
well as beneath the equator.
For one whole hour did Roswell Gardiner remain in the
cross-trees, having hailed the deck, and caused the
schooner's
head to be turned to the south-east, pressing her
through the openings as near the wind as she could go.
The atmosphere was never without fog, though the vapour
drifted about, leaving large vacancies that were totally clear.
One spot, in particular, seemed to be a favourite
resting-place
for these low clouds, which just there appeared to
light upon the face of the ocean itself. A wide field of ice,
or, it were better to say, a broad belt of bergs, lay between
this stationary cloud and the schooner, though the
existence
of the vapour early caught Roswell's attention; and
during the hour he was aloft, conning the craft through a
very intricate and ticklish channel, not a minute passed
that the young man did not turn a look towards that veiled
spot. He was in the act of placing a foot on the ratlin
below him, to descend to the deck, when he
half-unconsciously
turned to take a last glance at this distant and
seemingly immovable object. Just then, the vapour, which
had kept rolling and moving, like a fluid in ebullition,
while it still clung together, suddenly opened, and the bald
head of a real mountain, a thousand feet high, came
unexpectedly
into the view! There could be no mistake; all
was too plain to admit of a doubt. There, beyond all
question
,
was land; and it was doubtless the most western of
the islands described by the dying seaman. Everything
corroborated this conclusion. The latitude and longitude
were right, or nearly so, and the other circumstances went
to confirm the conjecture, or conclusion. Daggett had
said that one island, high, mountainous, ragged and bleak,
but of some size, lay the most westerly in the group, while
several others were within a few miles of it. The last were
lower, much smaller, and little more than naked rocks.
One of these last, however, he insisted on it, was a volcano
in activity, and that, at intervals, it emitted flames as well
as a fierce heat. By his account, however, the party to
which he belonged had never actually visited that volcanic
cauldron, being satisfied with admiring its terrors from a
distance.
As to the existence of the land, Roswell got several
pretty distinct and certain views, leaving no doubt of its
character and position. There is a theory which tells us
that the orb of day is surrounded by a luminous vapour,
the source of heat and light, and that this vapour, being in
constant motion, occasionally leaves the mass of the planet
itself to be seen, forming what it is usual to term the spots
on the sun. Resembling this theory, the fogs of the
antarctic
seas rolled about the mountain now seen,
withdrawing
the curtain at times, and permitting a view of the
striking and majestic object within. Well did that lone
and nearly barren mass of earth and rock merit these
appellations
!
The elevation has already been given; and a
rock that is nearly perpendicular, rising out of the ocean
for a thousand feet, is ever imposing and grand. This
was rendered so much the more so by its loneliness, its
stable and stern position amid floating and moving
mountains
of ice, its brown sides and bald summit, the latter
then recently whitened with a fall of pure snow, and its
frowning and fixed aspect amid a scene that might
otherwise
be said to be ever in motion.
Roswell Gardiner's heart beat with delight when assured
of success in discovering this, the first great goal of his
destination. To reach it was now his all-absorbing desire.
By this time the wind had got round to the southwest, and
was blowing quite fresh, bringing him well to windward
of the mountain, but causing the ice-bergs to drift in
towards
the land, and placing an impassable barrier along its
western shore. Our young man, however, remembered
that Daggett had given the anchorage as on the north-eastern
side of the island, where, according to his statements, a
little haven would be found, in which a dozen craft might
he in security. To this quarter of the island Gardiner
consequently endeavoured to get.
There was no opening to the northward, but a pretty
good channel was before the schooner to the southward of
the group. In this direction, then, the Sea Lion was
steered
,
and by eight bells (four in the afternoon) the southern
point of the largest island was doubled. The rest of the
group were made, and to the infinite delight of all on board
her, abundance of clear water was found between the main
island and its smaller neighbours. The bergs had grounded
apparently, as they drew near the group, leaving this large
bay entirely free from ice, with the exception of a few small
masses that were floating through it. These bodies, whether
field or berg, were easily avoided; and away the schooner
went, with flowing sheets, into the large basin formed by
the different members of the group. To render `assurance
doubly sure,' as to the information of Daggett, the smoke
of a volcano arose from a rock to the eastward, that
appeared
to be some three or four miles in circumference,
and which stood on the eastern side of the great basin, or
some four leagues from Sealer's Land, as Daggett had at
once named the principal island. This was, in fact, about
the breadth of the main basin, which had two principal
passages into it, the one from the south and the other from
the north-east.
Once within the islands, and reasonably clear of all ice,
it was an easy thing for the schooner to run across the
basin, or great bay, and reach the north-eastern extremity
of Sealer's Land. As the light would continue some hours
longer, there being very little night in that high latitude in
December, the month that corresponds to our June,
Roswell
caused a boat to be lowered and manned, when he
pulled at once towards the spot where it struck him the
haven must be found, if there were any such place at all.
Everything turned out as it had been described by Daggett,
and great was our young man's satisfaction when he rowed
into a cove that was little more than two hundred yards in
diameter, and which was so completely land-locked as not
to feel the influence of any sea outside. In general, the
great difficulty is to land on any of the antarctic rocks, the
breakers and surf opposing it; but, in this spot, the smallest
boat could be laid with its bows on a beach of shingles,
without the slightest risk of its being injured. The lead
also announced good anchorage in about eight fathoms of
water. In a word, this little haven was one of those small
basins that so often occur in mountainous islands, where
fragments of rock appear to have fallen from the principal
mass as it was forced upward out of the ocean, as if
purposely
intended to meet the wants of mariners.
Nor was the outer bay, or the large basin formed by the
entire group, by any means devoid of advantages to the
navigator. From north to south this outer bay was at least
six leagues in length, while its breadth could not much
have fallen short of four. Of course it was much more
exposed to the winds and waves than the little harbour
proper
,
though Roswell was struck with the great advantages
it offered in several essential particulars. It was almost
clear of ice, while so much was floating about outside of
the circle of islands; thus leaving a free navigation in it
for even the smallest boat. This was mainly owing to the
fact that the largest island had two long crescent-shaped
capes, the one at its north-eastern and the other at its
south-eastern
extremity, giving to its whole eastern side the shape
of a new moon. The harbour just described was to the
southward of, or within the north-eastern cape, which our
young master at once named Cape Hazard, in honour of
his chief mate's vigilance; that officer having been the first
to point out the facilities probably offered by the formation
of the land for an anchorage.
Though rocky and broken, it was by no means difficult
to ascend the rugged banks on the northern side of the
harbour, and Gardiner went up it, attended by Stimson,
who of late had much attached himself to the person of his
commander. The height of this barrier above the waves
of the ocean was but a little less than a hundred feet, and
when the summit was reached, a common exclamation of
surprise, not to say delight, broke from the lips of both.
Hitherto not a seal of any sort had been seen, and Gardiner
had felt some misgivings touching the benefits that were to
be derived from so much hardship, exposure and enterprise.
All doubts, however, vanished, the instant he got a sight of
the northern shore of the island. This shore, a reach of
several miles in extent, was fairly alive with the monsters
of which he was in search. They lay in thousands on the
low rocks that lined that entire side of the island, basking
in the sun of the antarctic seas. There they were, sure
enough! Sea Lions, Sea Elephants, huge, clumsy,
fierce-looking
and revolting creatures, belonging properly to
neither
sea nor land. These animals were constantly going
and coming in crowds, some waddling to the margin of the
rocks and tumbling into the ocean in search of food, while
others scrambled out of the water, and got upon shelves
and other convenient places to repose and enjoy the light
of day. There was very little contention or fighting among
these revolting-looking creatures, though nearly every known
species of the larger seals was among them.
There is famous picking for us, master Stephen, said
Roswell to his companion, fairly rubbing his hands in
delight
.
One month's smart work will fill the schooner,
and we can be off before the equinox. Does it not seem to
you that yonder are the bones of sea lions, or of seals of
some sort, lying hereaway as if men had been at work on
the creatures?
No doubt on't at all, Captain Gar'ner; as much out
of the way as this island is  and I never heard of the
place afore, old a sealer as I am  but, as much out of the
way as it is, we are not the first to find it. Somebody has
been here, and that within a year or two; and he has
picked
up a cargo, too, depend on't.
As all this merely corresponded with Daggett's account
of the place, Roswell felt no surprise; on the contrary, he
saw in it a confirmation of all that Daggett had stated, and
as furnishing so much the more reason to hope for a
successful
termination to the voyage in all its parts. While on
the rocks, Roswell took such a survey of the localities as
might enable him to issue his orders hereafter with
discretion
and intelligence. The schooner was already making
short tacks to get close in with the island, in obedience to
a signal to that effect; and the second mate had pulled out
to the entrance of the little haven, with a view to act as
pilot. Before the captain had descended from the summit
of the northern barrier, the vessel came in under her jib,
the wind being nearly aft, and she dropped two anchors in
suitable spots, making another flying moor of it.
General joy now illuminated every face. It was, in itself,
a great point gained to get the schooner into a perfectly
safe haven, where her people could take their natural rest
at night, or during their watches below, without feeling any
apprehension of being crushed in the ice; but here was
not only security, but the source of that wealth of which
they were in quest, and which had induced them all to
encounter
so many privations and so much danger. The
crew landed to a man, each individual ascending to the
summit of the barrier, to feast his eyes on the spectacle
that lay spread in such affluent abundance, along the low
rocks of the northern side of the island.
As there were yet several hours of light remaining,
Roswell
,
still attended by Stimson, each armed with a
sealing-spear
or lance, not only as a weapon of defence but as a
leaping-staff, set out to climb as high up the central
acclivity
of the island as circumstances would allow him to go.
He was deceived in the distances, however, and soon found
Vol. I.  18
that an entire day would be necessary to achieve such an
enterprise, could it be performed at all; but he did succeed
in reaching a low spur of the central mountain that
commanded
a wide and noble view of all that lay to the north
and east of it. From this height, which must have been a
few hundred feet above the level of the ocean, our
adventurers
got a still better view of the whole north coast, or
of what might have been called the sealing quarter of the
island. They also got a tolerably accurate idea of the
general formation of that lone fragment of rock and earth,
as well as of the islets and islands that lay in its vicinity.
The outline of the first was that of a rude, and of course
an irregular triangle, the three principal points of which
were the two low capes already mentioned, and a third that
lay to the northward and westward. The whole of the
western or south-western shore seemed to be a nearly
perpendicular
wall of rock, that, in the main, rose some two
or three hundred feet above the ocean. Against this side
of the island in particular, the waves of the ocean were
sullenly beating, while the ice drove up `home,' as sailors
express it; showing a vast depth of water. On the two
other sides, it was different. The winds prevailed most
from the south-west, which rendered the perpendicular face
of the island its weather-wall; while the two other sides
of the triangle were more favoured by position. The north
side, of course, lay most exposed to the sun, everything of
this nature being reversed in the southern hemisphere from
what we have it in the northern; while the eastern or
north-eastern
side, to be precisely accurate, was protected by the
group of islands that lay in its front. Such was the general
character of Sealer's Land, so far as the hurried
observations
of its present master enabled him to ascertain. The
near approach of night induced him now to hasten to get
off of the somewhat dangerous acclivities to which he had
climbed, and to rejoin his people and his schooner.
CHAPTER XV.
Ye dart upon the deep, and straight is heard
A wilder roar; and men grow pale, and pray:
Ye fling its. waters round you, as a bird
Flings o'er his shivering plumes the fountain's spray.
See! to the breaking mast the sailor clings!
Ye scoop the ocean to its briny springs,
And take the mountain billows on your wings,
And pile the wreck of navies round the bay.
Bryant's Winds
.
No unnecessary delay was permitted to interfere with the
one great purpose of the sealers. The season was so short,
and the difficulties and dangers of entering among and of
quitting the ice were so very serious, that every soul
belonging
to the schooner felt the importance of activity and
industry. The very day that succeeded the vessel's arrival,
not only was great progress made in the preliminary
arrangements
,
but a goodly number of fur-seals, of excellent
quality, were actually killed and secured. Two noble
sea-elephants
were also lanced, animals that measured near
thirty feet in length, each of which yielded a very ample
return for the risk and trouble of taking it, in oil. The
skins of the fur-seals, however, were Roswell's principal
object; and glad enough was he to find the creature that
pays this tribute to the wants and luxuries of man, in
numbers
sufficient to promise him a speedy return to the
northward
.
While the slaughter, and skinning, and curing, and
trying out were all in active operation, our young man paid
some attention to certain minor arrangements, which had
a direct bearing on the comforts of his people, as well as
the getting in of cargo.
An old store-house, of respectable size, had stood on the
deacon's wharf, while the schooner was fitting out, but it
had been taken to pieces, in order to make room for a
more eligible substitute. The materials of this building,
Roswell Gardiner had persuaded his owner to send on
board, and they had all been received and stowed away, a
part below and a part on deck, as a provision for the
possible
wants of the people. As it was necessary to clear the
decks and break out the hold, all these materials, consisting
principally of the timbers of the frame, the siding, and a
quantity of planks and boards, were now floated ashore in
the cove, and hauled up on the rocks. Roswell took a
leisure
moment to select a place for the site of his building,
which he intended to erect at once, in order to save the
time that would otherwise be lost in pulling between the
schooner and the shore.
It was not difficult to find the sort of spot that was desi
rable for the dwelling. That chosen by Gardiner was a
shelf of rock of sufficient extent, that lay perfectly exposed
to the north and north-east, or to the sunny side of the
island, while it was sheltered from the south and south-west
by masses of rock, that formed a complete protection
against the colder winds of the region. These walls of
stone, however, were not sufficiently near to permit any
snows they might collect to impend over the building, but
enough space was left between them and the house, to
admit of a capacious yard, in which might be placed any
articles that were necessary to the ordinary work, or to the
wants of the sealers.
Had it been advisable to set all hands at the business of
slaughtering, Roswell Gardiner certainly would not have
lost the time he did, in the erection of his house. But our
master was a judicious and wary commander at his calling.
The seals were now perfectly tame, and nothing was easier
than to kill them in scores. The great difficulty was in
removing the spoils across the rocks, as it was sometimes
necessary to do so for a distance of several miles. Means
were found, in the end, to use the boats on this service,
though even then, at midsummer, the northern shore of the
island was frequently so closely beset by the ice as
completely
to block up the passage. This, too, occurred at
times when the larger bay was nearly free, and the cove,
which went by the name of the Deacon's Bight, among
the men, was entirely so. In order to prevent a premature
panic among the victims of this intended foray, then,
Gardiner
allowed no one to go out to kill but the experienced
hands, and no more to be slain each day than could be
skinned or cut up at that particular time. In consequence
of this prudent caution, the work soon got into a regular
train; and it was early found that more was done in this
mode, than could have been effected by a less guarded
assault
on the seals.
As for the materials of the building, they were hauled
up the rocks without much difficulty. The frame was of
some size, as is the case generally with most old
constructions
in America; but being of pine, thoroughly seasoned,
the sills and plates were not so heavy but that they might
be readily enough handled by the non-sealing portion of the
crew. Robert Smith, the landsman, was a carpenter by
trade, and it fell to his lot to put together again the
materials
of the old warehouse. Had there not been such a
mechanic among the crew, however, a dozen Americans
could, at any time, construct a house, the `rough and ready'
habits of the people usually teaching them, in a rude way,
a good deal of a great many other arts, besides this of the
carpenter. Mott had served a part of his time with a
black-smith
,
and he now set up his forge. When the frame was
ready, all hands assembled to assist in raising it; and, by
the end of the first week, the building was actually enclosed,
the labour amounting to no more than putting each portion
in its place, and securing it there, the saw being scarcely
used during the whole process. This building had two
apartments, one of which Gardiner appropriated to the uses
of a sitting-room, and the other to that of a dormitory.
Rough bunks were constructed, and the mattresses of the
men were all brought ashore, and put in the house. It was
intended that everybody should sleep in the building, as it
would save a great deal of going to and fro, as well as a
great deal of time. The cargo was to be collected on a
shelf of rock, that lay about twenty feet below that on which
the building stood; by following which, it was possible to
turn the highest point of the pass, that which formed the
southern protection of the building, and come out on the
side of the cove at another shelf, that was not more than
fifty feet above the level of the vessel's decks. Down this
last declivity, Roswell proposed to lower his casks by means
of a projecting derrick, the rock being sufficiently
precipitous
18*
to admit of this arrangement, while his spare spars
furnished him with the necessary means. Thus was every
preparation made with judgement and foresight.
In this manner did the first ten days pass, every man and
boy being as busy as bees. To own the truth, no attention
was paid to the Sabbath, which would seem to have been
left behind them by the people, among the descendants of
those Puritans who were so rigid in their observance of
that festival. At the end of the time just mentioned, a
great deal had been done. The house, such as it was, was
completed. To be sure, it was nothing but an old
store-house
re-vamped, but it was found to be of infinite service,
and greatly did all hands felicitate themselves at having
brought its materials along with them. Even those who
had most complained of the labour of getting the timbers
on board, had the most often cursed them for being in the
way, during the passage, and had continued the loudest to
deride the idea of `sealers turning carpenters,' were shortly
willing to allow that the possession of this dwelling was of
the greatest value to them, and that, so far from the extra
work's causing them to fall behind in their main operations,
the comfort they found, in having a home like this to go to,
after a long day's toil, refreshed them to a degree which
enabled
every man to return to his labour, with a zeal and an
energy that might otherwise have been wanting. Although
it was in the warmest season of the year, and the nights
could scarcely be called nights at all, yet the sun never got
very low without leaving a chilliness in the air that would
have rendered sleeping without a cover and a protection
from the winds, not only excessively uncomfortable, but
somewhat dangerous. Indeed, it was often found necessary
to light a fire in the old ware-house. This was done by
means of a capacious box-stove, that was almost as old as
the building itself, and which had also been brought along
as an article of great necessity in that climate. Fuel could
not be wanting, as long as the `scraps' from the try-works
abounded, and there were many more of these than were
needed to `try out' the sea-elephant oil. The schooner,
however, had a very ample supply of wood to burn, that
being an article which abounded on Shelter Island, and
which the deacon had consented to lay in, in some
abundance
.
Gardiner got this concession out of the miserly
temperament of the old man, by persuading him that a
sealer could not work to any advantage, unless he had the
means of occasionally warming himself. The miserly
propensities
of the deacon were not so engrossing that he did
not comprehend the wisdom of making sufficient outlay to
secure the execution of his main object; and among other
things of this nature, the schooner had sailed with a very
large supply of wood, as has just been stated. Wood and
onions, indeed, were more abundant in her than any other
stores.
The arrangements described were completed by the end
of the first fortnight, during which period the business of
sealing was also carried on with great industry and success.
So very tame were the victims, and so totally unconscious
of the danger they incurred from the presence of man, that
the crew moved round among them, seemingly but very
little observed, and not at all molested. The utmost care
was taken to give no unnecessary alarm; and when an
animal
was lanced, it was done in such a quiet way as to
produce
as little commotion as possible. By the end of the
time named, however, the sealing had got so advanced as
to require the aid of all hands in securing the spoils. To
work, then, everybody went, with a hearty good-will; and
the shelf of rock just below the house was soon well
garnished
with casks and skins. Had the labour been limited
to the mere killing, and skinning, and curing, and
barreling
of oil, it would have been comparatively quite light;
but the necessity of transporting the fruits of all this skill
and luck considerable distances, in some cases several
miles, and this over broken rocks, formed the great
obstacle
to immediate success. It was the opinion of Roswell
Gardiner, that he could have filled his schooner in a month,
were it possible to place her directly alongside of the rocks
frequented by the seals, and prevent all this toil in
transporting
.
This, however, was impossible, the waves and the
ice rendering it certain destruction to lay a craft anywhere
along the northern shore of the island. The boats might
be, and occasionally they were used, bringing loads of skin
and oil round the cape, quite into the cove. These little
cargoes were immediately transferred to the hold of the
schooner, a ground-tier of large casks having been left in
her purposely to receive the oil, which was emptied into
them by means of a hose. By the end of the third week,
this ground-tier was filled, and the craft became stiff, and
was in good ballast trim, although the spare water was now
entirely pumped out of her.
All this time the weather was very fair for so high a
latitude
,
and every way propitious. The twenty-third day after
the schooner got in, Roswell was standing on a spur of the
hill, at no great distance from the house, overlooking the
long reach of rocky coast over which the `sea-elephants,'
and `lions,' and `dogs,' and `bears,' were waddling in as
much seeming security as the hour when he first saw them.
The sun was just rising, and the seals were clambering up
out of the water to enjoy its warm rays, as they placed
themselves in positions favourable to such a purpose.
That is a pleasant sight to a true sealer, Captain
Gar'ner
,
observed Stimson, who as usual had kept near his
officer, and one that I can say I never before saw equalled.
I've been in this business now some five-and-twenty years,
and never before have I met with so safe a harbour for a
craft, and so large herds that have not been stirred up and
got to be skeary.
We have certainly been very fortunate thus far,
Stephen
,
and I am now in hopes we may fill up and be off in
good season to get clear of the ice, returned Roswell.
Our luck has been surprising, all things considered.
You call it luck, Captain Gar'ner; but, in my creed,
there is a truer and a better word for it, sir.
Ay, I know well enough what you mean, Stephen;
though I cannot fancy that Providence cares much whether
we shall take a hundred seals to-day, or none at all.
Such is not my idee, sir; and I'm not ashamed to own
it. In my humble way of thinking, Captain Gar'ner, the
finger of Divine Providence is in all that comes to pass; if
not straight ahead like, as a body would receive a fall, still,
by sartain laws that bring about everything that is to
happen
,
just as it does happen. I believe now, sir, that
Providence
does not intend we shall take any seals at all to-day,
sir
Why not, Stimson? It is the very finest day we have
had since we have been on the island!
That's true enough; and it is this glorious sunny day,
glorious and sunny for sich a high latitude, that makes me
feel and think that this day was not intended for work.
You probably forget it is the Sabbath, Captain Gar'ner.
Sure enough; I had forgotten that, Stephen; but we
sealers seldom lie by for such a reason.
So much the worse for us sealers, then, sir. This is
my seventeenth v'y'ge into these seas, sir, and I will say
that more of them have been made with officers and crews
that did
not
keep the Sabbath, than with officers and crews
that did. Still, I have obsarved one thing, sir, that the
man who takes his rest one day in seven, and freshens his
mind, as it might be, with thinking of other matters than
his every-day consarns, comes to his task with so much
better will, when he
does
set about it, as to turn off greater
profit than if he worked night and day, Sundays and all.
Roswell Gardiner had no great reverence for the
Christian
Sabbath, and this more because it was so
called
, than
for any sufficient reason in itself. Pride of reason rendered
him jealous of everything like a concession to the faith of
those who believed in the Son of God; and he was very
apt to dissent from all admission that had even the most
remote bearing on its truth. Still, as a kind-hearted
commander
,
as well as a judicious reasoner on the economy of
his fellow-creatures, he fully felt the policy of granting
relaxation
to labour. Nor was he indisposed to believe in the
care of a Divine Providence, or in its justice, though less
believing in this respect than the illiterate but
earnest-minded
seaman who stood at his side. He knew very well
that all work, and no play, makes Jack a dull boy; and
he understood well enough that it was good for man, at
stated seasons, to raise his mind from the cares and
business
of this world, to muse on those of the world that is to
come. Though inclined to Deism, Roswell worshipped in
his heart the creator of all he saw and understood, as well
as much that he could neither scan nor comprehend.
This is not the seaman's usual way of thinking,
returned
our hero, after regarding his companion for a
moment
,
a little intently. With us, there is very little
Sabbath in blue-water.
Too little, sir; much too little. Depend on 't, Captain
Gar'ner, God is on the face of the waters as well as on the
hill-tops. His Spirit is everywhere; and it must grieve it
to see human beings, that have been created in his image,
so bent on gain as to set apart no time even for rest; much
less for his worship and praise!
I am not certain you are wrong, Stimson, and I feel
much more sure that you are right as a political economist
than in your religion. There
should
be seasons of rest and
reflection  yet I greatly dislike losing a day as fine as
this.
`The better the day, the better the deed,' sir. No time
is lost to him who stops in his work to think a little of his
God. Our crew is used to having a Sabbath; and though
we work on lays, there is not a hand aboard us, Captain
Gar'ner, who would not be glad to hear the word pass
among 'em which should say this is the Lord's Day, and
you've to knock off from your labour.
As I believe you understand the people, Stephen, and
we have had a busy time of it since we got in, I'll take you
at your word, and give the order. Go and tell Mr. Hazard
there'll be no duty carried on to-day beyond what is
indispensable
.
It is Sunday, and we'll make it a day of rest.
Truth compels us to say that Roswell was quite as much
influenced in giving this order, by recollecting the pleasure
it would give Mary, as by any higher consideration.
Glad enough was Stimson to hear this order, and away
he hastened to find the mate, that it might be at once
communicated
to the men. Although this well-disposed seaman
a little overrated the motives of a portion of the crew at
least, he was right enough as to the manner in which they
would receive the new regulation. Rest and relaxation
had become, in a measure, necessary to them; and leisure
was also needed to enable the people to clean themselves;
the business in which they had been engaged being one
that accumulates oily substances, and requiring occasional
purifications of the body in order to preserve the health.
The scurvy, that great curse of long voyages, is as much
owing to neglect of cleanliness as to diet.
No sooner was it known that this day was to be treated
as the Sabbath, than soap, razors, scissors, and all the usual
appliances of the sailor's toilet, were drawn out of bags and
chests, and paraded about on the rocks. An hour passed
in scrubbing, shaving, cutting hair, holding garments up
to the light to look for holes and ascertain their condition,
and rummaging among properties, as the player would
term the different wardrobes that were thus brought into
view. The mates came out of the
mle
`shaven and shorn,'
as well as neatly attired; and there was not a man on the
island who did not look like a different being from what he
had appeared an hour before, in consequence of this pause
in the regular business of sealing, and the promised
holiday
.
A strict order was given that no one should go among
the seals, as it was feared that some indiscretion or other
might have a tendency to create an alarm. In all other
respects the island was placed at the disposal of the men,
if anything could be made of such a lone spot, a speck on
the surface of the antarctic seas, and nearly encircled by
mountains of floating ice.
As for Roswell himself, after reading a chapter or two
in Mary Pratt's bible, he determined to make another effort
to ascend to the summit of the sterile rocks which capped
the pile that rose vertically in the centre of the island. The
day was nearly all before him; and, summoning Stimson
as a companion, for he had taken a great fancy to this man,
away he went, young, active, and full of buoyancy. Almost
at the same instant, Hazard, the chief mate, pulled out of
the cove in one of the whale-boats, manned by volunteers
and provided with sails, with an intention to cross the Great
Bay, and get a nearer view of the volcanic hill, out of which
smoke was constantly pouring, and occasionally flames.
The second mate and one or two of the hands remained
near the house, to keep a look-out on the vessel and other
property.
The season had now advanced to the first day of January,
a month that in the southern hemisphere corresponds with
our own July. As Roswell picked his way among the broken
rocks that covered the ascent to what might be termed the
table-land of the island, if indeed any portion of so ragged
a bit of this earth could properly be so named, his thoughts
recurred to this question of the season, and to the
probability
of his getting a cargo before it would be absolutely
necessary to go to the northward. On the whole, he fancied
his chances good; and such he found to be Stimson's
opinion, when this experienced sealer was questioned on
the subject.
We've begun right in all respects but one, Captain
Gar'ner, said Stephen, as he closed his remarks on the
subject; and even in that matter in which we made a
small mistake at the outset, we are improving, and I hope
will come out right in the end. I said a
small
mistake, but
in this I'm wrong, as it was a
great
mistake.
And what was it, Stephen? Make no bones of telling
me of any blunder I may have committed, according to
your views of duty. You are so much older than myself,
that I'll stand it.
Why, sir, it's not in seamanship, or in sealing; if it
was, I'd hold my tongue; but it's in not keeping the Lord's
Day from the hour when we lifted our anchor in that bay
that bears the name of your family, Captain Gar'ner; and
which ought to be, and I make no doubt
is
, dear to you on
that account, if for no other reason. I rather think, from
what they tell me, that the old Lord Gar'ner of all had
much preaching of the word, and much praying to the Lord
in the old times, when he lived there.
There never was any
Lord
Gardiner among us,
returned
Roswell, modestly, though it was a fashion among
the east-enders to give that title to the owner of the island.
My ancestor who first got the place was Lyon Gardiner, an
engineer in the service of the colony of Connecticut.
Well, whether he was a lion or a lamb, I'll answer for
it the Lord was not forgotten on that island, Captain
Gar'ner
,
and he shouldn't be on this. No man ever lost
anything
in this world, or in that which is to come a'ter it, by
remembering once in seven days to call on his Creator to
help him on in his path. I've heard it said, sir, that you're
a little partic'lar like in your idees of religion, and that you
do not altogether-hold to the doctrines that are preached
up and down the land.
Roswell felt his cheeks warm at this remark, and he
thought of Mary, and of her meek reliance on that Saviour
whom, in the pride of his youth, strength, and as he fancied
of his reason also, he doubted about, as being the Son of
God. The picture thus presented to his mind had its
pleasant
and its unpleasant features. Strange as it may seem,
it is certain that the young man would have loved, would
have respected Mary less than he now did, could he imagine
that
she
entertained the same notions on this very subject
as those he entertained himself! Few men relish infidelity
in a woman, whose proper sphere would seem to be in
believing
and in worshipping, and not in cavilling, or in
splitting
straws on matters of faith. Perhaps it is that we are
apt to associate laxity of morals with laxity of belief, and
have a general distaste for releasing the other sex from any,
even the smallest of the restraints that the dogmas of the
church impose; but we hold it to be without dispute that,
with very few exceptions, every man would prefer that the
woman in whom he feels an interest should err on the side
of bigotry rather than on that of what is called liberalism
in points of religious belief. Thus it is with most of us,
and thus was it with Roswell Gardiner. He could not
wonder at Mary's rigid notions, considering her education;
and, on the whole, he rather liked her the better for them,
at the very moment that he felt they might endanger his
own happiness. If women thoroughly understood how much
of their real power and influence with men arises from their
seeming dependence, there would be very little tolerance
in their own circles for those among them who are for
proclaiming
their independence and their right to equality in
all things.
While our young mariner and his companion were
working
their way up to the table-land, which lay fully three
hundred feet above the level of the sea, there was little
opportunity for further discourse, so rough was the way,
and so difficult the ascent. At the summit, however, there
was a short pause, ere the two undertook the mountain
proper, and they came to a halt to take a look at the aspect
of things around them. There was the boat, a mere white
speck on the water, flying away with a fresh northerly
breeze towards the volcano, while the smoke from the latter
made a conspicuous and not very distant land-mark. Nearer
at home, all appeared unusually plain for a region in which
Vol. I.  19
fogs were so apt to prevail. The cove lay almost beneath
them, and the schooner, just then, struck the imagination
of her commander as a fearfully small craft to come so far
from home and to penetrate so deep among the mazes of
the ice. It was that ice, itself, however, that attracted
most of Roswell's attention. Far as the eye could reach,
north, south, east and west, the ocean was brilliant and
chill with the vast floating masses. The effect on the air
was always perceptible in that region, `killing the summer,'
as the sealers expressed it; but it seemed to be doubly so
at the elevation to which the two adventurers had attained.
Still, the panorama was magnificent. The only part of the
ocean that did not seem to be alive with ice-bergs, if one
may use such an expression, was the space within the group,
and that was as clear as an estuary in a mild climate. It
really appeared as if nature had tabooed that privileged
spot, in order that the communication between the different
islands should remain open. Of course, the presence of so
many obstacles to the billows without, and indeed even to
the rake of the winds, produced smooth water within, the
slow, breath-like heaving and setting of the ceaseless
ground-swell
,
being the only perceptible motion to the water
inside
.
'T is a very remarkable view, Stephen, said Roswell
Gardiner, but there will be one much finer, if we can
work our way up that cone of a mountain, and stand on its
naked cap. I wish I had brought an old ensign and a
small spar along, to set up the gridiron, in honour of the
States. We're beginning to put out our feelers, old
Stimson
,
and shall have 'em on far better bits of territory than
this, before the earth has gone round in its track another
hundred years.
Well, to my notion, Captain Gar'ner, answered the
seaman, following his officer towards the base of the cone,
Uncle Sam has got more land now than he knows what
to do with. If a body could discover a bit of ocean, or a
largish sort of a sea, there might be some use in 't. Whales
are getting to be skeary, and are mostly driven off their old
grounds; and as for the seals, you must bury yourself, craft
and all, up to the truck in ice, to get a smile from one of
their good-lookin' count'nances, as I always say.
I'm afraid, Stephen, it is all over with the discovery
of more seas. Even the moon, they now say, is altogether
without water, having not so much as a lake or a large pond
to take a duck in.
Without water, sir! exclaimed Stimson, quite aghast.
If 'tis so, sir, it
must
be right, since the same hand that
made the moon made this 'arth, and all it contains. But
what
can
they do for seafaring folks in the moon, if what
you tell me, Captain Gar'ner, is the truth?
They must do without them. I fancy oil and skins are
not very much in demand among the moonites, Stephen.
What's that, off here to the eastward, eh?
East-and-by-north-half-east
,
or so?
I see what you mean, sir. It does look wonderfully
like a sail, and a sail pretty well surrounded by ice, too!
There was no mistake in the matter. The white canvass
of a vessel was plainly visible, over a vast breadth of
field-ice
,
a little to the northward of the island that lay directly
opposite the cove. Although the sails of this stranger were
spread, it was plain enough he was closely beset, if not
actually jammed. From the first instant he saw the strange
craft, Roswell had not a doubt of her character. He felt
convinced it was his late consort, the Sea Lion of the
Vineyard
,
which had found her way to the group by means of
some hints that had fallen into Daggett's hands, if not by a
positive nautical instinct. So great had been his own
success
,
however, and so certain did he now feel of filling up
in due season, that he cared much less for this invasion
on his privacy than he would have done a fortnight earlier.
On the contrary, it might be a good thing to have a consort
in the event of any accident occurring to his own vessel.
From the moment, then, that Gardiner felt certain of the
character of the strange sail, his policy was settled in his
own mind. It was to receive his old acquaintance with
good will, and to help fill him up too, as soon as he had
secured his own cargo, in order that they might sail for
home in company. By his aid and advice, the other schooner
might save a week in time at that most important season
of the year; and by the experience and exertions of his
people, a whole month in filling up might readily be
gained.
All thoughts of climbing the peak were at once
abandoned
;
and, in fifteen minutes after the sail was seen,
Roswell and Stephen both came panting down to the
house; so much easier is it to descend in this world than
to mount. A swivel was instantly loaded and fired as a
signal; and, in half an hour, a boat was manned and ready.
Roswell took command himself, leaving his second mate
to look after the schooner. Stimson went with his captain,
and in less than one hour after he had first seen the strange
sail, our hero was actually pulling out of the cove, with a
view to go to her assistance. Roswell Gardiner was as
good-hearted a fellow as ever lived. He had a sufficient
regard for his own interests, as well as for those of others
entrusted to his care; but, these main points looked after,
he would cheerfully have worked a month to relieve the
Vineyard-men from the peril that so plainly beset them.
Setting his sails the instant the boat was clear of the rocks,
away he went, then, as fast as ash and canvass could carry
him, which was at a rate but little short of eight knots in
the hour.
As he was thus flying towards his object, our young
mariner formed a theory in his own mind, touching the
drift of the ice in the adjacent seas. It was simply this.
He had sounded in entering the great bay, and had
ascertained
that comparatively shallow water existed between
the south-eastern extremity of Sealer's Land and the nearest
island opposite. It was deep enough to admit the largest
vessel that ever floated, and a great deal more than this;
but it was not deep enough to permit an ice-berg to pass.
The tides, too, ran in races among the islands, which
prevented
the accumulation of ice at the southern entrance,
while the outer currents seemed to set everything past the
group to allow of the floating mountains to collect to the
eastward, where they appeared to be thronged. It was on
the western verge of this wilderness of ice-bergs and
ice-fields
that the strange sail had been seen working her way
towards the group, which must be plainly in view from her
decks, as her distance from the nearest of the islands
certainly
did not exceed two leagues.
It required more than two hours for the whale-boat of
Roswell to cross the bay, and reach the margin of that vast
field of ice, which was prevented from drifting into the
open space only by encountering the stable rocks of the
first of the group. Every eye was now turned in quest of
an opening, by means of which it might be possible to get
further to the eastward. One, at length, was discovered,
and into it Gardiner dashed, ordering his boat's crew to
stretch themselves out at their oars, though every man with
him thought they were plunging into possible destruction.
On the boat went, however, now sheering to starboard,
now to port, to avoid projecting spurs of ice, until she had
ploughed her way through a fearfully narrow, and a
deviating
passage, that sometimes barely permitted them to
go through, until a spot was reached where the two fields
which formed this strait actually came in close crushing
contact with each other. Roswell took a look before and
behind him, saw that his boat was safe owing to the
formation
of the two outlines of the respective fields, when he
sprang upon the ice itself, bidding the boat-steerer to wait
for him. A shout broke out of the lips of the young captain
the instant he was erect on the ice. There lay the schooner,
the Martha's Vineyard craft, within half a mile of him, in
plain sight, and in as plain jeopardy. She was jammed,
with every prospect, as Roswell thought, of being crushed,
ere she could get free from the danger.
END OF VOL. I.